“Because you overreach oneself.”The low and deep sound resounds, Jing Hongchen grandparent and grandchild three people simultaneously one startled, looks in the direction that the sound conveys, night, the ray in palace is very gloomy, at this time actually slowly appears two people.

When they see clearly the appearances of these two people, is surprised.

The response of Xiao Hongchen is biggest, he is almost must throw immediately. The personal enemy meets particularly is jealous, when this state of mind is unsatisfactory, suddenly sees own big personal enemy, he can peaceful?

Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, silently looks at the Xiao Hongchen brother and sister and Jing Hongchen.

Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen have grown up, was the initial young men and women appearance, Meng Hongchen is no longer better, is a beautiful young girl appearance, but the Xiao Hongchen under 30-year-old age, two temples somewhat were unexpectedly gray.

At this time, he looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the double pupil as if must spout the flame to be common.

However, he has not thrown eventually, in he must take flash before the action, was held by Jing Hongchen.

Meng Hongchen dull looks at Huo Yuhao, falls the vision on Tang Wutong again, the elegant face is also becomes a paleness. In her heart, can never forget that to have a pink-blue color short hair, handsome charming Wang Dong. That is the first love in her heart! May afterward, this first love actually only be able to turn into the endless pain, these many years, have actually been suffering her heart.

“What name should I call your?”Meng Hongchen crazy looks at Tang Wutong, muttered said.

The Tang Wutong expression is slightly is also awkward, nodded to her, said: “I called Tang Wutong.”

“Tang Wutong? Isn't Wang Qiu'er or Wang Dong'er?”Meng Hongchen somewhat is also surprised.

Xiao Hongchen is the anger exclaims: “Grandfather, you let loose me.”

“Shut up!”Jing Hongchen stands up suddenly, “!”A resounding, Xiao Hongchen pulled out to stagger by his palm of the hand.

This time Jing Hongchen, the body power and influence increases instantaneously, the formidable pressure aura caresses the face to go toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, moves motionless, these belong to the pressure that Jing Hongchen brings, arrives at beyond his front ten meters, naturally dissipated, could not see him to use any method.

The Jing Hongchen complexion again changes, sinking sound track: “You walk, does not need to request reinforcements, immediately leaves here, returns to Bright Capital City to go.”His words, were say to the Xiao Hongchen brother and sister.

“No, I do not walk!”A Jing Hongchen palm of the hand cannot pull out obviously awakes Xiao Hongchen. His these many years, in heart depressing was really too fierce, if were not Huo Yuhao they, he will reduce to the potential exhausts, did these many years cultivate for the progress so slow region? He is a God's favored one, but now, forever has not actually touched this world peak the possibility, in his heart hates! And, person who most hates, is Huo Yuhao.

“Shut up! You get lost to me.”Complexion of Jing Hongchen air/Qi turns green. This mixes the boy, this time was swayed by personal feelings? Has lost to front this young people including Evil Soul Master of Holy Spirit Cult five big Transcendent Douluo levels, by them, and others fights with what?

Jing Hongchen had wielded Bright Virtue Hall after all, the informed sources are very rich, he will not think in the imperial palace that 100 Soul Engineer to be able to block Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong two people now. Perhaps, that 100 people already silent death here.

He only wants by his strength, to seek a way out to two children now.

“Grandfather, we do not walk, today dies, we must with you die together.”Meng Hongchen arrives at side Jing Hongchen, the body appears slowly white fog, Vermillion Clear Ice Toad Martial Soul releases quietly, the light Bai Se (White Color) air current fills the air, actually not transmits toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction, because she is very clear, own fatal violently poisonous to Absolute Ice not any function.

Xiao Hongchen also sobered at this time several points, clenches the teeth, stands in Jing Hongchen another side, body dark golden color ray twinkle, Three Legged Golden Toad Martial Soul release, has prepared fight.

The appearance that looks at their grandparent and grandchild three people of sharing a common hatred, Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Hall Master Hongchen, if I said that our time comes and well-meant, has not thought must injure you, do you believe?”

Jing Hongchen has gawked, the tight heartstrings therefore have not relaxed, “what do that you want to make?”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong silent appearance here, not to be potential achievement? He already heard that Huo Yuhao once led Soul Engineer Corp to stir the wind to stir the rain in Sun-Moon Empire, has incurred the massive loss to the empire. Now will he here, show mercy? Must know, the Sun-Moon Empire army may just encircle shortly after Shrek City, he draws back the soldier.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, said: “I do not want to kill you. To be honest, crossed these many years, past actually until now still at present flash through in us. Although we once were the matches, but if did not have the hostility between countries, we should not be the enemies. Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen, actually, we should thank you. Is you takes to our tempering, can make us grow quickly.”

The Xiao Hongchen eye one was red, “do you regard the hone me?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, never has. Now recalls initially, has this feeling. Initial we, by strength, actually might as well you. But we have formidable fighting will. Finally, we won. Has not thought that you took the extreme path, if you were not past over excitation own potential, we now as before are the matches, what a pity.”

“I do not match, when your match?”Xiao Hongchen is angry, the right hand lifts suddenly, changes into a dark golden metal artillery tube, a dark golden shell, has shelled the past in the Huo Yuhao direction instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, the right hand lifts, wields gently, thermal shock in air, next one flickers, that dark golden bright sphere quietly vanishes to disappear.

Only then Tang Wutong sees, on the road which must be taken of that shell, the air split a small slit, swallows in which that shell directly, where explodes as for it, that not in their ponder scopes.

For these days they in process that Sky Soul Empire loafed, each other was practicing, seeks for the feeling of that Space Power, after all, Space Power is very possible is they must break through Limit Douluo most important one ring in the future. But now, they had some comprehensions to Space Power, now uses, won initial success.

Jing Hongchen complexion changed changed, he knows what own grandson displays is any ability, has not thought can injure Huo Yuhao, but by such easy melting, is he is unexpected, this Huo Yuhao strength, is really as if more formidable than the imagination. Ah? that his small age, actually how achieves

Meng Hongchen gets angry: “Huo Yuhao, you little here bluff and bluster, you are what kind, we then and that's the end.”

Huo Yuhao actually does not visit her, but falls the vision on the Jing Hongchen old face, “Hall Master Hongchen, we do not want to kill people today, therefore, please let your two grandsons restrain some. I only asked that an issue, you told me the answer, we walk immediately, moreover ensure cannot come back in view of you again.”

Jing Hongchen coldly [say / way]: “If I didn't reply?”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “I did not mind that removes some potential threats for our Shrek Academy. In recent years, in my hand strikes the Sun-Moon Empire person who kills to have many, I already could not count, does not miss again many two.”

The Jing Hongchen complexion changes, “do you threaten me?”

……

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-1





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, “you, if thinks is, that is. I threaten you, again?”

The strength is all background, Jing Hongchen clearly results in the complexion blanch by the Huo Yuhao air/Qi, does not have any means that he has no alternative but to dread that he is very clear, relies on the grandparent and grandchild three people, absolutely possibly is not the Huo Yuhao match. Let alone his side also has Tang Wutong.

“What do you want to ask?”Suppresses the humiliation of innermost feelings, Jing Hongchen is stretching out the arms, blocks Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen that wanted to manifest suddenly, the sinking sound asks.

Huo Yuhao said: “I must know where the Sun-Moon Empire army, slowly seeks for some to be too troublesome now, happen to passed by Heaven Dou City, asks you. Told my accurate news, we leave immediately.”

Jing Hongchen gets angry: “Can you make me betray your motherland? Cannot achieve!”

Huo Yuhao nodded, no longer said that the right hand in the Xiao Hongchen direction, lifted, immediately, in him behind, the gold sun blue moon ray raises slowly, the unequalled formidable aura erupts instantaneously.

Xu Sanshi said right, when Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are carrying on Martial Soul Fusion, they have, is the strength of Limit Douluo level!

Jing Hongchen explodes drinks one, whole body red light rises suddenly, front, together disc float, intense red light blooms outward, changes into giant light screen, protects the grandparent and grandchild three people in behind.

Some Huo Yuhao pitying visits him, shook the head.

Without a doubt, Jing Hongchen displays, defensive nine levels of Soul Guidance Device Worldly Desire that he excels. Compares in general nine levels of Soul Engineer, once was Bright Virtue Hall Master he, the strength must be more formidable, in the hand the formidable nine levels of Soul Guidance Device quantities were also more. However, he also eventually was nine levels of Soul Engineer categories.

Ices the blue ray to dodge not to have together, in the air, flashes through a light morning dew.

The pure white scratch appears in the Worldly Desire surface stuffily, Jing Hongchen snort|hum, in that flash, he only thought that own body seemed separated, that feeling, as if the whole person was torn.

The feeling of good terror. Jing Hongchen has a big shock, has not waited for he many responses, Huo Yuhao to appear in Worldly Desire, simultaneously appears, Tang Wutong.

The temperature drops to below 150 degrees below zero instantaneously, the ultra-low temperature is the best domain, Jing Hongchen, is Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen brother and sister, felt instantaneously own blood as if must congeal generally, Soul Power and blood in within the body, even becomes including the aura impeded. They have to stimulate to movement Soul Power fully, maintains own inquiry.

Then they saw, the smile that on the Huo Yuhao face reveals, that smile does not keep aloof, but has the feeling that one type is unable to contend with.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to their grandparent and grandchild three people, the right hand together, the dark golden light blade edge appears, falls another nine levels of Soul Guidance Device rackets that Jing Hongchen releases.

Before Tang Wutong body, the low and deep dragon roar sound gets up, in a Purple gold color Dragon Head mouth emits the innumerable flowing light, suppressed Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen can only go all out to resist.

Teleportation, moreover is double Teleportation, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously vanish in same place, presents again time, they arrived in front of Xiao Hongchen.

Just about to changes into the liquid Xiao Hongchen, was locked by the ultra-low temperature instantaneously, the Huo Yuhao void palm arranges in the air, has sealed up around his body all spaces, the body of liquefied freezes completely.

On Tang Wutong bursts out incomparably radiant golden light, in the resonant dragon roar sound, the attack of Jing Hongchen and Meng Hongchen was swallowed by that Purple gold colored light glow completely, a wee bit cannot threaten Huo Yuhao.

The personal appearance retrocedes instantaneously, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong returned to formerly position, before their bodies, were just many Xiao Hongchen, dark golden Xiao Hongchen, already completely frozen Xiao Hongchen.

The palm of Huo Yuhao presses in the Xiao Hongchen top of the head, vision tranquil looks at Jing Hongchen.

The body of Jing Hongchen is shivering, not because of angry, but is the fear.

Too formidable, not wrong, he truly has such strength! Has examined personally, he is clear, why before Huo Yuhao, will say these words, agree said lets off them, before him, the grandparent and grandchild three people is not the match. Before Xiao Hongchen, retaliation that said that but is a joke.

20-year-old Limit Douluo? It seems like that this world must cloud over eventually! Ascended the sky to Sun-Moon Empire so formidable Soul Guidance Device, actually gave has belonged to Douluo Continent three countries such monsters, facing such monster, actually who can contend with him? At least do not have any possibly.

Jing Hongchen pain has closed eyes, nodded to Huo Yuhao, said: “Good, I told you.”

If 20 years ago, or is ten years ago, by the Bright Virtue Hall Master disposition, even if the biological grandson dies in the front shortly, he absolutely will also defend his dignity with the life.

But, now is different, he was old, the person was old, is attached to the family, he only then these two outstanding grandsons and granddaughter. They are he hope completely, even is also the hope of family. Under Jing Hongchen once cloth, friend, almost all died in that large explosion, otherwise, he did how to go so far as to reduce in this? Therefore, he does not have the means that he can only compromise, so long as can save grandson's life.

Huo Yuhao nodded, waves the arms about, Xiao Hongchen returned in front of Jing Hongchen, freezing effect also contacted. Huo Yuhao does not fear Jing Hongchen to renege on a promise, he can catch oneself front one time Xiao Hongchen, can grasp again the second time.

Restores the normal Xiao Hongchen whole body to shiver, he fears actually, but is freezes.

Looks at Huo Yuhao, his look some delay, if before, in angry he also has blood energy, then, present he, remaining only then despaired. Right, is desperate.

What to do? In this case, can actually be able to resist him? He could not find the answer, he even understands that oneself this life was impossible to find the answer again.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to him, said: “I will understand to feel grateful, thank you once to take to my pressure, thank you once with my hostility. Today I do not kill you, you have no need timidly, to take revenge, momentarily waits for you. However, you must refuel.”

The Xiao Hongchen complexion from turned suddenly palely blood red, “”spouts a blood, the body has creakied.

Jing Hongchen angry [say / way]: “Walks, you walk. Sun-Moon Empire army south of being away from Heaven Dou City inside and outside 500, in the basin that hills surround is stationed in the recuperation. You walk! Do not make me see you again.”

Huo Yuhao said again that perhaps he really must forever lose his grandson, he only wants to make them quickly depart now, best is forever no longer sees.

Huo Yuhao nodded to Jing Hongchen, “Hall Master Hongchen, takes care.”Got the answer of wish, he is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go.

“wait a moment.”Jing Hongchen called out suddenly.

Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps, turns head to look to Jing Hongchen, “what does Hall Master have to confess?”

After Jing Hongchen has hesitated slightly one next, said: “Huo Yuhao, has a matter I to tell you, at present, War-God Empress is receiving your majesty question. Concrete because any I am not very clear, but should be related with Holy Spirit Cult, it is said is the Soul Engineer mutiny in army, has killed in the armed forces in all Holy Spirit Cult the underlying bed, only then above Titled Douluo cultivates for Evil Soul Master runs away. Therefore, now that side the imperial capital somewhat is also chaotic, is the reason why the army does not have about one step to move. However, heard that War-God Empress is also dispatching Soul Engineer that the home trains newly, supplements various Soul Engineer Corp, in savings strength.”

“?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Jing Hongchen, he has not thought that Jing Hongchen actually will say such words to oneself.

Jing Hongchen said: Soul Engineer that “at present, these train newly, should also on the road. In three days, they should arrive at the military compound. Judges according to me, although this time matter is very troublesome, even if your majesty, is not willing to offend to have two Limit Douluo Holy Spirit Cult, but, starts the strength to be getting more and more formidable with the flight of steps leading to a palace hall, two Limit Douluo cannot get the winning side absolutely. At least War-God Empress should not have matter, your majesty most trusts is empress, moreover he was also counting on empress continues to help him attack a city to seize territory. The present is a good opportunity, how as to do, looked your. All has been said that is to the repayment of graciousness of two not killing, please.”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, “many thanks Hall Master considers.”Spoke these words, he holds up the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go.

Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen surprised sees own grandfather, how regardless of they have not thought that Jing Hongchen actually so secretly will tell Huo Yuhao.

“It is not clear, right? I to am the truth that he said that not having the least bit to cheat, in your opinion, did I betray the country?”Smiling that Jing Hongchen self-ridicules.

Xiao Hongchen sound somewhat hoarse [say / way]: “Grandfather, why do you want such to do?”

Jing Hongchen coldly visits him, “now you know the words that you spoke a moment ago were laughable? I told you, even if the empire unified entire Continent, Shrek Academy will not have the matter. The empire will not aim at Shrek Academy, the simplest reason, because that is Academy, but is not a country. This is also the Shrek Academy wisest place, they always do not yearn for the authority, but enlightens Soul Master, later also has Soul Engineer. Anybody has ruled Continent, hope existence of this highest school. Therefore, Shrek Academy can inherit for ten thousand years. If the empire wants to ruin Shrek Academy, then, even may cause declining of empire. Because Shrek Academy taught too many powerhouses.”

……

Last moon/month, sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support sincerely. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-2





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


“For example these present has submitted to the fellow in empire, our Sky Soul Empire, many people come from Shrek Academy. Sky Soul Empire perishes, they can submit. However, if Shrek Academy was perished, do you believe that they will rise immediately spiritedly to revolt. You had studied in Shrek Academy, told me, what was there felt?”

The Xiao Hongchen tooth fastens to nip, agree did not speak, Meng Hongchen said spookily: “That truly is the school that any Soul Master must yearn, although I and elder brother are receive the students to repel there, but, Teacher actually do not repel in us, so long as we inquired, would obtaining the correct reply, there, has the best study and practice atmosphere, student who where walked, that outstanding . Moreover, everyone will have a deep attachment to Academy, if possible, I am even willing to go back to study and pursue advanced studies again. Therefore, why I am specially clear some that many Shrek Academy Inner Court students finally to choose to remain as Academy.”

“Laughable!”Xiao Hongchen roars.

Jing Hongchen shook the head, said: “Child, you were too tenacious. Do you know? Actually, even if I, had yearned for Shrek Academy, has thought must go to there study. Why this is also you can become reason that exchanges fresh, because I hope that you can complete that wish for me! I clearly know that outstanding of Shrek Academy students, arrives at our Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy certainly to be potential achievement, but my being able help makes you as before the exchange is born with is so. Not only I, so long as is Soul Master, hopes to go to the Shrek Academy study, anybody is the same. Including your majesty!”

“Your majesty?”Meng Hongchen calls out in alarm one.

Jing Hongchen nodded, said: “Do you believe that if your majesty unified Continent, Crown Prince Your Highness certainly will enter then the Shrek Academy study under the premise of guarantee security in the future, this is ten thousand years of Shrek charm is at! Therefore, Shrek will not have matter, smiles all that said a moment ago, really is just a joke.”

“Why must tell Huo Yuhao these matters as for me, is actually very simple, because I hope him to know that or I do not hope the empire such quickly can unify Continent. The crafty rabbit dies, running dog to boil, bird and good bow conceal completely. If the empire unified Continent smoothly, our these Soul Engineer did not have the opportunity. Only the war is unceasing, in the future, after you will join Worship Hall, will have the budding opportunity. Therefore, at this time, I must such do. Right, I betrayed the country, is, for the family, I have to such do.”

Jing Hongchen pain has closed eyes, “you remember, this life, do not aim at Huo Yuhao again, you did not have any opportunity. Even if Shrek Academy, I never had also heard before, has presented the super talent of such level, he grew completely, even if Holy Spirit Cult that two Limit Douluo, is not necessarily able to want his life. Once that two Limit Douluo life comes to the end, you look, future Continent, will be this young people. If in Douluo Continent historical has a person to be able only compared with him, then, is their Tang Sect first ancestor, Tang San. In the past, Tang San was leading Shrek Seven Devils, established Tang Sect, Continent was vertically and horizontally invincible, finally inherited the position of Gods, defeated stiffly same inherited the God Position Martial Soul Hall palace Lord, thus has disintegrated Martial Soul Hall, making the country controls the Continent strength truly. Afterward, the Tang Sect ancestor Tang San liter into God Realm vanished does not see. Although this is only the legend, but in my opinion, if has God Realm, has Gods, perhaps, this Huo Yuhao, his Tang Wutong, really had such potential. Such match, is not you can contend!”

“Gods?”These two character, in the heart the indignant Xiao Hongchen delay, he never had not thought of these two characters. Does Gods, what mean? On this world, really bright? Nobody knows, but, has in Shrek Academy and Tang Sect legend.

Until now, that once to turn into a god first-generation Shrek Seven Devils statue, in the Shrek Academy front door.

Jing Hongchen earnest nod, “has the possibility, the time will confirm all, will tell our final answers. Perhaps, our generation when are living, may witness Gods to appear.”

The Meng Hongchen look was somewhat crazy, but Xiao Hongchen is the delay, he has not thought that once regarded as the person of biggest match by oneself, really had became the Gods potential.

Leaves the imperial palace, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong has not continued to stay again, they simultaneously jump, flies toward the upper air. All upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device before them, are only a joke.

“Yuhao, you said that Jing Hongchen words are credible?”Tang Wutong asked.

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Confidence level is very high.”

“Why?”Tang Wutong is somewhat puzzled.

Huo Yuhao said: “Hero is late in life! Couldn't you have looked? This Jing Hongchen was very discontented with entire Sun-Moon Empire. Once he, the power leaned the government and people, controlled Bright Virtue Hall, was eminent characters in nine levels of Soul Engineer. But now? Although became Heaven Dou City City Lord, in surface attractive very much, in fact actually has been far away from the power core, all these are Xu Tianran create without doubt, can he not hate? Can listen a moment ago to two grandson and granddaughter's words from him, he is not willingly. Such being the case, he needs to be two grandsons and granddaughter after rises to make a stage. The peace is never the stage of powerhouse, only then throughout maintains in the war, they have the opportunity. In a nutshell, this Jing Hongchen, anxiouss to stir up trouble radically. He naturally does not hope that Sun-Moon Empire was injured by us, but does not hope that Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent in a short time, that does not serve the benefit of their family.”

“Has not thought that he unexpectedly is so selfish?”Tang Wutong somewhat disdains.

Huo Yuhao is actually somewhat disappointed, said: “This cannot say, after having hobbling of family, a lot truly cannot only consider itself!”In his mind has remembered Duke White Tiger, initially, he has not paid attention to oneself mother and child, because......

Were one starting to give him to look to give a pretext? In Huo Yuhao heart one startled, but somewhat is also funny.

He also profound remembering, initially just left Duke's Estate now time, once secretly pledged that one day must become now most powerhouse on Douluo Continent, then avenges a grievance for mother.

Regarding most powerhouse pledge, he approached, if can achievement Limit Douluo, he be possible in the future very much becomes most powerhouse on this world. But, the mentality of revenging actually changed, truly after becoming the powerhouse, many hatreds unconscious was desalinated.

Thanks Academy that Huo Yuhao is from the heart, thanked Tang Sect, if did not have the guidance of Academy, perhaps he will take leaning the road, perhaps also became Evil Soul Master. Because Academy changes his idea unceasingly, cared that his growth, trains him becomes present age a powerhouse, because partners drive mutually, he had today.

Huo Yuhao knows to feel grateful very much, he is always so, this benevolence, he will repay with the life.

The light ray from the sky glitters, that is the ray of star, in the curtain of night, today's star light is especially bright, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong concealment in Imitation Soul Ability, flies toward the south.

“We then what to do? Intercepts these Soul Engineer? They also not before the army converges, actually good opportunity.”Tang Wutong said.

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Is a good opportunity. Ju Zi(orange) once had to propose to me, she said that so long as I can kill Xu Tianran, she complies not to launch the war in ten years, to opportunity that Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire rest and build up strength.”

“Ah? does she want to murder the husband?”Tang Wutong shocking saying.

On the Huo Yuhao face full is the forced smile, “I do not know how evidently she thinks, but I have to acknowledge that her proposition makes me ten divert attention. Therefore, my following goal, likely was Xu Tianran. Xu Tianran is the present age fierce and ambitious, in he controls Sun-Moon Empire, has to unify the Continent ability. But if he died, Sun-Moon Empire will be in the confusion surely. Ju Zi(orange) wants the position of crown prince stabilizes is occupied by oneself son also to need to be good some time, therefore, even if she is perfidious, Sun-Moon Empire similarly was impossible to launch the war in a short time. Therefore, Xu Tianran dies, is my goal.”

Tang Wutong said: “Originally you look for the Sun-Moon Empire army, can discuss this matter with Ju Zi(orange)?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “Naturally continues. The lion can only negotiate with the tiger, if we do not show enough strength, how I can force her to observe the commitment? Therefore, we must begin, first weakens the strengths of some of her armies, then negotiated with her. As the matter stands, her situation will be more poverty-stricken. This does not have the matter of means that if possible, I am not willing to become an enemy with her. Ju Zi(orange) was too intelligent, particularly in battlefield, even if I, cannot plan her.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “The Ju Zi(orange) only issue, is actually her individual strength, if she can have the formidable individual strength again, she too was then dangerous. Yuhao, if one day, she threatened Academy, you will kill her?”

Asked these words time, Tang Wutong looks is very earnest, Huo Yuhao looks to her eye pupil. In the Tang Wutong eye reveals an ashamed color slightly, lowered the head, said: “Sorry, Yuhao, in my heart some are uncomfortable.”

Huo Yuhao embraces into her the bosom, is controlling the speed of flight. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-3





Volume 12

#594 - On Mountain Valley Army


“I understand. You could rest assured that Wutong, on this world, besides Dong'er, only then Qiu'er had walked into my heart. But now, Dong'er or Qiu'er, in fact are you, therefore, nobody can affect among us the sentiment. Right, I had liked Ju Zi(orange), but that passed. If before I know you are the female body, she is willing with me in the same place, the present all not to be perhaps different, but she does not have, she chooses the road that oneself must take, at that time we already never possibly. Therefore, although I, when she is a friend, absolutely does not have the sentiment of men and women. If one day, she threatened Academy, I certainly will not show mercy.”

When said the last few words, Tang Wutong clearly saw murderous intention that the Huo Yuhao eyeground deep place flashed through instantaneously.

Academy in his heart, is really most important!

On the Tang Wutong face reveals a smile, said: “If threatens the Academy person is I? I know that this issue is very silly, but, I cannot help asking you.”

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, his complexion changed serious, “do not crack a joke with this matter. If there is such one day, I same will kill you. Stated differently, after having killed you, I will commit suicide, commits suicide together in the name of love for you. In that case, has helped our love, has protected Academy.”

“Is unfair to Yuhao, I later did not ask such question.”Tang Wutong enclasps him, as if must melt the anxiety in his heart.

Huo Yuhao gently is stroking her long hair, said: “On the day of hope do not have. Ju Zi(orange) should unable. Academy after is not a country, even if Xu Tianran is crazy, he does not have to destroy Academy truly. Regarding any ruler, Academy is one provides the talented person best place. Let alone, Shrek Academy ten thousand years of background, some people want to ruin it, that must think over first oneself whether can withstand, therefore brings Thunder's Rage of scholars.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Yes. If Academy were ruined, we will go all out.”

Huo Yuhao nods the head slightly, on the face reveals a light smile, “was good. Did not say these, we picked up the speed, first observed the situation of Sun-Moon Empire army, how then thinks to begin. We must weaken the Ju Zi(orange) strength, but cannot weaken too. Moreover, I estimated that so long as we take an action, the Sun-Moon Empire army will have the change. Moreover, but also a little very much may appear, that is. Holy Spirit Cult once more will possibly send for arriving in the army. If so, was really has lived it up, we only needed to intercept these Soul Engineer to be good, framed by planting stolen goods on to shift blame this matter to use on Holy Spirit Cult, I was a psychological burden do not have.”

Tang Wutong ill-humored [say / way]: “You now were more and more bad. You said that if Holy Spirit Cult comes the person once more, who can be? Grim Reaper Douluo does Ye Xishui meet after the wedding originally? That Zongli Wu, he had sneak attacked me after on that day, his Martial Soul by your fist heavy wound, now how is not known.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Zongli Wu injured certainly source, although I did not know his injury seriously. But will not be definitely light, was not one month can restore, therefore, if came the person from Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City, Holy Spirit Cult can send out to deter the audience, perhaps also had Grim Reaper Douluo also Xishui.. Ye Xishui, is not necessarily able to make the army show respect for somebody's ability. Although Grim Reaper Douluo is formidable, but is relying on linkage Soul Guidance Device, the Sun-Moon Empire army has not feared her. Initially, even if Beast God Di Tian cannot flatter. Does not know whether now Beast God recuperated the injury.”

Tang Wutong white his eyes. Said: “Do you also some moods care about the Beast God injury now? He did not ask you to trouble is good.”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “Should face must always face, is not because I am avoiding him, does not need to face. I hope, after oneself can be more formidable, goes facing Beast God again. Only then defeats him, I can stand in this world peak truly. Wutong, promises me, if some day I decide to challenge Beast God time, do not prevent me, do not help me, I must defeat him with my strength.”

Tang Wutong has gawked staring, “may we be a body.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Regarding me, challenges Beast God, not only to prove own strength, in the meantime, is a duty, duty that I must complete.”In his mind, was recalling words that God of Emotion Rong Nianbing spoke.

This time cultivates after the promotion, became Transcendent Douluo, Huo Yuhao can feel obviously that belongs to the God of Emotion strength in own within the body is becoming stronger and stronger, perhaps, that is the Gods strength.

This strength is not him, at least now is also not. But this strength is actually fusing with him.

Initially, mobilized this strength truly time, is Tang Wutong to save him was seriously injured, he erupted Power of Emotion that released suddenly. Integrates in the mood own combat capability completely, will be his development trend important direction.

Beast God Di Tian has stood in this world apex, even if his achievement Limit Douluo, has third Soul Nucleus, is not necessarily able to win Di Tian steadily. To defeat Di Tian, he must fuse Power of Emotion of oneself within the body. Only has so, can break through once more, can integrate God of Emotion Gods truly.

Not only he now, to turn into a god, is lets in within the body six big spirit extrications the roads which must be taken. Moreover, to that time, he could have the Wutong same place, goes to God Realm. In the Huo Yuhao heart thinks that the Wutong strength is so strong, if become God of Emotion, asked Rong Nianbing to help Wutong also look for Gods to inherit, wants to come, he should not reject.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao thought one are competitive, what but also there is compared with clearly recognizing the direction the happy matter?

Huo Yuhao relaxes is embracing the bosom of Tang Wutong, is holding her hand. In the free time who they spoke, 500 li (0.5km) distance arrived.

By far, the earth in the Spiritual Detection scanning of Huo Yuhao completely presents during he consciousness, such that just like Jing Hongchen said that a giant basin appears in their field of vision, the area of this basin, compared with initially Huo Yuhao they had gone to Ice and Fire Yin Yang Well big many.

In Ice and Fire Yin Yang Well, although has numerous Heaven and Earth Treasure, two spring water, but the area is not too actually big. But here is different, this basin, big of area, exceeds the general city by far.

By the basin has the start to talk, can enter, the basin, the topography is smooth, can look from inside vegetation, this is a treasure trove!

Around the basin is stone mountain, although is insufficient to be infertile, but does not have the vegetation of cover, such mountain is unattractive, but is very solid, is the natural city wall.

The Sun-Moon Empire army hides in this basin, wanted to find truly is difficult. If not Jing Hongchen discloses secret information, Huo Yuhao a short time, but could also not find this place.

Spiritual Detection covers, a about examination. Really, in basin, everywhere what is stationed is the tent of Sun-Moon Empire army . Moreover, on the summits of basin four directions, arranges the Soul Guidance Array place. Moreover scale relative big of Soul Guidance Array place, seems, unexpectedly is the dispositions of Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.

My goodness, whose this is must cope with Ah? definitely not to cope with me. Huo Yuhao somewhat moves thought that raises, in addition the beforehand guess, the answer was self-evident.

Own plan has succeeded, the army mutiny, Soul Engineer to get rid of Evil Soul Master, Holy Spirit Cult must definitely get angry. Does not know how Ju Zi(orange) handles this matter, she has not led the army to return to homeland, obviously does not want to admit mistakes, how to process as for Xu Tianran, it can be imagined. Xu Tianran will certainly turn toward Ju Zi(orange). Most great significance that in Sun-Moon Empire, Holy Spirit Cult has, in fact to cope with Shrek Academy, but now Shrek Academy gradually no longer is the Sun-Moon Empire most important match. At least with the Sky Soul Empire destruction, after the huge resources pour into, the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength once more selects for promotion, the function of Holy Spirit Cult became getting smaller, but Ju Zi(orange) was different, she has been promoting in the prestige of military, was representing the Xu Tianran interests. If layer on layer punishes her, does not tally with the Xu Tianran benefit. Therefore, perhaps Xu Tianran must smooth over differences.

It can be imagined, violent anger Grim Reaper Douluo can look for trouble, but when does not know appears, looks at the present appearance, Grim Reaper Douluo should not come, but, she came, can ruin part of Soul Guidance Array places, cannot support existences of these many Soul Engineer! As for Ju Zi(orange) where, perhaps only then she knew. Wanted to find her to be possible not to be easy.

Naturally, Huo Yuhao this is Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui considered that is not he of consideration, he has Spiritual Detection this to kill greatly, let alone was ten thousand armed forces, even if were on army again many several times, so long as gave his enough time, found Ju Zi(orange) not to be difficult.

Has not sought for Ju Zi(orange) directly, Huo Yuhao at present the troop deployment in basin, as well as all Soul Guidance Array positions have inspected carefully, this brings Tang Wutong to fly in a farther direction, this direction, is the road which must be taken that the Sun-Moon Empire supplies army arrives.

Has Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection, wants to bypass him, is almost the impossible matter.

Tang Wutong said: “What kind of? Here troop disposition how?”



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-1





Volume 12

#594 - Mountain Valley Army


Huo Yuhao said: “Sun-Moon Empire army complete here, Ju Zi(orange) should also be. On summit, Soul Guidance Array places of four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp arrangement, in valley, eight Soul Guidance Array places, although wants the weak upper stage, but arranges is very covert, on Soul Guidance Array with summit complements one another. Sky over the basin, as well as periphery in hundred li (0.5km) range, in the sky is flying all kinds of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, this is one must kill the bureau simply! Even if we, if went in later takes an action to be discovered that wanted to withdraw not to be easy. Ju Zi(orange) suffices ruthlessly! This must aim at Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, as well as Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao rhythm. Quite aggressive, was this must have no consideration for face with them really?”

Tang Wutong pū smiles, said: “Also is not the good deed that you do, if you do not frame by planting stolen goods on to frame, will not turn into this.”

Huo Yuhao has also smiled, “you know that what I currently do have to feel?”

Tang Wutong doubts visits him.

Huo Yuhao hey said with a smile: “My present feeling is, wanting the exhausted silk to reel a cocoon starts from the surrounding generally, disintegrates this impregnable defense line gradually, finally breaks his present bureau thoroughly. This time although will be very long, but why I do not know, at this time specially was confident.”

“If my beforehand plan has not succeeded, without a doubt, Holy Spirit Cult first copes should be I, two Limit Douluo, will also take to us really not the small pressure, but looking back now, Ju Zi(orange) actually bore these pressures for us. From her present layout, has certainly the practical assurance, that Grim Reaper Douluo can look for her trouble, otherwise cannot like this. We sit mountain Guanhu to fight one temporarily first are, making them hit first. When they hit similarly, we moved again. As for intercepting the matter of Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer reinforcements, is the Holy Spirit Cult person does certainly.”

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “You must be how what kind, you is a bastard in any case, I am the woman of bastard.”

“Ha Ha! I am a young thief, you are my clever young married woman.”

“Bah, was coarse, any clever young married woman, others were satisfactory!”

Two forms accelerate suddenly, goes toward the distant place.

valley, commander tent.

Ju Zi(orange) sits in commander tent, this time she, the body military garb went, is only a court lady style of dress, looks like the appearance of time in the imperial palace. Brow micro pressed, back and forth paces in commander tent, does not know that is pondering anything.

Xu Tianran decree after delaying for a long time, finally transmitted, in the decree, Xu Tianran harshly condemned her, but, had not said how must punish her, but said that when she completed the war after Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire, when withdrew troops toward when was to fall the crime in her.

This decree appeared very interesting, everyone could see, Xu Tianran this was in maintaining Ju Zi(orange), some Ju Zi(orange) were only clear, in Xu Tianran this decree, not only there is a maintenance, existences of other things, for example, weakened!

Very obviously, after the Xu Tianran clear this decree issues, will make that side Holy Spirit Cult go crazy, does not certainly fear Holy Spirit Cult in Bright Capital City Xu Tianran, he has Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp as well as the numerous position formidable consecration protection, in addition in Bright Capital City prepare Soul Guidance Array place, these strengths, even if Limit Douluo does not have the means to shake easily.

But has killed the Holy Spirit Cult person, is not Xu Tianran, but is her Soul Engineer in army, she is three services commander. Holy Spirit Cult did not vent these angers on her blames.

Luckily, before oneself initially left imperial palace asks Xu Tianran to probably take care of the crown prince, wants to come the crown prince not to have any danger. Xu Tianran this has suspected to oneself, he was suspects heavily, he thought obviously, after oneself stilled Sky Soul Empire, the strength that in the hand grasped was extremely strong, must therefore weaken to oneself through Holy Spirit Cult.

Naturally, this matter can also in other words, he hope further weakens Holy Spirit Cult with the aid of own strength, but weakens the best means that kills off them, kills off is good.

Sun-Moon Empire has established the absolute superiority the Continent last present, Holy Spirit Cult this ally became dispensable, in this case, the Evil Soul Master cleaning clean obviously was the good choice, at least this was the people and ministers is willing to see. Why not?

Xu Tianran this clearly must sit mountain Guanhu to fight. He is very clear, Ju Zi(orange) is impossible to lose, in the Ju Zi(orange) hand is grasping that huge strength, is that intelligent. Most is the loss will be bigger. As for Holy Spirit Cult that side, Xu Tianran has not thought many. This army mutinies, in fact is also equal to Holy Spirit Cult by Sun-Moon Empire truely excluded, was impossible to restore to the standard of original national religion.

Jing Hongchen that crafty rabbit dies, running dog to boil, bird and good bow conceal completely, uses similarly is also easy-to-use on Holy Spirit Cult.

The Holy Spirit Cult biggest fault is proud, they were proud, thinks Sun-Moon Empire left their at all impossible resistance Shrek Academy.

This point they mediated from the essence belong to the Douluo Continent three countries views are consistent, they underestimated the Soul Guidance Device prestige energy.

Xu Tianran and Sun-Moon Empire have proven with the fact, is relying on the Soul Guidance Device strength, truly can unify entire Continent. After this situation is established, what significance but also wants Holy Spirit Cult to have? The Holy Spirit Cult evil place, had already made the seething discontent among the people. Their to get rid of, is the common people most is happy to see completely. Once stain, must scrub, moreover clean that must scrub.

Xu Tianran must do, is an eternity emperor, unifies the Continent enlightened emperor, but is not Evil Tyrant.

Therefore, Xu Tianran under the careful thinking, has thought of this good means that source of trouble Tungyin.

As for the Ju Zi(orange) life and death, in the face of a future of his eternity emperor, what was also considered as? Naturally, if Ju Zi(orange) died, Xu Tianran is will be sad. At least in his subordinate, Ju Zi(orange) is most loyal, is most intimate. Xu Tianran has even thought that if Ju Zi(orange) died, he announced like the people that in the future will not find a wife again, had the crown prince in any case, wanted the empress not to matter.

Sneering of Ju Zi(orange) corners of the mouth place several points, regarding the Xu Tianran mentality, she as if can see richly now. Even can think that face of Xu Tianran issuing this decree when the expression that on reveals.

The oversuspicious fierce and ambitious, this is she to the Xu Tianran best appraisal. But, she more and more has looked down upon him now.

How Yuhao did not know, on that day Tang Wutong by Zongli Wu heavy wound, after he left, can cure Tang Wutong?

Thought of Huo Yuhao, ice-cold in Ju Zi(orange) heart turns worried, although she was very clear, present Huo Yuhao became will threaten her biggest barrier in the future, but, in her heart actually as before could not bear is worrying about him. If she must lose to a person in the future, she most hopes loses to Huo Yuhao. Loses to oneself deeply are loving man, cannot be regarded disgraced. Perhaps, is a happiness, perhaps to that time, oneself really has extricated.

In mind unceasing appears various thoughts, enough after one double-hour, she turns back to her position place, somewhat exhaustedly sat.

After this time is willing is high-ranking military officers takes punishment for somebody else, she in army the prestige has promoted the unprecedented degree, all military officers feel a heartfelt admiration to her.

Here recuperation naturally to wait for the Xu Tianran decree, but following that the decree issues, besides reprimanding Ju Zi(orange), tells her, to continue to launch the attack, till unifying Continent. The logistics supply will ship continuously. As for Holy Spirit Cult threat that may bring, is a character has not actually raised.

Also does wish make me treat as the tool to help you unify entire Continent? In the Ju Zi(orange) eye full is the chill in the air, Xu Tianran, good Xu Tianran! Your selfish, will ruin all eventually. Your life, most also has three years to four years. At that time, only if I died, otherwise!

Thinks of here, in the Ju Zi(orange) eye the cold brightness twinkle, on the whole person face full is the murderous intention. Luckily, at this time, in commander tent only then she. Nobody saw that the decree in her hand had been rubbed the scrap paper.

“Bang!”Low and deep thundering suddenly resounds, this Ju Zi(orange) that will prepare to rest will be awakening just like the thunderous common bellow. Her subconscious rapid puts on own Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, in big strides walks toward outside.

Goes out, she saw backdrop that has glistened completely. On valley all around summit, four Soul Guidance Array have released the linkage defense guard shield comprehensively, but, was obviously gloomy in the Soul Guidance Protective Cover ray of southeastern direction, that side, many crushed stones drop from the clouds, tumbles to under.

Luckily, is stationed in most surrounding is Soul Engineer, under cleaning up of Soul Guidance Ray, the person who the wound arrives are not many.

High-order Soul Engineer collect nearby commander tent rapidly, all looks toward the upper air that the complexion of everyone ten segregate heavily.

Only then Ju Zi(orange) is calmest, on the face reveals color of the disdaining, “should come, always came. What a pity, she imagines me is stupider, she planned that can shake my defense big hardly?”

“Marshal, cannot be negligent. She after is the empire first powerhouse, careful is on.”

In the upper air, together the form ray twinkle of dark red, behind the form, is huge light shadow, this light shadow reaches as high as hundred meters, presents all over the body is dark red, above the both arms, is surrounding a giant steeple. The steeple peak, red light just stopped.

The southeast corner that side Soul Guidance Array place, the attacked flash, voluntarily released to defend the guard shield. But as before was actually routed, and loses seriously, over one-third Soul Guidance Array places, forever vanishing into thin air. Why this is also this direction linkage defense guard shield effect unsatisfactory reason. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-2





Volume 12

#594 - Mountain Valley Army


Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, is that float in the front form, the back, is her Blood Soul Devil Puppet. But that steeple, was honored as on this world most approaches ten levels of Soul Guidance Device without doubt, Grim Reaper Tower.

Grim Reaper Tower, once made Huo Yuhao barely escape, but this time, its appearance, must face Ju Zi(orange) impressively.

The Ye Xishui sound spreads by far, “empress, hands over all murderers, the old body turns around to depart. You is a marshal. Otherwise, destroys completely, all Soul Engineer, must die.”

The Ju Zi(orange) sound through amplifying Soul Guidance Device spreads, “I do not know that what you were saying, here, did the three services officers who is utterly loyal for the empire, what come the murderer to say? Grim Reaper Douluo, you consecrate as the empire remote antiquity, Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity Cult Master, dares to torment my army, strikes to kill my army Zhongliang. This matter, even if on palace surface Monarch, this Commander does not fear you. You think that depending on the strength of your oneself, can contend with my this Soul Guidance Array? Your too Tianzhen.”

“Snort!”Ye Xishui anger snort|hum, instantaneous acoustic shock four wild. Entire valley as if snort|hum in shivered in her anger, Grim Reaper Tower peak, is one group of red light condenses gradually. Although Ye Xishui does not have Huo Yuhao such Spiritual Detection, but her Spiritual Power is also Huo Yuhao that level, seeks for a form not to be difficult through the sound.

In this time, the overbearing Bai Se (White Color) light beam is lifting off suddenly, that light beam almost arrived in front of Ye Xishui instantaneously.

If carefully looked that will discover, this light beam is the light beam combinations by eight small points condenses, imposing manner extremely Xuan. The place visited, space tearing, has outshone the entire nighttime sky.

At this moment, a low and deep dragon roar sound gets up, a huge jet black form kept off in front of Ye Xishui, that unexpectedly was a black big dragon, it opened the big mouth suddenly, jet black such as the spitting breath blowout of black ink, the black spat the breath and Bai Se (White Color) light beam forms the striking contrast.

The instance that both collide, sees that black to spit in the breath, as if there is innumerable space cracks to appear, although by that Bai Se (White Color) light beam oppression backlash of successively, but that Bai Se (White Color) light beam rapidly was also being weakened.

The commander tent front, the Ju Zi(orange) complexion slightly changes, muttered thought aloud: “Dragon Emperor Douluo, Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao, he really also came.”

Right, is Ye Xishui blocks that to strike from the frontage, is Darkness Sacred Dragon, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao. That black big dragon, without doubt is his Martial Soul avatar.

The terrifying collision from the sky blooms the innumerable halos, completely vanishes until that Bai Se (White Color) light beam.

The first wave of linkage attack, stiffly was blocked by Darkness Sacred Dragon.

Below mobilizes various Commander Soul Engineer Corp who this strikes looks like damn general, they have never thought that by linkage attack that eight Soul Guidance Array send out, can actually be blocked by the Soul Master strength, this has gone beyond their cognition category.

However, the attack then just started, is four light beams, simultaneously shoots toward airborne Ye Xishui, this time, four light beams come from around the summit, four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.

Before the linkage attack beam that these Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp start although cannot compare, that together, but each prestige can have the beforehand that Bai Se (White Color) light beam about 1/2 prestige energies, four leave, world discoloration.

The linkage attack and linkage defense, this is the formidable strength that Soul Engineer relies on.

This is also when why Ju Zi(orange) saw when Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui actually wants the frontal attack one's own side armies on the face will reveal disdaining the color reason.

Limit Douluo, facing such army, the frontage fight is not the most correct choice. Basic on display their individual bellipotent merits.

Naturally, this is also various Surveying Soul Guidance Device effects that because she arranges are good, besides Huo Yuhao that special capability, generally Titled Douluo, even is Limit Douluo, does not have to hide in the face of the survey of that level. Therefore had the present aspect.

The dark red light beam erupts suddenly, goal refers, is Ju Zi(orange) in the position.

Four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp Soul Guidance Array just launched the offensive, hurries to arrange the linkage defense guard shield.

The ability of Ye Xishui capture opportunity truly was too strong, facing the beforehand four attacks, she has not paid attention, but was takes this opportunity to attack Ju Zi(orange).

Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao that huge Black Dragon body from the sky circles, spit the breath to emit, melted that four rays actually. But if carefully looked that will discover, its body surrounding black air current became attenuated obviously.

The blood light is very near, worthily is present age most formidable Assault Soul Guidance Device, four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp collaborate the linkage defense guard shield under cloth to be broken unexpectedly instantaneously, red light drops down, the goal points to Ju Zi(orange).

At this moment, Ju Zi(orange) only thinks the whole body to feel cold, continually even fends possibly does not have. This was approached ten levels of Soul Guidance Device locking the terrifying effects.

However, the second defense line actually instantaneously raised, arranges eight Soul Guidance Array in valley simultaneously to bloom brilliantly, another linkage defense guard shield kept off in the sky, protected firmly Ju Zi(orange).

The blood red light beam and pure white linkage defense guard shield collides in together, bursts out the radiant brilliance, as if some innumerable blood light explode to disperse, but these blood light in light of this have not actually vanished, but changes into blood red Wraith Soul, crazy was gnawing Soul Guidance Protective Cover, sent out gratingly “ka ka”sound.

Reason that Grim Reaper's Light the terror, lies in each time its release, must burn the innumerable souls, thus forms the most formidable resentment, not only its striking power the Soul Power level, meanwhile has the mind level.

Concentrated almost ten Soul Engineer Corp strengths to start the linkage defense guard shield, this forced to resist it, that blood light in gnawing gradually vanished. But in blood light covers the officers within range, had not been clearly injured, but many people thought one as if want the soul exsomatize to be common, intermittent dizziness.

Does the prestige of Grim Reaper Douluo, actually go so far as in this way?

Ju Zi(orange) is also first time faces Ye Xishui, she was very high to the estimate of this Grim Reaper Douluo before, but now she is clear, own judgment has made a mistake.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, not only Limit Douluo, is formidable nine levels of Soul Engineer, her manufacture Soul Guidance Device ability not necessarily strong, but Grim Reaper Tower in hand actually absolutely is now one of the Soul Engineer most peak works. Even is most formidable.

This, is Evil Soul Master of Limit Douluo level! The striking power that her full eruption, can bloom, has surpassed the imagination of all people, she does not defend, cultivates Limit Douluo to pour into to Grim Reaper Tower, the air/Qi of Wraith Soul in addition in Grim Reaper Tower agglomerates, this created has resisted ten Soul Engineer Corp magnificent pictures by strength of the. This is the strength!

But Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao also similarly took to all people shocking, the under attack of Ye Xishui, cannot break through the complete 12 souls to lead the defensive position after all, but, Long Xiaoyao actually relied on strength of the, all blocked for Ye Xishui all attacks of these Soul Guidance Array places. Is this humanity? Can the strength of humanity, actually resist this type to destroy a terrorist attack of city with ease?

Initially, even if Beast God Di Tian, when facing linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, went to enter by Holy Spirit Cult. Can this Dragon Emperor Douluo strength be stronger than Di Tian?

In very far place, in a common thick patch of grass, is lying down two people. They are closing the double pupil, but both hands actually grasp is very tight.

“Yuhao, you said that this is a good opportunity? If we......”Tang Wutong said in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “They will not give us this opportunity.”

When Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao and Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui just arrived, they have discovered. Then Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to lie down here, observes the battlefield, not only uses the eye, with Spiritual Detection, similarly.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection had already covered the entire battlefield, by the upper air angle of view bird's eye view, is observing the change in battlefield.

His only feeling, is aggressive, was too aggressive.

Worthily is Limit Douluo!

Huo Yuhao also probably judge, because condensed second Soul Nucleus ahead of time, moreover in the Yin-Yang Supplement way, oneself and Tang Wutong the battle efficiency, should also and Limit Douluo is almost the same. However, when his genuine scissors Limit Douluo level powerhouse fights, the feeling is different.

What is Limit Douluo? Reaches the human body limit, is existence of this world most peak, not only this existence is formidable, is prouder.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui when just came, never had planned attacks with other ways, is that direct appearance sky over valley, she does not even have to destroy these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, started own Grim Reaper Tower, has launched the attack to valley, this is the what kind aggressive side leaks!

How at least Huo Yuhao when calculates aims in this valley to arrange, absolutely does not have such idea. This is impossible to break through!

But Ye Xishui is relying on the formidable strength, stiffly a Soul Guidance Array scrap an corner/horn, even also nearly threatens the Ju Zi(orange) life.

Huo Yuhao even can affirm, when Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao and Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui in the same place, their complete forces can also complement one another.

Although is not Martial Soul Fusion, but they in same place, even if Beast God Di Tian is also not necessarily able how them.

To cultivating of Limit Douluo that level is, did not have the means to carry on Martial Soul Fusion again, because Martial Soul Fusion will surpass this world to Absolute that the strength requested. That is belongs to the domain of god, the domain of god, humanity is unable to touch. Also is very clear like Huo Yuhao, in the future will become with Tang Wutong Limit Douluo, their Martial Soul Fusion techniques will be are not certainly able to use will again be the same.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-3





Volume 12

#595 - The Double Limit Fights Luo'S Great Strength


But this Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo coordination, Dragon Emperor Douluo total defense, Grim Reaper Douluo general attack. Facing several Soul Guidance Array places, not only does not draw back, instead the opposite party of suppression cannot move. This is the strength!

Naturally, Huo Yuhao naturally could also see, although two Limit Douluo are formidable, but their offensive also stopped. Their after all humanity, although strength that formidable, but faces is almost now on world the strongest Soul Guidance Device union, in a short time can resist is incomparably astonishing, wants to defeat truly is completely is impossible.

Really, black big dragon quietly appears under the Ye Xishui body, the load bearing lives in her body, next one flickers, led her to soar, breaks the space unexpectedly, vanished in the boundless nighttime sky, command second round linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device fell on the vacancy completely.

Strikes draws back, but actually does not run away, but left splendidly, simply does not have the strength to be able to retain them.

Ju Zi(orange) stands in the commander tent front, she clearly felt a moment ago that she was away from the death to be very near and be very near.

Quick, the battle loss transmits, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp has 67 Soul Engineer, forever passed away. Summit Soul Guidance Device damages seriously, this Soul Guidance Array can only use less than 50% strengths.

Two people, merely are the surprise attacks of two people, made the Sun-Moon Empire army, this originally can able to move unhindered Continent, even was unifies Continent formidable legion to be so damaged, was in own firepower full situation, at this time what kind sorrowful! But this is the strength, humanity achieves the limit later strength.

Ju Zi(orange) suddenly felt that somewhat feared, this is her first time has such feeling, she really understands at this time, after cultivating of humanity to achieve Absolute, stands existence as in this world peak. Such two Limit Douluo, if reckless adopting sneak attack and other tactics, oneself this army can resist?

Even if Titled Douluo has the unspoken rule, cannot injure the average person, but after they own state-of-art strength destroys completely, oneself why fighting entire Continent, no wonder some people have also said that Limit Douluo is on this world the most formidable strategic weapons, truly is so! Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely and they compare, differs was too far, is too far. In own hand, lacks this Absolute strength eventually!

Ju Zi(orange) returned to commander tent silently, issues the order, patches the Soul Guidance Array place, simultaneously momentarily admonishes. The linkage defense guard shield is at the half-open position, once there is an enemy to appear, immediately does not hesitate all -out attack of price.

Retaliated, then must look how to process is good.

Today the attack of Grim Reaper Douluo, without doubt is exploratory, then, then? What situation is the next attack? Ju Zi(orange) does not know that her first time feels, the destiny did not receive itself to control.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have lain down in thick patch of grass, finished until the fight completely. When Darkness Sacred Dragon brings Grim Reaper Douluo to be hidden in the space quietly, they have simultaneously opened eyes, each other looks at each other one, saw to the grid in amazement.

“If we, which step can achieve?”Some Tang Wutong doubts asked to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao is smiling bitterly, said: “Can resist an attack. Must in the Goddess of Light condition. Can be able to achieve.”

Tang Wutong nod of gently, with similar that she calculates, they only then in the Goddess of Light condition, may resist an all-out attack of beforehand linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device.

But just Darkness Sacred Dragon, successively has actually resisted five attacks, first strikes strongly, the other four attacks are weak. But Huo Yuhao said that resists to attack together, refers to is also first.

Good Darkness Sacred Dragon!

Huo Yuhao said in a low voice: “Has not thought that the strength of Long Xiaoyao senior so is unexpectedly formidable, if I have not judged wrong, his cultivating is, definitely also above Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui.”Since listened to Teacher to narrate Long Xiaoyao in secret has been helping his matter actually, to this Darkness Sacred Dragon, Huo Yuhao again did not have any resentment to read.

“Such praised me, your did Teacher know?”The low and deep sound suddenly resounds.

Huo Yuhao almost subconscious grips the palm of tight Tang Wutong, they simultaneously Teleportation, the person beyond hundred meters, the powerful Soul Power fluctuation is also instantaneously ascends from them, has achieved the Absolute condition. On two faces reveals color with amazement.

Must know, they before continuously under the condition protection of Imitation Soul Ability!

The black form together is quietly from space, looks like emerges out of thin air, in addition the scarlet form is following closely together.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui seemed younger, was only the face whiten fearfulness, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao aura some are not steady, but a eyes pupil did not have the least bit pale yellow, instead radiant was similar to the space stars is ordinary.

Looks at a Huo Yuhao face vigilant appearance, Long Xiaoyao cannot help laughing, “young fellow, is the progress is very big, no wonder Zongli Wu that boy suffered a loss in your hand. Has not thought that knows how we do discover your?”

Huo Yuhao shaking the head of silently, bows to salute saying: “Younger generation Huo Yuhao has seen under Dragon Huangmian, the god of death crown.”

Long Xiaoyao looks like to his saluting has not seen, selfish saying: “Reason that discovers you, is not because your Spiritual Power insufficient hiding, the polarity, your Spiritual Power looked like already the accomplishment, even if were we, did not have the means to discover your existences through Spiritual Power. Reason that can discover you, is sensation. Our sensations, are you have not been able to imagine at present. Only then truly becomes Limit Douluo, you will have to integrate the feeling of entire world, to that time, you are this world part, in this world presented anything to threaten your ability, even if did not have any discovery, can trace the source through the sensation. Therefore, we had found you.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat awkward smiling, said: “Two seniors were really too the military might were a moment ago aggressive. The younger generation gasps in admiration greatly, can only be two seniors waves the flag and shouts in the distant place, and harmless. If all right, we may first walk.”Saying, Huo Yuhao was drawing Tang Wutong to turn around to walk.

“Halts!”The Ye Xishui somewhat hoarse sound resounds suddenly, immediately, in the air just likes myriad Wraith Soul is weeping bitterly the general, huge oppression strength drops from the clouds, covers comprehensively to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

In the Huo Yuhao eye the ray dodges, in an instant, his double pupil has simultaneously shone, the eyeground deep place, seems the endless nighttime sky, the stellar scintillation. The Absolute ice-cold aura ascends from him instantaneously, just liked the flood dragon goes to sea general, collision maliciously has approached the Ye Xishui imposing manner.

Silent thundering from the sky reverberates, the collision of imposing manner their this levels were instead more dangerous, even also wants the dangerous compared with the actual fight many.

If traded has cultivated for the low person here, facing the Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui formidable imposing manner, if unable to contend, will be ground into dust directly.

The upper body of Huo Yuhao rocked slightly, the under foot retroceded half step. Ye Xishui is also the upper body slightly rocks, but has not actually retroceded. But in she originally cloudy and cold double pupil, the same fashion has revealed the color of shock.

She has not thought that cultivating of front young people are, arrived to resist her pressure unexpectedly the region. This is the first time, besides Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao, can be few with the powerhouse who she contends with on this world, these must add on several Soul Beast King.

In recent years, only command Ye Xishui suffers a loss, Beast God Di Tian strength that initially met. But that time, her also as before whole body draws back, Huo Yuhao actually received heavy wound.

At this time, faces Huo Yuhao once more, she can feel clearly Huo Yuhao is absolutely not with the aid of the Beast God Di Tian strength, can he actually and I contends by his strength? This is not 98 levels of Titled Douluo can achieve. This time he, in the pure strength, looked like had just achieved Soul Master of Limit Douluo level!

Is this possible? He how old? Did he condense second Soul Nucleus? What Zongli Wu said is real?

Feels being startled of Ye Xishui, Dragon Emperor Douluo is sighing one lightly, lifts the hand to hold down the shoulder of Ye Xishui, “Xishui, leaves this. You will frighten these children.”

Ye Xishui coldly looked at his one eyes, “my matter your disciplinary training of juvenile delinquents. It seems like that what little black said is right, this boy comprehended the second Soul Nucleus deep meaning. Now is depending upon their Martial Soul Fusion, will cultivate to upgrade close Limit Douluo level forcefully, I must have a look but actually, can he be able to resist my Grim Reaper Tower.”

At the same time was saying, behind Ye Xishui, blood red ray Sheng, huge Blood Soul Devil Puppet reappeared greatly, that just appeared the invincible might Grim Reaper Tower to appear above valley once again, but this time, is actually Huo Yuhao that faces.

The Huo Yuhao complexion big change, initially, he with own eyes has witnessed the Grim Reaper Tower terrifying prestige energy, at this time, one-to-one facing Grim Reaper Douluo, must say in his heart not to be anxious, that is absolutely impossible.

“Xishui!”The Long Xiaoyao sound became low and deep several points.

Ye Xishui coldly visits him, “do you want to help him?”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “Your temperament! These many years, is a change do not have. By us the incomplete condition, wants to kill them at present, is very difficult. Such being the case, might as well chat with these young people, you had used twice the Grim Reaper Tower strength a moment ago successively. Uses again, the vicious tendencies will make you lose once more. You want to turn into that good-for-nothing, only knows the condition of slaughtering?”

Ye Xishui exclaimed lowly: “I said that my matter does not need you to manage, regardless of I turn into any appearance, has nothing to do with you. Long Xiaoyao, you little here spoke the wind discouraging talk. This boy has threatened existence of my Holy Spirit Cult, if were not his heavy wound Little Wu, and struck to kill my book title to consecrate, will go well by that lowly person? Do you know how many years our Holy Spirit Cult did save these strengths to use? Now, Xu Tianran that young bastard actually wants to ruin us while this opportunity, I must make him have a look, anything is the true strength.”

Long Xiaoyao somewhat helpless shaking the head, said: “Good, do not make again. If you in this, I forever left.”

At the same time was saying, he coughs suddenly, although the cough sound is not big, but stands in his Ye Xishui is actually the complexion big change, the beforehand vicious tendencies vanished immediately. Hurries gently is patting the back for him.

“Xiaoyao and Xiaoyao should not be anxious. Are you what kind of? Quickly along comfortable, are you all right?”Ye Xishui kind saying.

Long Xiaoyao sighed one lightly, complexion slightly grayish white several points, “was old, vitality after all no longer exuberant. If there is traded my peak time. That several attacks resisted a moment ago, although will consume is not small, but was also insufficient injured.”

“Were you injured?”Ye Xishui is startled.

Huo Yuhao cannot bear say: “What the Xiaoyao senior faces is Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, the great strength of that striking power, can resist with the manpower, in my opinion is inconceivable. Let alone Senior Long also has resisted that many times.”

The Ye Xishui look as if became gentle, mind obvious some of this woman were not quite normal.

“Good, Xiaoyao, do not worry, I listen your, my anything listens your, I do not injure these two kids and that's the end.”At the same time was saying, her behind Blood Soul Devil Puppet was received. The swift and fierce imposing manner also vanished.

Long Xiaoyao looks to Huo Yuhao, his double pupil is as before bright, not because of the decline of own aura, but affected, his vision brilliant looks steadily at Huo Yuhao to ask: “Did you practice second Soul Nucleus?”

Huo Yuhao nod of silently.

Long Xiaoyao takes a deep breath, said: “As far as I know, you should be the recent for several thousand years, only before has not attacked Limit Douluo, cultivated second Soul Nucleus Soul Master. Moreover, you so are young. On you, I saw the hope.”

Huo Yuhao actually shook the head, said: “No, the younger generation is not only one. Wutong has also succeeded.”He has not concealed, has not deceived Long Xiaoyao.

Can find them like Long Xiaoyao through the sensation, why does not know, from this Dragon Emperor Douluo, Huo Yuhao felt a special feeling, this feeling made him have the trust to him.

“Her also achievement?”Long Xiaoyao somewhat surprised looks at Tang Wutong.

“Yes! I should think that such as her achievement second Soul Nucleus, you likely didn't continue are maintaining Martial Soul Fusion? Very good, you are very good. Worthily is the Mu En disciple.”The smile of Long Xiaoyao is very genial, temperately, one type such as washes the feeling of spring breeze to the person, but the feeling of Huo Yuhao slightly somewhat is unusual, like initially saw that the Old Mu life moves toward the end the time.

In heart one startled, this Dragon Emperor Douluo also......

4000 character big chapters, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Since the middle of the month, did everybody has the second monthly ticket? Throws to our Tang Sect! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-595





Volume 12

#596 - Blends To Practice


Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

His distinct vitality is powerful, why before can this time appearance look like Teacher to pass away the appearance? Why is this?

Some Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui also delay looks at Long Xiaoyao, “Xiaoyao, are you all right? Is your injury important?”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “This small wound is not anything. I am all right. Yuhao, you here, can cope with the Sun-Moon Empire army?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, this does not have anything to be good to conceal.

Long Xiaoyao gives a calm smile, turns head to look to Ye Xishui, “Xishui, if you must injure at present these two children, I cannot help you. I have a deficit Mu En to be too many, looks like I have a deficit you to be the same. Therefore, I cannot injure his disciple.”

Hears Mu En this name, the Ye Xishui whole body shakes, in the cloudy and cold look revealed the extremely complex mood.

Her eyes narrows the eyes, looks to Huo Yuhao, “this is the second time. The matter three, next time sees you again, takes your life inevitably. Xiaoyao, we walk.”Saying, her was jumping, escapes to go toward the distant place upper air.

Long Xiaoyao does not have first to follow Ye Xishui to depart, but is the vision temperate looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

“You have created the beginning of humanity, but, was sure to remember that cannot be proud, the road that you must take also has is very long. Although you had certain self-preservation ability now, but on this world, the ruinous strength has many types, these strengths will be you in the future must face. Therefore, has the time many diligently to practice. Yuhao, after you cultivate to reach 98 levels, coming Bright Capital City to look for the old man. I have thing that your Teacher leaves behind to give you.”

At the same time was saying, Long Xiaoyao stands up, fishes out a black crystal stone to hand in the Huo Yuhao hand from the bosom.

“You, so long as is in Bright Capital City, stimulates this crystal stone with Soul Power, I will find the position that you are at to come with you to meet. I walked. Xishui this coming, but to give vent to indignation. By her status, will not continue to attack the Sun-Moon Empire army, after all, Holy Spirit Cult foundation also in Sun-Moon Empire. Will she then do. The old men do not know. You must add carefully, since she said next time when will meet must cope with you, will not take back. Moreover Sun-Moon Empire and Holy Spirit Cult, have set firm resolve to you, except that particularly Yuhao. Your existence, has made the Shrek Academy brilliance extremely powerful. Therefore, no matter, you are discrete and careful.”

“Yes, thanks the senior to care.”Huo Yuhao respectful bows to salute to Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao beckoned with the hand, in temperate look revealed several points of filled with grief meaning suddenly. Heaved a deep sigh, the floating body, pursued in the direction that Ye Xishui departed, vanished in a flash does not see.

Looks the back that he leaves, Tang Wutong spits the tongue. Said: “These Limit Douluo, are really formidable! Compared with them, we have not the small disparity. What Senior Long reminder is, since we become Transcendent Douluo, somewhat inflated, has the time, must practice the practice. Come. Now starts.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “So beautiful scenery on a beautiful day, you actually must practice, a little spoiled the fun?”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles, said: “Initially just entered Academy time, is who goes all out to train hard, isn't one second willing to waste?. Now do you want to idle? But the responsibility of our shoulder are important, later I shoulder half for you, what surplus is wants you. Comes quickly!”

“Come!”A Huo Yuhao tiger throws, threw toward Tang Wutong.

The Purple gold colored light glow dodges suddenly, gigantic Dragon Head has gone against him. Huo Yuhao called out pitifully. Falls to depart beyond more than ten meters.

“Do you and you do?”Lies down on the ground, pain of being sprawled is appealing to Tang Wutong.

On the Tang Wutong Li's elegant face reveals a cunning meaning certainly, “father's seal has not relieved probably cleanly. Therefore......”

After a half minute, in the shrubbery, two people sit cross-legged to sit, four palms relative, enters the practice condition.

This is they in becoming Transcendent Douluo, after Tang Wutong achievement Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, their first practice.

Hao Dong Power completed, enabling them to carry on to practice through the Martial Soul Fusion way. Back then, relied on this method, can make them surpass Tongji University.

Their Soul Power exchange and exchanges the feeling in the fight in the practice is completely different, Huo Yuhao whirlpool Soul Power, pours into from the right hand to the left hand of Tang Wutong, but Tang Wutong whirlpool Soul Power pours into the Huo Yuhao right hand from the left hand.

After their each other whirlpool Soul Power enter the opposite party within the body, their bodies simultaneously shake, on them all sent out the intense ray.

gold sun blue moon and gold sun purple moon almost also appears.

Place above gold sun in two head go against approaches slowly, then unexpectedly fused in one, the formidable mind air/Qi shot up to the sky, the light of that powerful gold sun broke the nighttime sky together, looked like has haunched day radiant [gold/metal] Zhu, blue moon and purple moon also similarly were the ray greatly put, the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong started becomes insightful.

Even can see, in their insightful bodies, four Soul Nucleus is revolving rapidly. Whirlpool Soul Power unceasing circulation and circulation that has.

blue moon and purple moon drift about to their body center slowly, gold sun keep aloof.

Two rounds bright moonlight fused unexpectedly in one, the moonlight changed into the royal purple, the ray sparkle.

In air, heaven and earth elemental energy just like all rivers run into sea generally crazy comes toward their body to rush forth, after flooding into within the body, immediately by these whirlpool Soul Power smashing, filtration and fusion.

A sidereal revolution gets down, Huo Yuhao and whirlpool Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body completely changed the appearance. That is brand-new Soul Power. Soul Power itself presents for strange color, in that whirlpool, simultaneously is glittering blue and purple and golden three lusters, three colors glitter and fuse again alternately, produced the strange imaginary color results. But these whirlpool Soul Power after fusion, compared with it formerly, enough formidable several fold.

Each whirlpool has the huge attraction, is attracting joining of heaven and earth elemental energy.

“Travels?”Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have almost opened simultaneously eyes, the next quarter, two manpower shake hand, is hidden in the nighttime sky rapidly.

Does not run good! Here is so near from the Sun-Moon Empire army, who can think, but cultivates, actually will make such big move. What doesn't travel also waits for? At least must look for a cave, can make a fresh start to practice.

Hao Dong Power is uniting as before, but Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong felt what is somewhat strange, they are fusing Soul Power restored the beforehand appearance, whirlpool Soul Power is very as before strong, is the effect after amplification, but actually vanishes to disappear in the imaginary color that in the practice presents. That suction to air also along with it disappearance.

“What's the matter?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao. Their regard is interlinked, the Huo Yuhao nature said that she is asking anything.

“I do not know.”When Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless saying, “our Martial Soul Fusion practice that has Soul Power that produces, gone beyond the limit of this world?”

Tang Wutong shook the head, said: “Cannot. If before, perhaps I also think. After may experience Darkness Sacred Dragon and strength of Dragon Emperor Douluo senior, a moment ago. Can judge our strength is insufficient, Soul Power of that fusion, most also just entered the Limit Douluo boundary, must say that this strength can receive the suppression of world rule, I do not believe.”

Huo Yuhao said: “I not too clear am any situation, the explanation that can think of is only, we are completely peaceful, Martial Soul Fusion will be the perfect degree, presents that imaginary color whirlpool Soul Power. But that imaginary color whirlpool Soul Power cannot be used to fight by us. Only way that but is used to restore. We try, even if cannot fight, can promote the reply speed to be also good!”

Two people fly distant, looked for a mountain of forest cover to worm one's way into, the Tang Wutong aggressive side leaked rumbled directly a cave, they wormed one's way into.

The new discovery makes them very excited, just faced the pressure that two Limit Douluo have created, has formed certain shadow in their hearts eventually. Appeared regarding the hope of strength once again, but this time, is especially intense.

Cave cave entrance was covered with some branches by Huo Yuhao, in order to avoid inside ray leak, opens cutting with Dark Gold Terror Claw again directly, the free time of a while, a small cave mansion took shape.

Huo Yuhao shakes the hand of Tang Wutong to stand in the cavern, “can we try calmly, have a look to stand like this enter that condition.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong nodded.

Four palm readings grasp, within the body Soul Power circulation, calm revolution Soul Power.

gold sun blue moon and gold sun purple moon really once again appeared. Is that imaginary color whirlpool.

What with previous time is different, fast of this fusion . Moreover, after the fusion, is centered on the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, one dazzles the color halo to appear around their bodies, ascends to revolve regarding them. They can feel that own Soul Power restores at the astonishing speed, when restores to the peak, started to promote slowly.

This type slow naturally relative, to Transcendent Douluo this level, wanted to promote the strength through the practice, is extremely difficult. But they can actually seem like slow upward climbing up, this means that their strengths can definitely practice in this state . Moreover the practice speed must go far beyond general Transcendent Douluo.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-1





Volume 12

#596 - Blends In The Practice


Four items of relative, they saw the stimulated color in opposite party look, they know, had found road of the promotion. Although the imaginary color whirlpool cannot use in the battlefield directly, but, regarding fights continually has the enormous advantage, so long as has the time of recuperation slightly, they can resume the beforehand consumption at the maximum speed. Displays Absolute the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus superiority.

They entered practice condition quickly, immerses fuses in four Soul Nucleus mutually, each other blends, each other repels again, collides in the brand-new Soul Power pleasant sensation. Their cultivating are, at an exceptional pace is promoting.

Achievement Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, made them have the potential of high-speed promotion, in addition afterward Tang Wutong also achievement with the help of Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, this is unprecedented.

Moreover, in Tang Wutong mind Soul Nucleus, most Spiritual Power came from the support of Huo Yuhao, afterward gradually was absorbed and transformed by her, became own Spiritual Power. May this, Spiritual Power compatible of her Spiritual Power to Huo Yuhao be able be imagined. Then makes their Martial Soul Fusion not have any issue again, finally has produced Hao Dong Power once more.

Naturally, present Hao Dong Power has compared was formidable before were too many and are too many.

Do not look before, they received the threat of Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, in fact, Huo Yuhao has not feared Ye Xishui, what he fears, Long Xiaoyao reckless help Ye Xishui.

Since contacting Long Xiaoyao, he is very curious to this Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo. The strength of this senior is without a doubt, with Teacher is the powerhouse of same time, even can be said as present age the first powerhouse of humanity is not overrated.

But, why is he actually willing is Ye Xishui uses? In the past since he can share the honor with Teacher, that means that he will not be bad in the moral character. The feeling of contacting is also so.

Let alone Teacher also said that he is will be helping in secret his. But sees him and Ye Xishui each time in the same place, Huo Yuhao can discover that the help of this Dragon Emperor Douluo to Grim Reaper Douluo is absolutely selfless, does not become a mere formality absolutely.

Why is this?. Had he gotten down the ban by Ye Xishui? Is impossible! Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao in the past and Dragon God Douluo Mu En became famous, Ye Xishui was also far from becomes formidable. Does she want to control Long Xiaoyao to be easier said than done? If Limit Douluo can be banned by race, that was too laughable.

But if, has not gotten down the ban. Why does he want to listen to Ye Xishui? This question paces back and forth in the Huo Yuhao heart throughout.

Therefore, he does not dare to bet. Grim Reaper Douluo, he and Tang Wutong collaborates extremely, will not suffer a loss, hits can travel. However, if adds on Darkness Sacred Dragon again, that is different. Opportunity that they likely continually run does not have.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao specially has been careful before, even does not have to take immediately own Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, to at crucial moments break through to use.

Luckily. Long Xiaoyao has not helped a tyrant do evil, Ye Xishui even looked that has not attacked them in the Long Xiaoyao face, departed. This also lets Huo Yuhao big relaxing, finished finally.

However, again appears with this suppression regarding the hope of strength. A beforehand faint trace was complacently nothing left. To resist with these Limit Douluo. Only has itself becomes Limit Douluo is truly good. The urging of Long Xiaoyao without doubt is precious words.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong this practice enters the condition to be express.

Their Soul Power now is about 95 levels, just entered the Transcendent Douluo level. But this is not anything, radically is not the issue. At their present practice speeds. Huo Yuhao has confidence completely in three months on promotion first-level Soul Power. Most two years, they can promote to 98 levels of levels. This is the great benefit that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus brings.

Long Xiaoyao makes us reach 98 levels to cultivate for the time looks for him, does not know that what matter, Teacher will have what thing to make him give us?

In the Huo Yuhao heart is actually very curious, because beforehand Mu En, when helps him break through Dual Soul Nucleus. Has not mentioned this matter, therefore in his heart many are a little disturbed.

If makes Old Xuan know that Dragon Emperor Douluo, he certainly immediately tells then Huo Yuhao, what Dragon Emperor Douluo said is the lie. The reason is very simple, because. Old Mu died truly, the soul dissipated, if there is any thing to leave Huo Yuhao, at least before the point of death will tell him.

What a pity, Huo Yuhao does not know all these. In his heart is also thinking, after break through, must seek for Dragon Emperor Douluo to find out by secret inquiry an outcome.

Time one minute one second passed, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong Soul Power influencing subtly has been promoting. The practice does not affect the sensation of Huo Yuhao to outside, the formidable Spiritual Power formation Spiritual Power field naturally, outside distant sending out, will connect Sun-Moon Empire and that valley road which must be taken covers.

Sun-Moon Empire army, commander tent.

Two days.

Of that day sneak attacks suddenly from Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui now, passed for two days, that Grim Reaper Douluo has not appeared again. But is appears merely one time, she has left behind the thick haze to all officers hearts.

Too formidable, by the strengths of two people, has resisted the attack of entire Sun-Moon Empire army complete linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly, even nearly breaks through linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device, this is the what kind strength! Two Limit Douluo put together, unexpectedly is such terror, has exceeded the imagination of all people completely.

The officers quantity of dying in battle did not calculate too, the pressure that but, formed was huge. Under this pressure, all high level Soul Engineer already entire two days not smiling face.

Now they really understand that Holy Spirit Cult formidable to any degree, by the high-end strength, they as before is the empire!

The attacked news also escorted to Bright Capital City, but is actually similar to likes a stone dropped into the sea, through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device passes on without any news. As if, Xu Tianran gave up them resembling.

“Can give us a lesson?”Thinking aloud that Ju Zi(orange) muttered.

Two days of time, has made her think through a lot sufficiently.

If that Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, or dies continuous, she certainly will not use that way. Even if attaches importance to face, only wants from the frontal attack. She only needs every day while defense weak time Grim Reaper's Light, the army will continue to suffer loss, moreover continually will have the panic. To pursue them nearly not to be also impossible.

But she has not actually done, this means that she has not given up Holy Spirit Cult in the base industry of empire. Temporarily will not have a bigger movement to be right. Does not know that then this Holy Spirit Cult must make anything.

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart, somewhat is throughout restless, she is even willing to face wild Ye Xishui, is not willing to face unknown.

In any event, must ruin Holy Spirit Cult, otherwise, the empire can not be peaceful in the future.

Remembers the strength that beforehand that two Limit Douluo show, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart the raising intermittent chill in the air. In the future, this country is the son, how under the nest to allow other people to snore to rest? Has the threats of these two Limit Douluo to exist, the empire rule will be greatly affected. The son, you could rest assured that regardless of being difficult, the mothers certainly will eradicate these barriers for you.

Thinks that own son, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart fighting intent on flaming burns, beforehand timid completely vanishes does not see. Regarding mother, so long as to protect own child, even if facing the formidable enemy, she will not dread.

“Report”a rapid shout resounds.

Ju Zi(orange) has stabilized the mind, “said.”

“The Empire Subsidiary troops' bitter experience attack outside valley, are annihilated. When we support arrives, stays behind, only then a place corpse, all commodities also completely vanish.”

“What?”Ju Zi(orange) has a big shock, in the look reveals color with amazement, “what has to discover specifically?”

That scout gained ground, after hesitating one next, said: “Has the Undead Creature trail, our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device indistinct discovery, some are similar to the Bone Dragon general biology flies toward the distant place, but the local area has also left behind the massive Undead Creature aura. Thousand Soul Engineer that this time comes to reenforce, all......”

That is 1000 Soul Engineer! Even if reserve duty Soul Engineer, that also trains after the empire. Has the support of these 1000 Soul Engineer, the loss of her front can supplement prepared. But such silently vanished, how Ju Zi(orange) can not get angry.

However, while angry, in her heart some surprise, because in her opinion, the attack of Ye Xishui had also finished, the deterrent was also enough, why can also attack? Undead Creature, the Holy Spirit Cult possibility is biggest. Only if......

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart moves slightly, she has remembered that mysterious space suddenly.

Was Yuhao, you comes?

Thinks that Huo Yuhao may very much in the, the heart of Ju Zi(orange) somewhat is scalding hot, formerly anger also vanished into thin air.

If Yuhao does, then, all explanation was clear. However, who does, this trough sewage, must sprinkle on Holy Spirit Cult. Was worrying that could not find the opportunity to cope with them. Their this delivered.

“Passes on my military order, calls all assistant regimental commanders Soul Engineer Corp above military order commander tent discussing official business.”

“Yes!”

Ju Zi(orange) eyes narrows the eyes, in the heart mused, since presented such turning point, that do not blame me being cruel and merciless. If this opportunity does not use well, do not match is War-God Empress. Holy Spirit Cult, ahem, you wait to face the Xu Tianran anger.

At the same time is thinking, after she turns back her graceful case rapidly, writes with vigor.

The free time of a while, various Soul Engineer Corp assistant regimental commanders on gathered in commander tent, coming together also has nine levels of Soul Engineer to consecrate.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-2





Volume 12

#596 - Blends Under The Practice


Saw that Ju Zi(orange) writes the thing there, they stand below peacefully, anybody has not clamored.

Ju Zi(orange) takes the position of marshal to take punishment for somebody else as everybody, Grim Reaper Douluo comes, must attack her, all these, made these military officers be full of the respect to this War-God Empress. Isn't such commander what military officer willing to follow? Even if her young, is the female, is, nearly in being ever-victorious commander, takes on, absolutely is the best object who follows.

Waited for about ten minutes, the letter paper in Ju Zi(orange) hand finished, when she gained ground once more, the double pupil is red, seems suppressing, does not make own tears flow.

“Marshal, what happened? You how?”Nine levels of Soul Engineer somewhat surprised asking.

Other Soul Engineer military officers are also perplexed, Ju Zi(orange) of this condition they are also first time saw that does not understand completely what happened, their this firm did War-God Empress, when become such frail? Actually is what matter, making her actually go so far as in this way?

Ju Zi(orange) has not spoken, but has broken by biting own index finger, according to above letter paper that in oneself that a bloodstain makes an effort had just finished.

Sees this, the numerous military officers had a big shock. Letter written in blood? Marshal this is must do.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up slowly, from leading case walked, her body in slightly is shivering, flowing that in eye pupil, tears not been able to control under.

“General and consecration. I am unfair to everybody.”Tears brook however under. Ju Zi(orange) pain has closed eyes.

Before that start to talk nine levels of Soul Engineer anxious [say / way]: “Marshal, actually what happened? Anything, we will stand certainly you. You told us quickly.”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, said with the incomparably sorrowful sound: “Just obtained the news, the empire sends to reenforce our Soul Engineer legion, has been annihilated, not far away outside valley, the empire goes to valley here road which must be taken. Over a thousand Soul Engineer die, the soul not saves. All resources were despoiled.”The soul not saves these four characters, is she adds.

“What?”The screams resound through entire commander tent, suddenly, numerous Soul Engineer military officers unconscious staring in a big way eye. Shock in look slowly toward extremely angry direction transformation.

Closing eyes of Ju Zi(orange) pain, “passes through our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device to confirm that once saw has Bone Dragon to appear and disappear, moreover quantity incessantly. Simultaneously also many Undead Creature aura preserve.”

Bone Dragon? Was these two characters was enough.

Soon before, outside Shrek City, Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu, isn't riding Bone Dragon and Huo Yuhao fights one? Finally Bone Dragon also perished in the Huo Yuhao hand.

This Bone Dragon appeared, means any self-evident.

“Bastard!”A Commander Soul Engineer Corp roars, nearly crumb double fist. His Soul Engineer Corp loses is not small, is waiting for the supplement of this soldier.

Suddenly. The public sentiment is roused to action.

Ju Zi(orange) bitter and astringent [say / way]: “This matter, I whole story complete writing down, have submitted immediately to your majesty. Invited your majesty emperor's decision. This way, the morale of troops will certainly greatly be damaged, our front officers. Kills the enemy for the country, may threaten actually came from the back. How this makes us be able for empire to open up territory to develop the earth, performs the non- world meritorious service? Perhaps my this marshal must come to the end, this time, I have turned in resignation to your majesty. In the future, but also asked general to continue to assist your majesty. Shares sorrow for your majesty.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand, has picked the hard helmet of top of the head, before turning around to arrive at commander tent, places above the graceful case.

“Marshal, you cannot give up us!”Assistant regimental commander sad Hu. Immediately on one knee knees down.

“Yes! Marshal, we need your leadership, only then you can lead us to unify Continent.”Had one, has second, atmosphere that in addition at this time shares a common hatred. Suddenly, in the entire big account, the generals have knelt place, these Soul Engineer consecrated also to bend the noble waist, saluted to Ju Zi(orange).

The appearance that looks at the people, Ju Zi(orange) cancels on the face the tears, in the double pupil, the look becomes the woods is gradually cold.

“Thanks general's support, everybody please get up.”

One hear of Ju Zi(orange) sound as if restored normally, these generals stood up, vision all centralized on her.

In the eye pupil of Ju Zi(orange) ice-cold is revealing the intense murderous intention, “Holy Spirit Cult, dares to kill my officers, this Commander and you are absolutely irreconcilable. General, we want to perform the non- world meritorious service, must want the clear royal entourage first, writes off from the empire this mean and shameless and evil vicious Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly. Only has so, can return me ringing the cloudless day. This letter, which general is willing to pass on the letter written in blood with me together to your majesty?”

“I want!”

“I want......”

Generals vitality is always exuberant, on that day came under the attack of Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, originally in many person hearts to Holy Spirit Cult the anger and discontented, frightened was substituted.

But today one hear, over a thousand Soul Engineer had been killed by Holy Spirit Cult, suddenly, in the heart the depressing anger and blood energy erupted immediately.

Blood fingerprint in the breaking by biting hand fingerprint kept in the letter, simultaneously stays behind, their genuine signature. A letter written in blood was truly completes.

Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound track: “Passes on my Shuai Ling, army opens, goes forward to the empire direction, we coordinate your majesty, exterminates Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly. Only then Holy Spirit Cult destroys completely, we have to continue for the empire to open up territory to develop the earth ability.”

“Yes! Venerable the marshal military order sincerely.”

When these military officers and Ju Zi(orange) press the hemorrhaging hand imprint together that moment, their destinies tied up with this War-God Empress in one.

The Sun-Moon Empire army starts to draw in various types of Soul Guidance Array places, from the sky is admonished by Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp one after another, the army sets out, directly soars the Sun-Moon Empire direction to go.

The Ju Zi(orange) correspondence immediately has also delivered, in the meantime, the news sends out, not to Xu Tianran, but gives to remain in Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City Worship Hall. They are military true backing.

Looks the Sun-Moon Empire army is winding windingly in the Sun-Moon Empire direction marches forward, stands Huo Yuhao in distant place upper air understands that Ju Zi(orange) should be very good to use this matter.

Now almost can see her. Wipes the light smile, along with it reappearing on the Huo Yuhao face. This good opportunity, he always not to let off.

Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong, the personal appearance in airborne to be hidden quietly, Spiritual Detection starts, in the front explores the way, they were rapid approached in the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army.

In the sky, various upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device are almost following army forward running, at least two Soul Engineer Corp flights circle in the sky, are responsible for investigating and guard.

Only then Beast King Level above Soul Engineer Corp is the whole staff has the flying ability, therefore, is responsible for going on patrol naturally is also they.

These Soul Engineer Corp naturally cannot stump Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong., Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection had found the Ju Zi(orange) imperial carriage by far.

Ju Zi(orange) goes out to battle, although is the series armed forces marshal, but similarly is also the empire empress, therefore, rides the mount to be different from the common marshal military officer, she has oneself imperial carriage to ride. Is entraining the imperial carriage, is 16 big tall horses. Be responsible for guarding the imperial carriage, is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp.

Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong dexterous falling above the imperial carriage. Tang Wutong actually quietly loosened his hand, “you go, I. Avoid she, because had hostility to affect your plan to me.”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “You are really the good miss of being with good intention!”

Tang Wutong somewhat cunning visits him, said: “If I am with good intention, should make you also marry her is right?”

“Does not need and not use. Most difficult to enjoy the beautiful woman graciousness, I had your one to be enough. I go.”The range that Imitation Soul Ability can cover is big enough, therefore Huo Yuhao was not worried that the Tang Wutong personal appearance will expose.

Stands up from failure to enter, Huo Yuhao has drilled into the imperial carriage quietly.

The imperial carriage is very big, is actually a very comfortable spacious carriage.

The imperial carriage, has ten square meters fully, the household furniture and bed, many.

At this time, only then traded Ju Zi(orange) of casual attire to sit, was pondering anything silently.

The gentle mind fluctuation ripples, blocks the entire imperial carriage in completely, any sound is unable to pass on.

“Um?”As if felt that anything was not right, Ju Zi(orange) subconscious gaining ground, looked that is empty the space that to the front.

“Was you comes?”Ju Zi(orange) asked in a low voice.

“How you know that is I?”The Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised sound resounds.

That two Titled Douluo discover him, he is not strange, but, why Ju Zi(orange) can also discover him, this disagreement common sense. The Ju Zi(orange) strength is impossible to discover his Imitation Soul Ability hideaway effect!

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, said: “Intuition, I know that you will come. Therefore I make the maidservants draw back, in car(riage) you. You really came.”

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance appears quietly, sits down on Ju Zi(orange) front backless stool.

“Some days disappear, you fortunately?”Huo Yuhao was asking somewhat does not have the words of nutrition. Although he shields internal sound, but actually all shared to give Tang Wutong through Spiritual Sharing the situation in imperial carriage. For safe, another is to also fear Tang Wutong is jealous oversensitively. Naturally, what is most important is the latter.

Ju Zi(orange) snort|hum, “good? How possibly good getting up. I am not good. You said that I should hate you, is this thank you?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Naturally should thanks me. You are Xu Tianran, actually wants to remove Holy Spirit Cult, not? Had still not found the excuse, this time, I give you excuse, shouldn't you thank me?”

--------------------------------------------------

Three finished asks the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-3





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperates


Ju Zi(orange) ill-humored [say / way]: “You destroy my Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, kills my Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp. This time kills my more than thousand Soul Engineer, did I also thank you? You are my empire big enmity are right.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, “I do not want to kill people. But, I do not kill people, on these Soul Engineer, does not know that must contaminate many Star Lou Empire and blood of Dou Ling Empire common people. Said that these are to us meaningless. My this time, is to ask you, can the words that your previous time spoke, keep a promise?”

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked, “which words?”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, “kills Xu Tianran.”

Ju Zi(orange) is then suddenly enlighted, shows a faint smile, said: “How kept a promise? How doesn't calculate? I must say that does not keep a promise, do you want to kill me? Feared that you do not give up. Also only then you can sneak in my imperial carriage silently, Limit Douluo cannot achieve.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless shaking the head, on this imperial carriage also has Tang Wutong, this saying, but does not fall fell in the Tang Wutong ear.

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Although I should not encourage you to murder the husband, but, Xu Tianran this person, the first fierce and ambitious, his existence, has the huge threat regarding Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries. Even if you have reneged on a promise, perhaps I also will start to him. Moreover, certainly will not show mercy because of you.”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, said: “Why do I want to renege on a promise? I happily also without enough time. He and I originally only then the name of husband and wife, does not have the reality of husband and wife. My children are not he one's own.”

Huo Yuhao stayed, subconscious said in a low voice: “Cautious word you!”

The smiling face on Ju Zi(orange) face is very delightful, “what this has, I do not believe that you have not sealed up the sound in this imperial carriage, nobody can hear the words that I spoke radically, what fears?”

Huo Yuhao has patted the forehead, a face surprise looks at Ju Zi(orange). Initially, Ju Zi(orange) and he has said that complex relations between she and Xu Tianran. However, this was first time said that directly the child was not Xu Tianran one's own, that was a crown prince!

The Huo Yuhao complexion sinks the [say / way] that concentrates: “Was he looked for individual to you, then......”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Yes. Was he looked for individual, then also made me kill that person personally. What a pity, he is wise, plans first, has not actually thought that that person who I find truly, is actually not he assigns. Therefore, he must die, if he does not die, when my child carries on Martial Soul Awakening in six years old. Certainly will expose. At that time, we ended, for my child, I must kill him, now you should understand. Why I said that must kill his words. Regarding a mother, anybody threatens her child, she will turn into the lunatic, will spell by the loathsome appearance. Therefore, you are not necessary to suspect that greatly my sincerity, Xu Tianran, I must kill. In this regard. We have the common language, not?”

Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Ju Zi(orange), looks like first time knew that she resembles, that is Xu Yunhan, actually whose child? Does the Ju Zi(orange) child, live with whom? Suddenly. He is confused.

Looks at his surprised appearance, Ju Zi(orange) said indifferently: “You do not need to suspect anything, this is I biggest secret, now says, is at heart more comfortable. Good. Said, how do you plan to help me massacre Xu Tianran?”

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, has stabilized own mind, regardless of Ju Zi(orange) and who had a child, theoretically, gathers him not to have any relations, he should not many inquiries, know many, sometimes is not the good deed.

“This must think you. I need you to provide to my Xu Tianran detailed daily schedule, the deploying troops for defense situation in entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace. If I have not guessed wrong, by your Sun-Moon Empire now internal situation. Defense of Xu Tianran in imperial palace, arranges certainly in view of the Limit Douluo level, thus ensures own security, in this case, in addition in Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace arrangement, once we initiate the surprise attack, even if has succeeded, wanting the whole body to draw back will also be very difficult. Therefore, I need the detailed information, only then so, can make us kill him truly.”

When the previous time, goes to Bright Capital City, Huo Yuhao with own eyes looks that Innate Body Douluo Du Busi died there, struck by Du Busi at risk of life, cannot injure Xu Tianran unexpectedly, Xu Tianran protection capability could be imagined.

Huo Yuhao does not think that present were more formidable than initial Du Busi, therefore, he needs to obtain more information from Ju Zi(orange) here.

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, stern [say / way]: “You said right, side Xu Tianran, the defensive power is greatly strengthened. Even something I do not know. I all will tell you who I know. But wants to approach him, I suggested that you should better continuously with me, only then follows side me, has truely approaches his opportunity.”

Huo Yuhao knit the brows: “With you? Your side is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp feminine Soul Engineer, I how with you?”

Ju Zi(orange) said with a smile: “Can this also be occupied by you rarely? Don't you meet the stealth? By your present strength, you who who can discover?”

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Anything is not absolute. Several days ago, you are attacked, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao has discovered me and Wutong. However we have not begun, they left. By the intuition, the Limit Douluo level powerhouse, has to discover us possibly. Moreover, in your Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, should have very formidable Soul Engineer to exist, these stand in this world peak Soul Engineer, not necessarily cannot discover us. Therefore, follows side you, will have very tremendous influence to your safety, you may, if wants.”

Ju Zi(orange) knit the brows, “this actually issue. However, so long as you not with I too nearly should be all right. You hide your aura always to achieve. Although my side is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp feminine Soul Engineer, but did you put on make-up not to be OK suddenly? You said that Tang Wutong with you in same place, she is all right?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Naturally is all right, Wutong is very good.”

The Ju Zi(orange) eyeground deep place flashes through cold brightness, “that was really is a pity.”

“You think very much I do die?”Tang Wutong outside already some hears, the Ju Zi(orange) intonation and expression, constantly no longer teased Huo Yuhao.

light shadow appears, the Tang Wutong form also reappeared, sits side Huo Yuhao, pulls his arm, seems like taking an oath own sovereignty.

Ju Zi(orange) complexion changed changed, desolate [say / way]: “You refuse stubbornly dead with me have not related, we now are only the cooperation.”

Tang Wutong gives a calm smile, said: “Um, said well, our cooperation. Then, asked you to be self-possessed. Said that you married manner woman, even if your husband cannot have the reality of husband and wife, you should also completely observe the traditional woman ethics, this is a foundation moral bottom line of woman.”

“You!”Ju Zi(orange) usually little gets angry, but by a words stimulation of Tang Wutong, cancould help manifesting suddenly.

“Was good, you little said two.”The Huo Yuhao sinking sound said: “Ju Zi(orange), you said that the imperial palace situation looks. As for the stealth at your Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp internal matter, we discussed again.”

“Um.”Ju Zi(orange) nodded, she does not want to say again that she feared really one cannot bear, a more important secret will say. If is really such, a leeway of swivel did not have.

Looks at appearance between Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, she knows that perhaps she does not have any opportunity. How even if says that secret? Only when can own child will sit the imperial throne in the future be taken the endless risk. Although Huo Yuhao is tenderhearted, but, in the face of the major issue of principle, definitely has the person of resolution. If makes him know......, The consequence is then dreadful.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) has to suppress the matter that oneself heart of hearts most wants to handle forcefully, starts the situation in Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City imperial palace simple was narrating to them.

“......, The situation in imperial palace basically was this, therefore, theoretically, Xu Tianran was almost impossible to be killed. Your opportunities are not very big. But in any event, we must attempt, in this regard, I will find the person and you coordinate.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now does your commander army want to return to homeland directly? Doesn't the war continue?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “I in your foundation about one step has been completed have framed by planting stolen goods on to shift blame to Holy Spirit Cult, I will not return to the empire the army direct belt. If so, Xu Tianran will certainly have suspected to me. After the army arrives at the border, I will unload the military authority, brings some Soul Engineer to go to the imperial capital by the filled with grief potential, apologized to Xu Tianran. Your opportunities, at this time.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Truly, the empire army not suitable belt goes back, such did was too obvious, Xu Tianran also can definitely be vigilant. What do you have to plan?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “The disposition of Xu Tianran that person I understood very much that this time we frame by planting stolen goods on to Holy Spirit Cult, more than 1000 Soul Engineer, that may be the Sun-Moon Empire future mainstay, such died, the Xu Tianran disposition, will again certainly not bear patiently, after he even likely will wait for me to go back, conforms with oneself strength, will initiate then to Holy Spirit Cult encircles fully. Thoroughly eliminates them. At this time, both sides collided to be unavoidable. Also can be the Bright Capital City most chaotic time, your opportunities also at this time.”

Tang Wutong curled the lip, “is really a sinister scheme.”

Ju Zi(orange) snort|hum, “you, if can find out better means that you come!”

Tang Wutong gives a calm smile, said: “I do not need to try to find any solution, the woman, had no need too intelligently. The women were too intelligent, that own lover can also manifest anything. I am silly, but Yuhao was intelligently enough.”

----------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-1





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperation


“Enough ruthless!”Darkly said one including the Huo Yuhao heart, the woman and woman are rivals for sexual favor, is really incomparable powerful!

Really, listened to Tang Wutong these words, the Ju Zi(orange) aura somewhat becomes is not obviously uniform, visits her wickedly.

“Was good, after detailed plan we arrived in Bright Capital City, carries on again. Since you must arrange us to Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, that as soon as possible. We in the, I and you continue to carry on the relation with Spiritual Detection and Sharing. One day later, I will look for you again.”

“Um.”Ju Zi(orange) clever nod, turning hostile unique skill is also reach a high degree of proficiency of utilization.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vanish in imperial carriage quietly, Ju Zi(orange) sitting angrily in the imperial carriage, long time returns to normal.

Closes the double pupil, is pondering silently.

This time matter, for her, only permits successful and cannot be defeated. What Ju Zi(orange) is very clear to be most defective is anything, most defective is the side does not have the top powerhouse.

The arrival of this Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, has made up for this point without doubt, can defeat the Zongli Wu strength by Huo Yuhao, he really most has the opportunity to strike to kill Xu Tianran. Especially Huo Yuhao is such excelling in the concealment personal appearance. This point, even if Limit Douluo does not compare.

Therefore, this time must strike in any event successfully, misses this time, wants to search the opportunity again, was the countless sufferings and hardships.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) started own detail planning, she has a series of plans to complete, with meticulous care. Many details, need to improve.

Left the imperial carriage, rose into the upper air that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were quietly, then has been far away from the Sun-Moon Empire army carefully.

“Snort! Really is not a good thing!”Tang Wutong angry saying.

Looks at her face angry appearance, Huo Yuhao cannot bear persuade: “Do not be angry. She does not support easily, a woman, must bear these many pressures.”

“Do you sympathize with her very much?”Suddenly Tang Wutong smiles looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao was silent immediately, enraged Tang Wutong at this time, will not have any good fruit to eat.

The smiling face on Tang Wutong face gradually turns disappointed, jumps into the Huo Yuhao bosom quietly, tight is hugging his waist, “sorry, I know that I should not play the small temper, but, I a little cannot bear. Were other women good, like your being also short? Do not think that I do not know, Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu, they like you actually. Why does not know, I never thought that they pose the threat to me, has Ju Zi(orange) not to be different. I always thought that she to you, somewhat illegibile relations. I to the words of your absolute trust, I really think that her child and you are concerned.”

Huo Yuhao loses says with a smile: “Do not talk nonsense. How possible. I may that and that......”

“That what?”A Tang Wutong face Tianzhen free of evil intention appearance!

Huo Yuhao ill-humored [say / way]: “Does not say. In any case same as you.”

“To be how same? You are the man, I is a woman, are we possibly how same?”On the Tang Wutong elegant face full is the smiling face.

“Do you want to know really?”Huo Yuhao lowered the head, visits her earnestly.

Tang Wutong is intelligent, has not waited for Huo Yuhao to take an action, immediately cherishes to be separated from him, turns around runs, “does not want, I do not want to know!”

“Does not want to know also late.”Huo Yuhao cries out strangely, fast pursued toward Tang Wutong.

They such from the sky pursue to create a disturbance, beforehand did not vanish quickly gradually.

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City, imperial palace.

“Bang!”A Xu Tianran palm of the hand maliciously in the letter paper hand pats on the table, surrounding in wait on all knees down immediately, bodies are shivering, lest this Thunder's Rage arrives on oneself.

Recently for serveral days, had to be many to wait on under the Xu Tianran anger.

“Bastard! Does Holy Spirit Cult plan to revolt really?”Xu Tianran aura obvious some are not steady.

Soon before, after the Ju Zi(orange) apologizing book he is also the thinking long time, has made the response.

Relations between Holy Spirit Cult and military are not harmonious, this was long before something, but must say that Holy Spirit Cult will sneak attack the military, and robs the military, this is really makes Xu Tianran some not want to believe. At least currently speaking, this does not serve the Holy Spirit Cult benefit.

But, the fact puts at present, two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp lose seriously, but from all sorts of signs, how likely is Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master to do. Then caused the public sentiment to be roused to action.

But Holy Spirit Cult Lord Zongli Wu, in fights after the Huo Yuhao gambling, vanished the trail, does not know where, did not have including the opportunity of explanation. The army has mutinied then, many Holy Spirit Cult underlying bed Soul Master died during that mutiny, only then Evil Soul Master of Titled Douluo above rank ran away the life.

These contradictory will intensify, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui found Xu Tianran personally.

Xu Tianran expressed that this matter will certainly investigate rigorously, looks up to come to light. But, does this matter look up? Although he is a king, but the entire country is impossible is he decides completely.

In person who this dying, the most important people, that are representing Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp of Imperial Family ancestor and relative benefit.

This person dies, but also lost Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp many years of saving high level installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, moreover is nearly all, how many wealth is this?

The Imperial Family ancestor and relative is the pillar of country, the merit expensive leader. The benefits of these people were really too huge. Even if were the Xu Tianran authoritative date is heavy, does not dare to disregard their demands!

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp loses seriously, making the Imperial Family ancestors and relatives nearly go crazy, Xu Tianran also bore the huge pressure. On but War-God Empress of apologizing book actually became the object who these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives protect. They heard the front special details through various types of channels more or less. Is pleased to Ju Zi(orange) reckless protection numerous Soul Engineer. Must know that at that time flushed mutiny, strikes to kill the Holy Spirit Cult audiences to be most, is Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer!

Two sides pressures centralized on Xu Tianran, his decision can be imagined. The Holy Spirit Cult use value became more and more low, in this case, he impossible to shake the national basis, say nothing, Ju Zi(orange) was the person who he most trusted, Ju Zi(orange) performed the distinguished service for the empire, Sky Soul Empire integrated in the national domain thoroughly. If rear area does not have to impede, soon, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire are also same. Regarding this point, Xu Tianran is not worried.

Had the Sky Soul Empire resources, the Sun-Moon Empire development became smoother, but Ju Zi(orange) itself has the intense and deep-seated hatred to Star Lou Empire, must attack Star Lou Empire, she put behind Star Lou Empire, was not because hated pale, but wanted, when were most formidable copes with Star Lou Empire again.

Therefore, Xu Tianran gets down has smoothed over differences the imperial edict finally, the force condemned, said when other Ju Zi(orange) returned to the empire, determines guilt to her again, may in fact, not have any significance in fact. This point, Xu Tianran is some does not respect the Holy Spirit Cult honor obviously.

But this does not have the matter of means that the Holy Spirit Cult that side, if respects are too many, Soul Engineer of nation what to do? Imperial Family ancestor and relative what to do? Merit expensive what to do?

Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master, the book is the object who all people repel. Now at this time, should remove the power core them gradually the good opportunity.

Then Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui walked, Xu Tianran had also considered may present the motion of Holy Spirit Cult retaliation. But for these years, with the support of Sun-Moon Empire, quick of Holy Spirit Cult also development. On some Martial Soul has the slight defect and variation possible Soul Master, was taken back by them, according to method training of Evil Soul Master. But Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in Sun-Moon Empire. Even if Holy Spirit Cult has discontented again, will not care about own base industry.

But, now looks like, oneself evil aura understanding these Evil Soul Master are not enough. More than 1000 Soul Engineer! Died completely certainly . Moreover, the commodity that carries was also despoiled. Besides Holy Spirit Cult these people, but also who can achieve? Bone Dragon? Good Bone Dragon. Zongli Wu, you do not come back to report after carrying out orders, actually kills people by my army. Very good, is really very good!

On the Xu Tianran face is revealing gloomy sneering, he again is the fierce and ambitious, in the heart again heartless, must consider the feeling of officers.

The officers in the front kill the enemy, dies in the enemy hand not many, may die in own person of hand is actually more and more, sees things in others'shoes, if he is a general, this matter is unable to tolerate.

In the hand in the letter written in blood, each blood fingerprint presses very clear, that name, has almost the impression in his mind. This is must be forced what degree so to do! The Ju Zi(orange) fingerprint in the bottommost, thinks, the pressure that since she bore for serveral days is also very big.

If it is not dealt with properly this matter, truly will shake the basis of country. Then, can only want the brave soldier to break the wrist.

Thinks of here, on the Xu Tianran face cold brightness became stronger several points. The murderous intention also appears.

“Report. War-God Empress front news.”

“Assumes.”

This chapter was not the correspondence, the news that but through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device spread, was recorded by the special transmitting orders officer, delivered to Xu Tianran here.

Read this letter, the Xu Tianran complexion became cloudier. Ju Zi(orange) very explicit told him, now front officers despondency, moreover gnashed one's teeth in hatred to Holy Spirit Cult, must unable to repress, wanted your majesty to give them a view to be good. In order to avoid the sergeant mutinies, now she has to comply with their requests, the commander army to the Sun-Moon Empire original border consideration. The plan is stationed in the army near Bright Struggle Mountain Range, one is to deter Star Lou Empire, another, she also as soon as possible leads the Soul Engineer military officer representatives to return to Bright Capital City, awaits the order of Xu Tianran. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-2





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperation


Although this pass on message has not written special is clear, but Xu Tianran can also the clear feeling the air/Qi of grief and indignation contains. Very obviously, the front army, is some are unstable. This is also the Xu Tianran most undesired situation, this is the basis of country!

“Shadow.”

“In.”Appearance that a shadow is quietly in Xu Tianran behind, even if under very bright ray, he seems as before is very illusory, cannot see clearly the look.

The person who “lets the shadow strengthens collection related Holy Spirit Cult all news, the secret conduct, must should not be discovered. Let imperial Commander Soul Engineer Corp see me.”

“Yes, your majesty.”The shadow retrocedes quietly, then vanishes to disappear in the gloomy corner.

In the Xu Tianran hand the ray dodged, records the paper of pass on message to change into the powder powder to vanish instantaneously does not see. In this time heart had the resolution, angrily instead became desalinated.

Holy Spirit Cult, good Holy Spirit Cult. Since your this dogs became more and more are not obedient, then, do not blame me being cruel and merciless.

Lets in the Xu Tianran heart only slightly somewhat hesitant was that two Limit Douluo, but, regarding Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, he also has the detailed investigation. Other did not say, only these two ages, are the major problems.

With the powerhouses of their same time, already died cleanly, they in humanity, are considered as absolutely on are the longevities. Has surpassed 200 years old. Has the possibility life to come to the end anytime, Limit Douluo is not existence that does not die, only if can touch that world threshold.

God Realm, does not know whether exists. But from Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao situation, they was very perhaps difficult to touch. Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), if you do not have these problems, so long as waits again some years, when that two old codger dying of all. Begins to Holy Spirit Cult again, a issue did not have.

Shrek City.

“Well, Sanshi. How did you come back?”When Beibei sees Xu Sanshi, surprised said.

“Shouldn't you in Spirit Dou City? Our Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp sent. Will you come back? Moreover did you also come back?”

Beibei surprised looks at front partners.

Xu Sanshi smiles, said: “That whirlpool who wants to stay there for a long time! I quickly was insane. Beibei, you listened to me to say to you understand.”

At that moment, how Xu Sanshi initially and Huo Yuhao and the others entered Spirit Dou City, how afterward to help Spirit Dou City strive stably, became the prince regent, as well as afterward all sorts impeded all narrated.

At the same time listens to his narration, the Beibei complexion also changes is ugly. The Dou Ling Empire internal issue, causes the leeway that Xu Sanshi simply has not displayed, unexpectedly returned the civil strife.

When continuously Xu Sanshi said that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong appear, when they were most critical have saved them, on the Beibei face the look then relaxed several points.

“You also really suffice the waste, five Titled Douluo, you cannot withstand. Sanshi, comes back also well, you turn head to close up to me. Did not attack Titled Douluo not to come out.”Beibei ill-humored saying.

Xu Sanshi snort|hum, said: “You speak irresponsibly and sarcastically, where impact Titled Douluo to be so simple! Well., You are not......”

Beibei smiles, the somewhat favorite [say / way]: “Person meets celebration mind to be happy, why does not know, since Little Ya has cured, my cultivating sped up, it can be said that ten thousand li in a day for the winding speed. Little Ya also broke through, couple days ago just went to the Spirit Transferring Pagoda that side and Blue Silver Emperor fusion, now. Our Tang Sect was also many two Titled Douluo. Therefore, you must refuel. Right. Little Junior Brother and Wutong, since also appears, said. Was Wutong completely good?”

A Xu Sanshi face despondent looks at Beibei, since continuously, their cultivating for similar, now Beibei unexpectedly already achievement Titled Douluo, to he also really not small stimulation.

“Was good, Wutong was not only good, but also she and Little Junior Brother also together broke through. Listened to Little Junior Brother saying that now they are the Transcendent Douluo level powerhouses, you were Titled Douluo, what had to be good to show off? Nannan, we walk, we also break through. This time, does not break through to Titled Douluo I do not come out.”

“You wait / etc..”Beibei holds on Xu Sanshi, asks that side the Spirit Dou City further information again carefully. Determined after Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp arrives, Xue Lingxun helps in that side, this lets off Xu Sanshi. But has not made Xu Sanshi practice, but draws him to directly soar Shrek Academy to go.

The situation that Dou Ling Empire has, must make that side Shrek Academy know is good.

The Sun-Moon Empire army withdraws, Shrek City on relaxed were many, Star Luo and Dou Ling two countries elite also withdraws. Shrek City fully returned to normal. Naturally, this is in the surface. No one knows when the Sun-Moon Empire army will appear again, does not know that their goal meetings are, the Continent aspect so, nobody can true relaxed getting up.

......

“Pū!”A chuckle resounds. Ju Zi(orange) covers up own cherry small mouth, suppresses not to be smiled to make noise by oneself again.

Before her, is standing two people, is lust red Humanoid Soul Guidance Device covers the whole body, only then the hard helmet raises, reveals the true self.

Side is valiant, certainly Li's moving Tang Wutong. The pink-blue color long hair and that flame Humanoid Soul Guidance Device complement each other fresh splendor, increases several points of gorgeous.

But another side was interesting, Huo Yuhao in another Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, he is actually not easy to allow to put on make-up, is appearance originally. But, this belongs to Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Humanoid Soul Guidance Device completely to defer to the feminine stature to build!

That although Ju Zi(orange) looks to Huo Yuhao, belonged to stature specially big and tall feminine Soul Engineer. But the stature and man of this woman have very big difference eventually.

For example chest armor that sticks out, the flame color, the Huo Yuhao wear, such must strangely strange.

Let alone Ju Zi(orange) will smile to make noise, even if side with Tang Wutong that she does not cope with very much, cannot bear smiles to make noise lowly.

“What smiles to laugh at you, don't I put on good? I used Imitation Soul Ability to transform directly.”Huo Yuhao ill-humored saying, must take off oneself this Soul Guidance Device.

“No! You did not say that you use the Imitation Soul Ability change personal appearance, or is the concealment words, the super powerhouse can discover? Moreover, I do not know that Bright Capital City currently has any new Surveying Soul Guidance Device to appear, therefore, you put on. We do not laugh at you and that's the end, puts on the hard helmet, who knows that inside person is you!”

“But, this is very irritable!”Huo Yuhao angry saying.

“Ha Ha!”Tang Wutong could not bear again, has smiled. Can not be irritable, the man puts on feminine Humanoid Soul Guidance Device. Even if bringing the hard helmet, they also know what inside is Huo Yuhao!

Huo Yuhao stared Tang Wutong one ill-humoredly, reveals one to turn head to tidy up your appearance again.

Fears him to renege on a promise, Ju Zi(orange) hurries to go forward several steps, helped him put on the hard helmet personally, has blocked from the original appearance. Let alone, after covering the look, cannot see the Huo Yuhao appearance, was good to select finally.

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “Good valiant female man. This, good.”At the same time was saying, she also put on the hard helmet.

This Humanoid Soul Guidance Device does not have anything to affect to Tang Wutong, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is fire attribute amplification, and provides various fire attribute Soul Guidance Device. Although Tang Wutong is not fire attribute Soul Power, but her light attribute can also utilize certain fire attribute characteristics, therefore can also use. It is not big to own amplification, but is also insufficient to weaken.

Huo Yuhao was quite miserable, this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is not good-fitting, although can also control through Spiritual Power, but his Soul Power is Absolute Ice, in this is flooding in fire element Soul Guidance Device, not to feel how comfortable, only when can be cuts Spirit Eyes Martial Soul, good, but the flexibility of body do not think.

“Um, this. You later follow side me, is part in my own soldier. My own soldier absolutely can trust. So long as you did not speak, nobody will question you absolutely.”Ju Zi(orange) earnest said to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. Naturally, the happy expression of her eyeground deep place, cannot conceal as before.

Huo Yuhao no longer spoke simply.

Ju Zi(orange) arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, said with a smile lowly: “You said that my this is seeks an impossibility! We clearly are the enemies, actually must collaborate.”

The approaching speed of Sun-Moon Empire army is quick, coordinates various Soul Guidance Device, the approaching speed of ordinary soldier far ultra belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries. The combat tank that and some actuates with the milk bottle, can load bearing many soldiers.

After these days observation, Huo Yuhao has further understood at present superiority of Sun-Moon Empire in Soul Guidance Technology aspect. Such that just like he expects, now Sun-Moon Empire already more and more utilized Soul Guidance Technology on the average person. Although the milk bottle construction cost is expensive, but also needs Soul Master to supplement unceasingly Soul Power can use. But since had this start, in the future the average person becomes Soul Master no longer vainly hoped.

This is the Sun-Moon Empire true superiority, no wonder Ju Zi(orange) dares saying that kills Xu Tianran, in her ten years do not attack Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire. She really has such assurance! Ten years, the science and technology is impossible to overtake. The raw material cannot follow.

Mining and refinement of rare metal, are the Soul Guidance Device manufacture, Sun-Moon Empire are in the lead too many are too many. Although Shrek Academy is pursuing diligently, but relies on a Academy strength to pursue a country, that is at all the impossible matter!

---

Welcome everybody to join our prestige - platform, has there our, the station, can see our Tang Sect relevant information, serializes, novel to serialize including the cartoon exclusive, third child's picture, but can also leave a message at the forum.

Joins the platform method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-3





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


The armies were getting more and more near from the Sun-Moon Empire border, but the entire Sun-Moon Empire armies appear spiritless, military officers is not happy, this thing will also infect, the following person mood can good blame.

The armies go on an expedition outside, meritorious military service illustrious, the interior actually had problems, will trade is everybody will have the intense resentment to read. Soul Engineer so, the military officers are also so. The excellent time of performing good deeds, actually experiences this matter, their anger can be imagined, wish one could to put down entire Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly are good.

Ju Zi(orange) appears very calm, sits on the imperial carriage, occasionally raises the curtain screen to have a look outward, look always nonchalant falling on Huo Yuhao of female attire, although her surface seems very tranquil, but Huo Yuhao clearly can catch the happy expression of her eyeground deep place.

This crime Huo Yuhao first withstanding, not only Ju Zi(orange) is smiling! Tang Wutong will smile frequently also to make noise, had been responsible for the discipline Soul Engineer warning several times.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao very depressed, but Ju Zi(orange) actually very happy.

Huo Yuhao recently looked many troublesome to her, she also is very sometimes angry, but when he follows after her side, this anger gradually dissolved. She even a little hopes that this road has walked, cannot come to the end to be good, is most minimum, this Huo Yuhao side her, has been able to see his feeling every day, unexpectedly such good. Why before, doesn't have this feeling in Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy?

Speed that the armies march forward naturally impossible compared with Soul Engineer Corp, but is this, the Sun-Moon Empire rapid march also be much quicker than other countries. Five days later, border between Sun-Moon Empire and original Sky Soul Empire was already in sight.

Ju Zi(orange) has chosen a Sky Soul Empire border strategic place, making the army be stationed, simultaneously issues Shuai Ling, assigns the surroundings city to carry on the commodity supplies to the army, ordering lets the army same place recuperation, the wait command. She brings Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, was hitting remnantly Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp as well as Imperial Family Consecrate Hall nine levels of Soul Engineer starts off together, directly soars Sun-Moon Empire capital Bright Capital City to go.

Since this time goes back to lay cards on the table with Holy Spirit Cult, the strength in hand cannot be short. Three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, although hit remnantly two, but three Soul Engineer Corp added also two strengths, in addition also knew how things stand position nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if encountered the Limit Douluo level Ye Xishui, they also fully had the ability of self-preservation.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong fly in Ju Zi(orange) side not far away, they are personal guard. In not good-fitting Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao will always think somewhat worried, although he also knows what this are more is came from in own psychological process, may so, he as before very not be uncomfortable. Has released own Absolute Ice aura to resist or the attribute fluctuation that in Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is transmitting.

“Xiaoyu, you come.”Flies to beckon to Huo Yuhao in airborne Ju Zi(orange). Xiaoyu, is she gives the name that Huo Yuhao gives, or is the code number. All Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer know that recently the marshal liked this fellow who very much called Xiaoyu.

The Soul Engineer Corp internal management is very strict, particularly marshal personal guard, only then Ju Zi(orange) can assign these personal guard, therefore, is not the personal guard internal person, does not know that this Xiaoyu origin, let alone they daily put on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Side flying Ju Zi(orange) of Huo Yuhao heavy line, passes on the tone channel: “Does you?”

Ju Zi(orange) raises surface armor, the short distance shows a charming smile to Huo Yuhao, “I was hungry, later prepares food to me eats, heard that your family inherited grilled fish technology is very good.”

“I cannot!”Saying of Huo Yuhao coldly .

This is not first Ju Zi(orange) gives him to have the difficult problem, since becoming her personal guard, various requests of Ju Zi(orange) emerge one after another incessantly.

Huo Yuhao knows certainly that this is intimate with oneself, may be this, in his heart is also vigilant and repel.

“Roasts to her eats.”The Tang Wutong sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao ear.

Huo Yuhao has gawked, has turned around, looks to the Tang Wutong direction.

Tang Wutong maintains very tranquil posture is flying forward . Moreover, from her sound, as if likely was not angry. When did she become such natural? Is this Tang Wutong that I know? In Huo Yuhao heart some doubts.

“All right, I did not mind, but, you must tell her, I must eat. I also the grilled fish that is good to eat you to make.”Tang Wutong has shown the cloven hoof finally.

This girl, was gluttonous. However, thinks that to the Tang Wutong grilled fish, the Huo Yuhao mood becomes is immediately different. So long as is she wants, this is anything, certainly well satisfies her.

Ju Zi(orange) ill-humored [say / way]: “Such slightly requests you unable to be completed, but also counted on that what great accomplishment achieves? How turns head also to make me coordinate you?”This threat is not the first time, moreover basically effect.

Naturally, when requests to go too far, Huo Yuhao very simple rejection. Therefore, Ju Zi(orange) has not been having the too high hope.

But what made her surprised was, after Huo Yuhao slightly hesitant one next, nodded unexpectedly, said: “Good. But I and Wutong must eat.”He adds on himself specially, to prevent the Ju Zi(orange) rejection.

“Good.”Ju Zi(orange) almost complied without hesitation, from the happy expression in her eyes, this time she, even is wild with joy.

To eat a grilled fish, as for? Is this War-God Empress that able to move unhindered the Continent war invincible, sweeps away all obstacles?

After half double-hour, the place of recuperation turned into by a river, grasps fish matter regarding Soul Engineer is not the matter.

The quick, many fresh fish appear in front of Ju Zi(orange). These military officers good old Soul Engineer to avoid suspicion for the men and women, recuperation time in far place. Naturally cannot some people run over to dine.

Puts on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, for does not expose status, Huo Yuhao can only reveal to operate the hand. The free time of a while, earlier preparatory work has completed, fresh fish, by the cleanness that he processes.

Grilled fish matter, Huo Yuhao was already ripe flows extremely, does the piredog to be good, the free time of a while, the fragrance of grilled fish passed on.

Ju Zi(orange) has eaten first without a doubt, being greedy that eats is full of praise. Looks at Huo Yuhao time, a big eye like her white and tender flesh, bright and intelligent.

The second article has given Tang Wutong, Tang Wutong sits in the one side, is eats fragrantly.

The capacity for food of woman when facing the good food, absolutely compared with the man. Quick, grilled fish entered the bellies of two misses.

Does not know that because of battle efficiency reason, in the capacity for food, Ju Zi(orange) eventually is also more inferior than Tang Wutong several points. Tang Wutong takes up a grilled fish time, she has eaten really motionless.

Huo Yuhao has also eaten, but to their this cultivating is, in fact ate the thing supplementary energy is not that important, even if were several days several nights does not eat, will not have the too tremendous influence.

By a big tree, Ju Zi(orange) cast aside one to sit in own side not far away Tang Wutong slantingly, said: “Makes him give me the grilled fish to eat, don't you envy?”

Tang Wutong shook the head, eats is very as before happy.

Huo Yuhao walks, does not know where from puts out a clean handkerchief, has scratched the grease stains of corners of the mouth place for her. Tang Wutong looks up to him, on the elegant face reveals a sweet smile.

Although Ju Zi(orange) cannot see at this time Huo Yuhao after surface armor, but can also imagine leaves his gentleness of this time look, greatly for been jealous [say / way]: “Aren't you jealous unexpectedly? That is you do not know to treasure. If he is my man, I will certainly not allow him to give beside me the woman to prepare food!”

Tang Wutong shakes the head, the smile looks at Ju Zi(orange), said: “This is only the minor matter, is not anything . Moreover, he forever with giving others who I do does is different.”

“Different? How to be different?”The Ju Zi(orange) intelligent person, Huo Yuhao in the grilled fish, was very a moment ago careful, the step of each grilled fish she has looked with uses the material to be exactly the same, therefore Tang Wutong said that the grilled fish is different, she does not believe.

Tang Wutong hands in front of grilled fish in the hand Ju Zi(orange), “looked, in you like in his share so much, tastes one to you.”

At the same time was saying, she received the grilled fish, tears down a scrap fish to hand over again from above, a very stingy appearance.

Result that grilled fish of Ju Zi(orange) doubts, the reason told her, was the empire empress, how can eat others remaining things? But the curiosity and emotion of innermost feelings, let squeeze in oneself mouth that grilled fish that she disregarded.

Chewed, Ju Zi(orange) has tarried, her dull sitting there, in the eye the pupil lost the focal distance instantaneously.

That is what kind of flavor! Fresh and tender, juiciness, contains the extremely special one energy to exist. Flavor as if before oneself eats is the same, but, because were many which marvelous feeling, made the grilled fish entire different.

Tang Wutong continues to eat own grilled fish, on the elegant face has several points to blush, in the look completely satisfies.

Ju Zi(orange) was in a daze the long time, has swallowed the grilled fish in mouth, in that flash, the unprecedented feeling of satisfaction floods the whole body instantaneously, as if the whole person put into during a warm bosom, satisfaction that could not say, relaxed, a warmed any complete gable general feeling.

“Actually have you and you in giving her grilled fish put what?”Ju Zi(orange) fierce turning head, looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “You have been looking, I give you process of grilled fish to be the same.”

“But the flavor is different, why missed that many? I also want that type of grilled fish.”Ju Zi(orange) wicked saying.

Last month! Requested earnestly everybody monthly ticket and recommendation ticket vigorously to support. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-1





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


Huo Yuhao shakes the head, said: “Sorry, I cannot achieve.”

“Why can't achieve? I want!”Ju Zi(orange) almost roars is saying these words, the Fire Phoenix guards that causes not far away stand up, vision brilliant looks to here.

Ju Zi(orange) beckoned with the hand, hints them to be all right. Her breath is somewhat rapid, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again.

“Why and why can't you achieve?”Her sound became somewhat spiritless.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, shook the head, has not actually continued.

Tang Wutong stands up, the last grilled fish will eat, then approaches Ju Zi(orange) saying: “Because the mood is different. Do not feel embarrassed him, he is not desirably. When gives you grilled fish, with giving my grilled fish time, his mood has the difference. Therefore, fish that the similar method, roasts, the flavor is different. Therefore, I did not mind that his grilled fish eats to you. Because, only if I want, otherwise, you are forever impossible eats that type to be called * the flavor.”

She arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, gently has depended on him, “quite delicious. I love you.”

The simple six characters, make the Huo Yuhao whole body shake, Tang Wutong this is first time works as others to say me to love your three characters to him. This to Huo Yuhao, absolutely is a big pleasant surprise. Although he knows that this also has her to be air/Qi the Ju Zi(orange) ingredient. But when she said these three characters, between the lines, was sincere, that cannot install.

“I also love you.”Huo Yuhao grasps her subconsciously, at this time, his heart was dissolved.

Ju Zi(orange) tells fortunes by physiognomy two who supports, tears uncontrolled flowing, she understands finally why Tang Wutong agree let Huo Yuhao to her the grilled fish, was not the good intention, not for gluttonous, more importantly, for must declare the sovereignty to him!

She is not not jealous, but has been jealous. Her is using the most drastic method to attack itself. clear(ly) knows one more should be strong on exceed at this time, flowing that outward but, the tears actually as before could not bear.

How even if won the world to be able, I have lost eventually to her . Moreover, so long as his heart on her, I forever is impossible to win.

The tears made the present line of sight somewhat blurred, Ju Zi(orange) has turned around, the wiping off tears quietly, took own surface armor, arriving nearby silently, this time, she walked was a little far, anything had not said again.

“Am I somewhat cruel?”Tang Wutong walks arm in arm in the Huo Yuhao bosom said in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Makes her lose heart to her is the good deed. Between I and her, already did not have any other possibilities. I do not hope that she has any idea again. What you do is right. Ju Zi(orange) is also a poor man, in her heart remains to have a charitable disposition, at least when attacks a city to seize territory, does not have excessive slaughtering, otherwise, I worry about the former friendship, already began to her.”

“Former friendship?”Tang Wutong gains ground, in the look revealed immediately has been vigilant the color.

Huo Yuhao lifts the cheek, lowered the head, kisses above her red lip.

Has arrived at the riverside Ju Zi(orange) just to turn around to see this, her bright double pupil gradually flood red, suddenly, her fierce flushed toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, in aura, were many crazy of hysteria.

Huo Yuhao cultivates is, has very strong sensation regarding all of outside, when Ju Zi(orange) is away from he also has certain distance, he immediately feels, lets loose Tang Wutong, turns head to look to Ju Zi(orange), a gentle Soul Power barrier the Ju Zi(orange) isolation outside.

Ju Zi(orange) both eyes red looks at Huo Yuhao, was almost roaring in a low voice the [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao, do you know! I......”

She just spoke of here, suddenly, on the Tang Wutong forehead, the golden trident trace does not have the omen appears suddenly, the golden light electricity shoots together, fell on Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) whole body big change, retroceded subconsciously two steps, as if had discovered any entire world most fearful matter, in the eye pupil full is color with amazement, to the words of mouth, swallowing back of stiffly.

“Wutong, do you do?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Tang Wutong, by him the understanding Tang Wutong, Tang Wutong is jealous, will not injure Ju Zi(orange) to be right.

“Ah? I do not know what's the matter.”Tang Wutong somewhat is similarly startled, goes forward several steps, supports Ju Zi(orange), “you are all right, Ju Zi(orange), why I do not know can like this.”

Huo Yuhao to Tang Wutong is the absolute trust, let alone from her intonation and mood fluctuation, has not lain. But, that golden light what's the matter?

At this time, was Ju Zi(orange) returned to the contrary normal, the red in eye also vanished, shook the head to say to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong that “I was all right, sorry, my somewhat was a moment ago excited, I was all right, making me rest a while.”Saying, she arrived around big tree to be implicated, all have as if replied normally.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong look at each other one, they somewhat are inexplicable, therefore feeling. But the intimate atmosphere was also destroyed, can only be sits one side, rests.

Sits there, seems like tranquil Ju Zi(orange), at this time in the heart has actually raised the dreadful wave, in a moment ago, when that golden light shines on her together, she only thought own whole body seemed suppressed under a mountain. Incomparably dignified, frightened her soul unable the sound of move half minute to speak a few words to her sufficiently.

Those words, look like trough ice water irrigate suddenly in her head resemble, making her erupt to sober from the mood of hysteria instantaneously, at this moment, in heart except for frightened, again did not have other things.

......

“If you do not want with your child relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish, to say you together, forever burying in moral nature.”

......

Without implication of army, Soul Engineer Corp full speed marches forward is extremely quick, several Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer all has the flying ability, is relying on the support of milk bottle, each launching can fly of double-hour to need the recuperation continually.

Has only used more than for day points time, area vast Bright Capital City, appeared in the field of vision range.

Ju Zi(orange) flies by Humanoid Soul Guidance Device in the upper air, looks out into the distance Bright Capital City, the surging emotions fluctuate. Her very clear this return means anything to oneself, this motion does not permit the failure, once is defeated, perhaps is beyond redemption. Naturally, she also has confidence to herself leaves behind some rear guards, the failure will not lose is too big. However, if failed, she must first lose, likely is the life of beloved person.

Even if, she somewhat despaired to him now, knows one again impossible and he in the same place, is, in the moral nature deep place, that lets her mind reposing the emotion, is unable to dismiss from mind eventually! Therefore, her very has mixed feelings at this time, but she also understands that starting from this moment, oneself must restrain the mind, going whole-heartedly facing all that is going to have.

The depth of effort inhaled airborne somewhat chilly air, the Ju Zi(orange) mood has stabilized completely, for the child, also for him, this time, only permitted successfully, cannot be defeated.

Unifies Continent, regarding Ju Zi(orange) is not an urgent matter, what is more important controls own destiny. The series armed forces are so long, she knows certainly that superiority of Sun-Moon Empire in Soul Guidance Technology aspect is huge, but these superiority, are not ten years can pursue. Therefore, she is not anxious.

But her son actually could not wait, the son was day by day big, to the age, must carry on the Martial Soul Awakening ceremony, she does not know what own son can inherit was what kind of Martial Soul, but in her heart feared really very much.

Therefore, she was unable to wait again, this time is the best opportunity.

Huo Yuhao is choked up with emotions at this time similarly, he has recorded unclear this is several time comes Bright Capital City, the feeling that every time comes is different.

From initial shock, to the destruction and control feeling in the present heart having, this is changes with the strong and weak change of own ability.

On this world, most can depend upon, only then own strength. After own strength becomes is formidable, confidence naturally will appear, let alone, in the lover who his side can also trust completely. After two Limit Douluo attack, they for serveral days assiduously have been practicing, cultivates is not general Transcendent Douluo can compare for the winding speed definitely, Huo Yuhao even became them in the heart 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo time approaches the premise.

Bright Capital City, Xu Tianran and Holy Spirit Cult, we came. This time, must from internal thorough change situation. Only has so, can give Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries to win the time.

As for the future war, ten years later, Huo Yuhao believes that oneself and Tang Wutong have to attack the Limit Douluo possibility, moreover is unprecedented three Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo. Although the Soul Guidance Device might is powerful, but the battle efficiency of individual is as before terrorist, perhaps to that time, they can control some changes of Continent.

Huo Yuhao also never thinks that ten years can make Soul Guidance Technology pursue, but, he actually believes own strength, after individual strength as formidable as certain extent, not necessarily cannot change outcome of war.

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face reveals a light god light, Xu Tianran, this time I fight one fight with you.

Three Soul Engineer legion when slowly drop from the Bright Capital City also 50 li (0.5km), falls after the ground, has not gone to Bright Capital City immediately, but reorganizes same place.

Sky over Bright Capital City is prohibited absolutely, only if there is written order of king. But their armies of these returns, must accept to reorganize and inspect. Only the military officer can enter a city directly, the army actually must remain. This is the custom, anybody is indestructible.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-2





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


The news that they come back first spread to Bright Capital City, quick, Soul Engineer Corp flew from Bright Capital City unexpectedly, they accepted the order obviously, can fly.

This was not Huo Yuhao first time sees Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, but, even if were the second time, shock in his heart has not reduced.

The complete 100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp members, on everyone put on sincere Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, the formidable aura is partly visible. Compared with them, Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp looks like the chickling that just hatched is ordinary.

Soul Douluo, everyone is the aura of eight rings Soul Douluo rank, or said accurately that is the aura of eight levels of Soul Engineer levels.

To this degree of cultivating is, but can also become the organization system, this was too fearful. This is in the Xu Tianran hand is controlling the ultimate strength, the defensive system that in addition Bright Capital City constantly strengthens, this city, was called the Continent first city definitely is not the lies.

Huo Yuhao standing silently behind is waiting for in Ju Zi(orange).

100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer drop from the clouds, falls after the ground, wears Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer to arrive in front of Ju Zi(orange) in big strides. Bows to salute.

“Opens reports War-God Empress, your majesty has the aim, assigns you to lead personally fellow assistant regimental commander Soul Engineer Corp the above rank high-ranking military officer to enter the city, your majesty receives the bride personally your return before the imperial palace. Three Soul Engineer Corp are stationed to wait to order same place.”

Similarly stands in Ju Zi(orange) behind audiences Soul Engineer Corp high-ranking military officers, on the face reveals not the color of indignation. They quell Sky Soul Empire to be remaining, puts down from Continent Sky Soul Empire thoroughly, integrates in its territory Sun-Moon Empire completely, it may be said that merit in state. But now dispatches one team of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer to come to greet unexpectedly, even it can be said that sends under escort. How this makes them endure.

Feels oneself behind sweeping to move, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand, making the people peaceful, then on one knee knees down, sinking sound track: “Feudal official obeys the aim.”

Then, Ju Zi(orange) takes off oneself Humanoid Soul Guidance Device hard helmet, gives Huo Yuhao, is leading a military officer on big strides walks in the Bright Capital City direction.

That Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp military officer hurries saying: “War-God Empress, your majesty specially permits, you can lead to fly into the city heavily.”

Ju Zi(orange) actually shook the head, said: “Does not use. Goes out the armed forces of combat to return, how can fly into the city, that is to your majesty disrespecting, we walk into and that's the end. Troubles, enters a city along with me together, has an audience with your majesty.”

Then, stand forth that her does not return.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as own soldier, at this time naturally cannot with, Xu Tianran say, only makes their military officers enter a city, even if has not stated clearly, the meaning cannot lead the soldier. They also can only wait for here.

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart is actually very clear, Xu Tianran does not neglect itself, but for security concern. Three Soul Engineer Corp return to Bright Capital City, naturally cannot enter a city directly. If then, had the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouse to sneak attack at this time, Ju Zi(orange) will have the danger. Dispatches 100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, to protect in order to her security.

Naturally, Ju Zi(orange) naturally cannot say guess in own heart, in these here generals heart is angrier is good, to the following plan big advantageous.

Gazes after Ju Zi(orange) to depart, Tang Wutong passes on the tone channel to Huo Yuhao: “We what to do?”

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Here waits, Ju Zi(orange) will arrange. Just returned to Bright Capital City time, I felt that her aura fully returned to normal, Ju Zi(orange) under this condition, at least in the military and intelligent aspect, I also grumbled such as. Let her arrange and that's the end.”

Tang Wutong snort|hum, said: “You trust him actually very much.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Not forever enemy. This time she needs us to help her, even if regardless of me with her beforehand friendship, so long as before this duty has not been accomplished, she will not have any disadvantage to us. Let alone, my Spiritual Detection has covered this most wide scope, if she has any bad idea, we also sufficiently immediately responded.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong had not said words that again anything is jealous.

The military officer who keeps ordered, making everybody rest same place.

Soul Engineer Corp is stationed same place, in the normal condition must construct the Soul Guidance Array place, to prepare for that momentarily accepts a challenge. But to Bright Capital City here, naturally has not needed, that will be regarded the certificate of rebellion.

Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace.

Xu Tianran leads the civil and military hundred officers, stands is waiting for outside the imperial palace front door silently.

According to the time, does Ju Zi(orange) this little while should enter a city to be right, how also disappear? Looks at the sky, in the Xu Tianran heart somewhat is puzzled.

In this time, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer was flying from the distant place, falls on not far away, then the half step walked to Xu Tianran, on one knee kneels down.

“Opens reports your majesty, War-God Empress leads Emperor Dragon, Evil Tyrant and Fire Phoenix three Soul Engineer Corp to arrive outside Dacheng, War-God Empress said that to express to your respect, she gives up flying into the city, walks into the city, is coming to the imperial palace direction, but also requires time.”

Listened to these words, on the Xu Tianran face to reappear immediately a smile, Ju Zi(orange), you have not really disappointed me! Not, because own military exploit relies on to favor to be arrogant, this, is very good.

“What direction War-God Empress and will audiences from enter the city?”

That imperial Soul Engineer Corp member hurried to reply.

Xu Tianran nodded, turns around to the civil and military hundred major roads: “The War-God Empress commander army sweeps away all obstacles, opens up territory to develop the earth for the country, the merit in the state, the advantage in the century. Fully realizes the etiquette rarely, is not willing to fly into the city. Goes to greet along with me, to show our military strength.”

“Your majesty, long live, long live and long live.”Shouted " long live " before the emperor to long live. In the civil and military hundred officers, expression varies at this time. But regarding the Xu Tianran words, does not have anybody to question.

The contradiction between empire army and Holy Spirit Cult cannot conceal the truth, including Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui the matter that even attacks the army has fed.

In this regard, will support Holy Spirit Cult without any minister. Regarding this Evil Soul Master clan/sect, the sound of resistance has not reduced.

Military commander say nothing, War-God Empress is a military commander, although she is also an empress, but, under her leadership, the empire armies swept away all obstacles for these years, opens up territory to develop the earth. Sky Soul Empire had been integrated in the domain completely. These many military exploit minutes enjoy, now the overall strength of military has been much more than civil official group. This also makes military commanders the approval to Ju Zi(orange) increase day by day.

Especially this time, obviously is under the Soul Engineer Corp mutiny, killed the Holy Spirit Cult person, War-God Empress has submitted a written statement unexpectedly, a strength undertook. Even must the duty of resignation marshal, can this deeply not move these thoughts originally the pure military commanders? Even if the merit expensive, now has been full of the favorable impression to this War-God Empress.

At this time Xu Tianran said that must receive the bride personally War-God Empress, they will certainly not have any comment.

Said greets, in fact, Xu Tianran leads the speed that the civil and military hundred officers march forward naturally unable to be too quick, welcomes several kilometers. The distant place, lust red Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Ju Zi(orange), appeared in the Xu Tianran field of vision.

The Xu Tianran vision is extremely good, his clear seeing, Ju Zi(orange) has not brought the hard helmet, face wind and frost. On the face is bringing wearily, look is rigid and stable.

In his heart slightly a pain, this is own empress! If can......, She is worth herself treasuring the lifetime woman. For the empire, for own great ambition, she has fought outside, but in oneself innermost feelings as before has actually guarded to her.

Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), can I not love dearly you?

At the same time is thinking, Xu Tianran stepped out to move forward to meet somebody.

Ju Zi(orange) similar acceleration, but has not actually used any Soul Guidance Device, but in big strides ran over to Xu Tianran.

When among them gathers also ten meters, Ju Zi(orange) has knelt to bend down in the place.

“Servant see your majesty.”Her sound brings to sob and shiver, when Xu Tianran arrives in front of her, she has wept copiously.

The Xu Tianran artificial leg now was getting more and more easy-to-use, one step goes forward, grasps Ju Zi(orange) that does obeisance.

Ju Zi(orange) tight is hugging him, actually loudly cries.

Civil official military commanders very tactful not many nearness, but grasps Ju Zi(orange) they to see from Xu Tianran, in your majesty heart, is anything to be actually more important.

Military officers who follows the Ju Zi(orange) together return, all knees down, looks at Ju Zi(orange) to be choked with tears, their eyes also red.

Especially Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xia Xuanchen, thinks that own fellow soldier die in the Holy Spirit Cult hand, after returning to the army, War-God Empress withstood these many grievance for everybody, the mood at this time erupting can be imagined.

Having tears streaming down the face that Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp say nothing, several assistant regimental commanders have cried. Entire Huanglong Soul Engineer Corp was hit remnantly! The commodity that stockpiles disappears without a trace. Regarding Holy Spirit Cult, has not hated compared with them. Initially mutinied in the armed forces, was Holy Spirit Cult that Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp slaughtered teaches the audiences to be most.

Xu Tianran supple sound track: “Does not cry, Empress, does not cry. Comes back well. All take responsibility for you by me.”

Ju Zi(orange) has cried after the long time, loosens with the hug of Xu Tianran, then retrocedes two steps, has worshipped on bended knees once more, salutes upon meeting.

“Feudal official, the eastern expedition grand marshal, three services manager Ju Zi(orange), to your majesty hands over, appointed.”At the same time was saying, she took her commander's seal, holds in front of Xu Tianran.

Xu Tianran has not actually gone to meet, said: “Likes the minister straightening up after bowing or performing the kowtow, all Jiangqing. You are the heroes in empire. This time opens up territory to develop earth for the empire, establishes the rare achievement, waits a minute innate reward. Cuts returns to the imperial palace along with me.”

Surrounded by civil official military commander, the military officers walk in the imperial palace direction together, Xu Tianran is holding the hand of Ju Zi(orange), walks in the forefront. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-3





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


“Your majesty, Servant has not managed well army, please punish.”Ju Zi(orange) said to Xu Tianran in a low voice.

Xu Tianran actually shook the head, turns head to look to Ju Zi(orange), when with initially left compares, Ju Zi(orange) appeared thin and pale, on the extremely fresh-faced tender face, lost several water diversion Run. It can be imagined, in this war, she bore the tremendous pressure. Especially facing Shrek Academy time, even if Xu Tianran, thinks that Shrek Academy also extremely has a headache.

Afterward must face the military officers and contradiction between Holy Spirit Cult, the innermost feelings suffering and pain could be imagined. This time is to lead the army withdraws troops toward, must turn over the commander's seal.

“Empress, why can turn over commander's seal?”Xu Tianran asked to Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) bitter and astringent lowering the head, “your majesty believes Servant, Servant dies the cruelest death not thinks the report. Wish to fight for your majesty, but Servant after is a woman, woman sometimes frail. Goes out to battle, even if the enemy is formidable, Servant is also fearless, there are the confidence its 11 smashing, but, came from internal pressure, made Servant be unable to withstand the load. Servant must be responsible for the mighty force of my empire. But Servant thought that more and more has not protected their abilities, this responsibility is extremely important, Servant did not shift responsibility onto others, but truly confessed the ability to be insufficient, therefore, but also asked your majesty to elect in addition capable. Servant is only willing to keep side your majesty, helping the husband godchild, good companion my Little Yunhan.”

Mentioned the son, the double pupil of Ju Zi(orange) once more was immediately red, Xu Tianran can feel that her hand was shivering.

Yes! She the ability in military aspect is strong, eventually is a woman, a hope defends in the husband and child's woman. What a pity, that child is not I one's own, otherwise,......

The Xu Tianran heart is also slightly a pain, actually in a low voice comforts saying: “You have done very well, something, truly to be solved. You could rest assured that I take certainly responsibility for you. Side me, you most let the person who I trust absolutely. Also is I most intimate person. This coming back, well recuperation, the army also needs the recuperation and supplies. Consolidates us to Sky Soul Empire that side rule. My prime of life, unifies Continent not anxiously when for a while, will go to battle next time once more, I ensure you do not have any extra worries again. At present the military, nobody compared with you are and duty of three services grand marshal, do not retreat.”

Returns to the imperial palace, Xu Tianran to order immediately, the gratuity three services, will simultaneously divide to enjoy the audiences. To Ju Zi(orange), although is only rewarding with food and drink in spoken language grants, but everyone could see that trust of Xu Tianran War-God Empress has not reduced. But this time minute enjoys, without doubt is also your majesty indicates the manner, Holy Spirit Cult, must be given up eventually.

After gratuity the three services, Ju Zi(orange) has first taken off oneself Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, reckless runs to the harem. There, has her son!

Entire three days, Ju Zi(orange) had not come out in the harem, even has not been the people of military has contacted with the military officer who any she leads. Every day on the companion side the son, is a good mother.

Regarding this, Xu Tianran is very satisfied, Ju Zi(orange) almost achieved in his heart to hope all that she made. Able, loyal, trustworthy, not to have the least bit ambition.

Although the dream returns during at midnight, Xu Tianran is also very painful not to be impossible to have the genuine male offspring, but now this situation looks like, all are very good. Even if for the son is the crown prince, Ju Zi(orange) is impossible the matter that makes anything to rebel against. This is good, this, oneself can also feel relieved gives her to control the army, did not fear that has any problem.

Holy Spirit Cult, headquarters.

“Mother, the Xu Tianran gratuity three services, do not have the half minute to mention the army to our slaughtering. It seems like that he is the decision must give up us.”The Zongli Wu complexion is somewhat pale, in eyes, sends out is infiltrating the brilliance of person.

Sitting that Ye Xishui unemotionally in first place, sinking sound track: “Did our commodities shift?”

“Shifted most probably, all changed to that side Sky Soul Empire. Although Sun-Moon Empire has controlled Sky Soul Empire, but wants to clarify that side Sky Soul Empire all situations also to require not the short time, these days, made us to develop sufficiently.”

Ye Xishui said: “This the Cult vitality damages severely, hundred years have not recuperated, do not want to restore to the prosperous time. Xu Tianran, good Xu Tianran young child, to do this matter of dismantling the bridge after crossing unexpectedly. This matter such will not consider as finished. When our commodity all moves away, is being a traitor time.”

“Yes!”Zongli Wu eyes narrows the eyes, in the look, full is the hatred.

He after Huo Yuhao fights, the wound and Martial Soul, moved the basis. Shortly after comes back, obtained the front sad news. Until now, why even if several Titled Douluo that runs from the front does not talk clearly the military to begin to them suddenly. That so-called Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two Soul Engineer Corp were sneak attacked by Evil Soul Master, simply is nonsensical talk. But, others said with certainty.

At that time Ye Xishui felt that some are not wonderful, she attacked the Sun-Moon Empire army, was only exploratory, probe was mainly the Xu Tianran manner.

Xu Tianran to Ju Zi(orange) many castigations, she has not been the hope can exert through oneself to the Xu Tianran pressure, how comes to see him then to process.

But who knows that Xu Tianran actually does not have any sound, but the Sun-Moon Empire army, that returned.

This appears some are not wonderful. Ye Xishui orders a Holy Spirit Cult people immediately, various commodities that obtains from Sun-Moon Empire their secret lair ships to Sky Soul Empire within the boundaries these years.

Who Xu Tianran is, Ye Xishui is clear. So long as some people have hindered him, anyone, he will not hesitate at all costs its destruction.

Holy Spirit Cult also similarly so, now can only make Xu Tianran dread that perhaps only then and Long Xiaoyao, now and Long Xiaoyao lived was saying fortunately, once and Long Xiaoyao died, Holy Spirit Cult definitely will wipe out by even/including Gen.

Therefore, Ye Xishui has decided that must outmigrate the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, then rests and builds up strength. Waited for that the opportunity is born once more.

To begin this matter as for Xu Tianran to Holy Spirit Cult, she was actually not worried that in recent years, Holy Spirit Cult is the Sun-Moon Empire national religion, she is not infrequent in the manpower that in Sun-Moon Empire each influence places, has any slightest sign of trouble, they will obtain the news immediately, subpoenaed Soul Guidance Device, not only the Sun-Moon Empire person will use, she similarly will also use.

“Does mother, how your you plan to counter-attack Sun-Moon Empire this time behavior? Ju Zi(orange) that woman very fierce person, if possible, we should kill her immediately. Thus, Xu Tianran does not have the tiger of tooth. Although I do not like that small girl very much, but actually has saying that she is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, even if compares Star Lou Empire Duke White Tiger, has no time to let.”The Zongli Wu sinking sound said.

Ye Xishui nodded, said: “In valley, I have to strike to kill her plan, but she prepares very abundantly. This Xu Tianran is also orders 100 Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp person guards she, there are these people, I do not have the assurance that one strikes to kill. Sun-Moon Empire these year of development was too quick, the Soul Master strength became more and more unimportant. Individual strength is getting stronger and stronger. No wonder Sky Soul Empire will thoroughly be destroyed by them. Wu'er, you assemble the strengths in our hand. Every seven rings following disciple, all follows the resources. Although Xu Tianran has not dared to move us temporarily, but must provide for a rainy day. My this sees him, I must have a look but actually, how he plans to cope with our Holy Spirit Cult, how having a look at him to face my question.”

At the same time was saying, Ye Xishui stands up, walks toward outside.

Zongli Wu one startled, said: “Can mother, have the danger?”

Ye Xishui said proudly: “On this world, where did not have to have the danger for me truly. Don't forget, your mother stands in the Continent peak. Let alone, your Uncle Long. Sun-Moon Empire wants to cope with us, must think over whether can withstand two Limit Douluo anger.”

“Yes. I handled the following matter first. However, you are all careful, extremely should not be angry. The air/Qi bursts oneself greatly.”Zongli Wu respectful saying.

“Um, you go.”

Zongli Wu. In this ray dim hall, only remaining Ye Xishui people. Her look becomes somewhat is gradually desolate.

“Is worth? Is worth really? You should know that your goal, is forever impossible to be achieved. Even if I helps you whole-heartedly, same is impossible.”The low and deep sound resounds, in the sound is bringing thick disappointed.

“You wholehearted and whole-heartedly has helped me?”Response of Ye Xishui ice-cold.

In the darkness, the big form walked, is Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao has arrived at side Ye Xishui, “Xishui, gives up. Holy Spirit Cult this Evil Soul Master clan/sect is impossible long-time, regardless of appears in any place, will be rally togethered to attack. That Xu Tianran ambition is so big, after he has achieved his some goals, will abandon you. Because of Evil Soul Master issue. By the present situation, in the near future, Sun-Moon Empire can certainly unify Continent, at that time you want to find the opportunity more difficult again. Do you believe that after Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, the matter that their must first do was the same with the past years, did not hesitate at all costs exterminates all Evil Soul Master, did not remain.”

“You shut up!”Saying of Ye Xishui sudden violent anger.

Long Xiaoyao was silent, the breath of Ye Xishui is somewhat rapid.

“Is worth? Is worth really?”Long Xiaoyao sighed was saying.

The final time will soon arrive! The plot rhythm will start to speed up, I will take back all the things of unfolding as far as possible. The novels of 5 million characters, I am also first writing, I will try hard. But if there is insufficient, asked everybody to excuse me. Support thank you. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-1





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


Ye Xishui has turned around suddenly, coldly looks at Long Xiaoyao, “this issue, Mu En had also asked me in the past. Do you want to answer this issue for me?”

The Long Xiaoyao whole body shakes, in the look reveals the intense painful color.

Ye Xishui looks that his ice-cold look gradually is actually having the change, sighed one lightly, said: “Ok, Xiaoyao. Is I am not right, I should not mention again. In the past even if you did again wrong, you have actually used for more than 100 years accompanies me, this friendship, Mu En or Zhongli that old ghost by far cannot achieve. I know, only then you most love my. For these years, in your heart has been struggling for the pain actually. You know that I have wanted to say to you actually very much, I forgave you, did not hate you. But, I did not say, because I feared, once I said to you, you will go to me, at that time, my side again did not have a trustworthy person.”

The pain in Long Xiaoyao look vanished, displaces, is the light tears.

Ye Xishui gently by him, walked arm in arm by oneself during his bosom, “now, I forgave you. In your heart did not need to constrain because of that matter. These many years pass by, you have paid that many for me, you did not owe me anything. Now, you can feel relieved left, does the matter that you want to handle. Does not use because again my this hobbles to affect you.”

Long Xiaoyao bitter and astringent [say / way]: “You had not the good premonition, right?”

The Ye Xishui body shakes.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, said: “These years, you little again threaten me with that matter, but, I had already been used to it side you. Was already used to it, did you know? These many years, I, although will not help you handle these dishonorable matters, but I have protected side you, these matters that in fact, you handle, naturally has my part. We already were a body. This for more than 100 years, saw each time you slaughter and see you to train these Evil Soul Master, in my heart is very painful and is very painful. Even but if, is painful, I had remained, because, in my heart, has defeated to your love. I am willing to protect you, you have done the wicked matter, I do not have the means to prevent. However, if one day, the retribution approaches, I am willing with you, together to undertake.”

The tears, uncontrolled spew out from the Ye Xishui eye pupil, the thump that she makes an effort is striking the chest of Long Xiaoyao.

“Are you so why silly? So is why silly!”

Long Xiaoyao smile embraces tightly her, “because I love you! So is simple, this, was also enough. Right that a little you said that I can also say very much proudly. On this world, nobody loves you compared with me.”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong static waited for three days, transmits from Ju Zi(orange) there without any news. But obtained the gratuity three services news.

Three Soul Engineer Corp were allowed to enter city, naturally, must the place that returns to them to be stationed.

Although the Sun-Moon Empire army has conquered Sky Soul Empire, but these time is also the loss is serious. Especially in high-end strength.

Four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, were hit two, reenforcement 1000 Soul Engineer has been annihilated remnantly. Nine levels of Soul Engineer died four and five. In addition the losses of various types of commodities, the issue in Holy Spirit Cult aspect. It can be said that somewhat shook basis.

Naturally, this vacillation regarding Sun-Moon Empire, not necessarily is not a good opportunity of shuffle. So long as Soul Guidance Technology is in the lead invariably, making up of these losses, what need is only the time.

Bright Virtue Hall has reconstructed, but is not the control in the Jing Hongchen hand. Various research and development invested the massive money.

Various Soul Guidance Technology output to Sky Soul Empire that side, but majority are the civilian aspects, the military aspect does not have any science and technology to flow out, through civilian aspects Soul Guidance Technology, Sun-Moon Empire unknowingly collected the massive wealth from Sky Soul Empire, these wealth are all related with the military.

The development of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device about one step is conducted, Huo Yuhao had inquired Ju Zi(orange), why five and six levels of Soul Engineer can also control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device. Ju Zi(orange) had not said that but Huo Yuhao actually saw a sorrowful color from her eyes pupil at that time.

Under Huo Yuhao ponders over, has thought of a possibility.

To control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, in the current hi-tech means that is enough formidable Spiritual Power that first needs is good.

But how can Spiritual Power promote? Except that grows with the practice, or is this type inborn has beside the Spiritual System Martial Soul person, the method that can use was exciting. The exciting human brain, to achieve to promote the function of Spiritual Power.

If Sun-Moon Empire had similar achievement in the Soul Guidance Technology research, has the possibility to come to promote Soul Engineer Spiritual Power in this way forcefully, thus achieving makes them use the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device goal.

As the matter stands, these Soul Engineer potentials also pressed out to do, in the future in itself cultivates for on is impossible to have the true promotion.

Xuan Ziwen had said to Huo Yuhao, studies enhances human body Spiritual Power this topic through the stimulation way, already had in Sun-Moon Empire, but, had not applied directly, the reason is the side effect is too big. Also does not know now Sun-Moon Empire, in this aspect can suppress the side effect in any degree. If the side effect is huge, then, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp also not necessarily is impregnable.

The gratuity three services, have eaten and drunk extravagantly two days later. Three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp leave behind beyond the necessary manpower, had a vacation.

Even if Soul Engineer in army, is the status is aloof, does not have too many limits. After returning to Bright Capital City, is so. This time vacation is ten days.

How to fill up to strength as for three Soul Engineer Corp, Huo Yuhao is not clear. But from the mood fluctuation of above high-ranking military officer, this seems not the too major problem.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has been covering the entire military compound, for him, compared with a valuable news is, the time that Sun-Moon Empire army time requires to repair and maintain will be quite long.

The military order has issued that side the front, the army was dispatched belongs to the Sky Soul Empire south border, confronts in the border with Star Lou Empire, simultaneously carries on the recuperation. The goods and materials naturally are the original Sky Soul Empire aspect.

Sun-Moon Empire this time should to carry on the recuperation, moreover the time should not be short, even if Ju Zi(orange) their plan fails, most at least within one year, Sun-Moon Empire should not have bigger military action again. This is a rare good news.

However, this news passes on not to have any significance, because this news has no way to confirm. Therefore, Star Luo or Dou Ling, Star Lou Empire, must prepare for meeting head-on particularly as before whole-heartedly.

For these years, Star Lou Empire instead had not borne the pressure of any war, does not know they developed how.

Thinks of Star Lou Empire, latter in Hao unchecked to have thought of that person, when this matter, if can solve Xu Tianran, obtains Ju Zi(orange) within ten years not to encroach upon Star Luo and commitment of Dou Ling two countries. Perhaps, oneself should go back to solve that matter. Also should worship mother.

Thinks of mother, in the Huo Yuhao heart acid. Before that intense hatred vanished, but grieved and pain did not have.

Huo Yuhao can think frequently, if mother is also living, that would be nice! In that case, by own present ability, can certainly help her live the most joyful life.

What a pity, this also can only be thinks. He is very clear, the person dies cannot come back to life. Even if is formidable, was impossible to make mother live.

Therefore, that matter must be solved, oneself will certainly look for him, talks clearly. Must make him rectify names for mother. Also, duchess!

Thinks of the duchess, the hatred in Huo Yuhao heart once more gains ground. Even if can not retaliate others, this duchess he is how regardless of not to let off. If not that duchess, oneself mother will not die.

Dai Huabin was rampant in childhood, but can also be said as, because young innocent, but that duchess? If not her persecution, oneself mother how to go so far as to.

“How Yuhao? What is thinking?”Tang Wutong has gotten hold of the hand of Huo Yuhao.

Had a vacation, she and Huo Yuhao naturally left the military compound, has replaced Huo Yuhao very repugnant that feminine Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, they have changed the ordinary clothes, simple Yi Rong changes the look, this can walk leisurely on the Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City avenue.

The feeling that this type window-shops with ease, Tang Wutong likes really very much, but, she was the earliest possible time had discovered the Huo Yuhao mood changed.

Huo Yuhao shaking the head of gently, “not anything, but has remembered mother.”

Tang Wutong holds in the arms his arm, said: “Do not think many. Waited for this matter to end, I worshipped the aunt with you together, was good?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Naturally was good. However, you should not call aunt, should be the same with me, calling mother to be right. What a pity, mother could not see that she really has such a pretty daughter-in-law.”Here, his eye socket somewhat was red.

Tang Wutong elegant face micro red, said: “When do you plan to marry me?”

Huo Yuhao said: “This matter, if smooth, after we went back to worship mother, I married you. Is good?”

Tang Wutong ill-humored [say / way]: “Did your this propose?”

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “Does not calculate. Waits to turn head officially my sought one time again.”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles, said: “Does not use. We experienced that many, will I really also care about that situation? Good, I promise you. I will contact with the father and mother as soon as possible, when here matter, I......”

“Your what?”Huo Yuhao moves asking that raises.

Tang Wutong “snort|hum”said: “Did not tell you.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-2





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


“Ha Ha!”Huo Yuhao laughs loudly, formerly sad intent in heart completely had relieved, has Tang Wutong in the side, he so is always joyful.

Walks, is walking, they arrived around the Bright Capital City imperial palace. Regarding this imperial palace, Huo Yuhao was also considered as on is quite familiar, after all has gone, not only one time.

He brings Tang Wutong to window-shop outside today, naturally does not have the goal. Three days, the Ju Zi(orange) that side did not have the least bit news, should contact with her, by determining the following motion is.

Huo Yuhao has the self-confidence very much, bringing Tang Wutong to enter the imperial palace to go easily and freely is right.

But, this time, when he arrives at the imperial palace outer wall place, in the heart does not have the production of reason a sense of crisis, this sense of crisis is very sudden, but is very intense.

Had been ready to with him enter Tang Wutong of imperial palace suddenly to discover together that Huo Yuhao stopped.

“We walk.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, walks toward a street on, he remembers very clearly, that street still the roast meat shop, the flavor did is very good. The fragrance that the coal burns is very rich, the pulp fresh and tender juiciness, is the rare good food.

This little while or at noon, the person should not be many. Brought Wutong to eat the barbecue to be good.

The Huo Yuhao memory well, accurately had found the roast meat shop very much, two people wanted the barbecued mutton, to roast the beef, baked other cattle spots the good food. Two glasses of ales.

The free time of a while, the barbecue carried, was eating the barbecue, was drinking the ale, was really the feeling that ten shares received.

“How to go in?”On the Tang Wutong face has not revealed why not takes the post to the expression, but actually quietly passes message asks.

Huo Yuhao passes on the tone channel similarly: “Why does not know, I planned a moment ago, suddenly feels an intense sense of crisis. As if has any matter to occur, or has anything to threaten our existence in the imperial palace. It seems like that Sun-Moon Empire in the Surveying Soul Guidance Device aspect, likely also had the huge progress. This is not the good matter!”

Tang Wutong is also one startled, after their achievement Transcendent Douluo, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power cultivated for own sensation became compares was more formidable before, although Spirit Eyes did not have ninth Soul Ring, but added on Three Eyed Golden Lion to take to his destiny sensation, must say the sensation ability, to dangerous foreknowledge, he absolutely not under Limit Douluo.

On that day encountered two Limit Douluo time, before reason that had not felt that was because that time was impossible to have any danger. But this time, felt that including Huo Yuhao danger, the degree of hazard in imperial palace can be imagined.

Good Sun-Moon Empire! Unexpectedly intrepidly to so situation.

The barbecue eats is very crisp, satisfaction of Tang Wutong face, after having eaten the barbecue, they sit in as in same place, wanted two glasses of ales, slowly is drinking.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power flows swiftly just like the mercury is spreading generally outward, has covered the entire imperial palace, but immediately has not actually entered in the imperial palace. But looks like a huge mind guard shield, covers the entire imperial palace, at the angle of view of upper air bird's eye view, observes.

With this way observation, regardless of the imperial palace has any Surveying Soul Guidance Device to arrange, is impossible to discover his existence.

The surface seems, in imperial palace all tranquil, in waits on the imperial palace shuttles back and forth, patrol soldier very orderly passes through in each place. Sky over the imperial palace, upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device and initially Huo Yuhao came time does not have any difference.

Was my sensation makes a mistake? In Huo Yuhao heart slightly some doubts, no, will not be wrong. Moreover, even if has made a mistake, must believe that is careful for on.

These many years discipline, Huo Yuhao already can achieve mind like still water. The risk will only bring the disaster, anything cultivates is, is the same.

Thinks of here, his mentality was also calm, Spiritual Detection directly does not enter the imperial palace as before, but is observing the imperial palace interior sound silently.

He does not worry, in fact, even if the main body does not enter in the imperial palace, some of his also many methods can investigate the imperial palace, but must look whether has the practical significance.

Quick, the second glass of ales also drank up.

“We go back.”Huo Yuhao stands up, must pay up. Suddenly, his complexion changes, sat formerly position, high sound track: “Server, comes two glasses of ales again.”

Changes to him suddenly, Tang Wutong is not surprised, she understands that Huo Yuhao had certainly discovered anything so, as before will do is very stable, waits for the third glass of ales to send.

Spiritual Detection rapid sharing of Huo Yuhao gives Tang Wutong, making her also be able to see one see.

Under the gaze of upper air angle of view, they saw impressively that the form stride walks toward the imperial palace main entrance together, the whole body covers in the red color long gown, that threatening aura, was extremely strong and obvious.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, she arrived at the imperial palace at this time unexpectedly, must be potential achievement. Sees here, Huo Yuhao they cannot certainly walk, to Ye Xishui, they absolutely does not have any favorable impression, or is the absolute mortal enemy. Even if previous Ye Xishui looked that has not attacked them in the Long Xiaoyao share is also same.

Did Ye Xishui arrive at the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace to do at this time? Must know that now just now passes high noon, regarding most Evil Soul Master, had the considerable restriction to their strengths at this time. The oppression that because Evil Soul Master with the soul related ability, received the high noon is strongest, but this Grim Reaper Douluo, chose unexpectedly arrived at this time. Hasn't considered possibility of fight?

The Ye Xishui stride has walked into the imperial palace, the bodyguard before imperial palace gate all bows to salute, anybody has not dared to stop her, whatever she walks toward the imperial palace.

However, because has the upper air angle of view, Huo Yuhao can see the entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace change clearly.

In the four corners of imperial palace, four groups of rays shine quietly, these rays are not intense, look like most common light, each area is not big, is about the diameter about ten meters. However, the instance when these four groups of rays shone, Huo Yuhao formerly in the heart had presented the sense of crisis appeared immediately again, moreover compared it formerly to want intensely too many were too many.

Heart one tight, next one flickers, Huo Yuhao understands what immediately these rays represent was anything. Don't forget, he is nine levels of Soul Engineer, simultaneously has is linking Limit Douluo is inferior to his intense sensation.

That is......

I went. That is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device!

Isn't this gadget only had in the Bright Capital City four angles? When did the imperial palace internal four corners have? It seems, scales and Bright Capital City four corner/horn compares to be smaller, moreover does not have any Soul Power fluctuation to send out outward, is unable to judge its true prestige energy. But wants to come not to be weak.

Initially, that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device gave Huo Yuhao to make the extremely profound impression. Under inspiring of Xu Tianran, is that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, stiffly 100,000 over people will protect, meanwhile protects him. 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo, moreover is existence of close Limit Douluo, burnt own life to send out ultimate strikes cannot destroy.

But that time, Xu Tianran draws support, as if is also only one of the four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, in other words, if that four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device simultaneously start, might all protect entire Bright Capital City very much, that will be the how terrifying energy!

Naturally, Huo Yuhao also knows that such big and fat energy, is requires the massive time to carry on the reserve, but so, was astonishing enough.

Now, the imperial palace four corners also presented four this gadget, is used to attack is used to defend, protects the entire imperial palace to have more than enough to spare absolutely. Moreover, if these four are really High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, then, but also thinks that this matter, that is, Sun-Moon Empire mastered the technology that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device reduces. Soon, it becomes Soul Engineer Corp will possibly construct the Soul Guidance Array time the energy fountainhead! That is truly fearful matter.

Does not know that now this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device depends upon any strength to carry on the sufficient energy. If depends upon the manpower sufficient energy, as if is not quite realistic, that wants many Soul Master to satisfy its demand Ah?

Sees these, Huo Yuhao cannot certainly walk, he must many observations, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device relate to their following motions. To assassinate Xu Tianran, moves the possibility that in the imperial palace is biggest, not only when the time comes must assassinate, after assassinating is successful, but also wants the whole body to draw back.

But on Xu Tianran controls certainly is controlling four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device methods, when the time comes, once he inspires these formidable energies, even if Limit Douluo, a short time could not injure him, to waste all previous efforts?

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao observation was more careful.

After Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui walks into the imperial palace, has not walked several steps, she stops the footsteps, suddenly looked at one toward the sky.

Her looked that frightened Huo Yuhao to jump, good keen sensation! I use the upper air angle of view, can she be able to see unexpectedly? Limit Douluo, is really immeasurably deep, but, believes where she is absolutely impossible to know us.

Huo Yuhao is comforting itself in the heart, a black form walked from outside.

“Roasts together good fillet to me, wants tenderly, seven points of ripeness. Comes one glass of ales again.”

Huo Yuhao has patted own forehead, Tang Wutong was also reveals, but color. Person who because, this walks from outside, is Darkness Sacred Dragon, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

They look at each other one, felt deep shock.

They saw Long Xiaoyao, was towed by internal combustion engine, Long Xiaoyao naturally also saw them. This super powerhouse stride arrives by their table, the pull chair gratefully took a seat. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-3





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


“Has not thought that we such quickly met.”Long Xiaoyao said with smile on the face.

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Senior cultivates is, is really immeasurably deep! Has not thought that we have so been careful, you can find us.”Although Yi Rong puts on make-up, but Huo Yuhao naturally understands that was seen by Long Xiaoyao, their status are impossible to conceal.

Long Xiaoyao laughs, said: “If I told you, I can bump into you here am purely the coincidence, did you believe?”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, the words of this challenge intelligence quotient, did not need to reply. Carries own ale to hint to Long Xiaoyao, then has drunk a big mouth. The ale bitter and astringent fragrance floods in the chests and bellies immediately, is very comfortable, but bitter and astringent actually for a very long time does not go.

This time comes Bright Capital City, Ye Xishui is one of goals they must cope with!

In this time, the server has been delivering food that Long Xiaoyao wanted.

“Grandpa Dragon, you for a long time have not come! Quickly tastes, our chefs have chosen a position best good fillet to you.”Servers warm puts down food.

“Good, thanks him for me.”Long Xiaoyao he he smiles, takes up on the good fillet is inserting the knife to start to cut the meat.

The servers are tactful retreated, Tang Wutong cannot bear say: “Your such big age, but also eats these many meat, did not fear that couldn't laugh?”

Long Xiaoyao said with a smile: “Person life, eating is the biggest pleasure, was only from the birth to the death, matter that every day must handle. The old men most like eating the meat his entire life, if could not eat the meat, what meaning lived is also having?”At the same time was saying, he starts a liquor meat made chewing motions greatly quickly.

Huo Yuhao looking pensive looks at Long Xiaoyao, said: “I somewhat believe now that you bumped into us really fortunately.”

Long Xiaoyao smiles, said: “Therefore, we have the fate very much, not? You saw that sharing gives me, I know that you have that ability.”

Huo Yuhao helpless has given Long Xiaoyao own Spiritual Detection and Sharing direct release, will see that passes to this elder completely.

The familiarity of Long Xiaoyao to Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace above Huo Yuhao, he also immediately had discovered absolutely still imperial palace four corners is not right.

“Um? What is that? Four corner/horn place brights places?”Asking of Long Xiaoyao doubts.

Huo Yuhao said: “If I have not guessed that wrong, that should be High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Senior Ye is also nine levels of Soul Engineer, you should hear this Soul Guidance Device.”

The Long Xiaoyao discoloration, what “did you say excitedly? Is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device? No, this is impossible. Sun-Moon Empire only in all directions has this thing outside the city. How can, in the imperial palace have?”

Huo Yuhao said: “I also planned today must enter the imperial palace investigation to turn. But before must go, suddenly thought that some not good omen, ran to come to here to drink. Then observed, Senior Ye just had as if gone.”

The Long Xiaoyao complexion was cloudy immediately, drank big ale, eyes has narrowed the eyes, “Sun-Moon Empire background, stems from our unexpected more and more. Continues to observe.”He because of discovering High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device leaves, to continue to eat his beef as before, is drinking the ale.

He is not anxious, Huo Yuhao naturally does not worry, but stems from the respect to Long Xiaoyao, his Spiritual Detection and Sharing is maintaining throughout, but does not have about one step to search to observe. In his heart of hearts, looks certainly forward to Xu Tianran and Ye Xishui hits, that serves his benefit.

A bulk good fillet, the free time of a while, was eaten by Long Xiaoyao cleanly, the ale wanted one cup.

The appearance that Long Xiaoyao ten shares receive, smiling look Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again.

“Mu En, although went, but there is your such one pair the disciple, perhaps under his dwelling place of the dead must smile to awake! If the old man also has your such disciples, this good.”

Has changed others, heard Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo saying that perhaps immediately reckless acknowledged as teacher. But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are Light Sacred Dragon and Dragon God Douluo Mu En disciple, naturally cannot such do.

“You praised.”Huo Yuhao hurries to say.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “It is not the praise, I am earnest. In any case I and Mu En are at your this ages and compared with you, difference was really too far. Even if these kids in your Tang Sect, there are several not to be inferior in us in the past.”

This saying does not know how should meet, Huo Yuhao can only be the smile by right. In fact, until now, he cannot determine actually completely this Darkness Sacred Dragon is the enemy is a friend.

Although Teacher he is protecting himself in secret, is, in fact, he is also the Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder! Has followed side Ye Xishui, helping a tyrant do evil. If Holy Spirit Cult did not have him, impossible in rapidness that such during these years develop. Can have today's scale, cannot separate with Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo absolutely.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, “Little Huo, you looked down upon the old man very much, thinks that the old man and your Teacher gave a name, was his shame?”

Huo Yuhao one startled, looks at Long Xiaoyao that pair of profound eye pupil, his honest [say / way]: “Once for sometime, the younger generation truly like this thought. But afterward understood are more, I guess that you should have the difficulties of any difficult word.”

Long Xiaoyao has smiled, as if smiles is very happy, “is very good, your this kid at least does not have the string to deceive me, this is a very good moral excellence. Although the white lie is also sometimes good. You said a moment ago the difficulties these characters of difficult word time, clearly somewhat thinks otherwise. You thought that difficulties of what difficult word regardless of there is, I shouldn't help a tyrant do evil?”

Huo Yuhao has drunk ale, conceals own awkwardness, “senior, you are blazing with anger and is perceptive of the finest detail, the boy was disrespectful.”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “Has nothing to be disrespectful, the ideas of almost all people are the same with you, even if were initially my family member and friend, is so. I do not have means.”

On the face the smiling face stops, displaces, wipes the haze and pain of not being able to cancel.

“I told you, a lot, were not that simple. The old men for these years, this matter have never said to the person. If did not say, perhaps, again did not have any opportunity. Do you want to listen?”

It can be said that doesn't think? Let alone, gratitude and grudges rival in love of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong to this older generation also very much have the curiosity.

They also nod.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, in double pupil was revealing the color of being at a loss, “this must from long before mention. In the past, I, Mu En and Ye Xishui, in friend of outside travelling time understanding. I and Mu En know earliest, we actually at that time did not hit did not finalize. He is Light Sacred Dragon Martial Soul, I am Darkness Sacred Dragon Martial Soul, inborn am Light and dark each other repel one another. Therefore, we when first meeting, is a match. Our cultivating to be similar, age are similar, how can not draw out the heart of viing for supremacy? Within one year, we competed seven successively, almost every victory and loss were different. Finally, I was worse than him. In seven, I have won three, he has won four, seven games of four victories, he won. Especially at the finals of Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition, he wins the team that I have led. Also at that time, first time has met Xishui, Xishui is only one is repairing for on personally can with feminine Soul Master that we contend with reluctantly.”

Here, on the Long Xiaoyao old face revealed a smile, the past grand appearance was dashing, without doubt was in the life best aftertaste.

“Has hit entire one year, we have actually arrived at one because of a minor matter, becomes the good friend. That time, we run into a village to be persecuted by Evil Soul Master, Evil Soul Master is slaughtering, withdraws the soul and corpse of person cultivates. We from the different directions after that village, saw then pitiful condition, immediately could not bear get rid. After we massacre all Evil Soul Master finally completely, this discovered that unexpectedly is each other. Suddenly, laughs mutually three, henceforth became the friend.”

“Mu En is calm and honest, I want bracelet some. To be honest, back then, I really grew be handsomer than your Teacher. Ha Ha!”Long Xiaoyao has smiled, moreover smiles very happily.

This point, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong do not have the means to refute, although Long Xiaoyao was very old, but actually as before tall, tall and straight, the look can also see the appearance of young time faintly. Huo Yuhao thought in any case, Darkness Sacred Dragon certainly of young time gracefully.

Long Xiaoyao then said: “Afterward we together travelled for pleasure Continent, has experienced many matters, we also frequently collaborate to battle, we at that time surprised discovery, we, although the Martial Soul attribute is opposite, if we coordinate, actually complements one another, the effect is extremely good. Even, again unknowingly, we also used the Martial Soul Fusion technique. The darkness and Light, actually can also Martial Soul Fusion, you say that this is very rarely seen?”

Martial Soul Fusion? Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong look at each other one, this may really be secret, in any case Old Mu or Old Xuan, have not said this matter. The darkness and can Light also unexpectedly Martial Soul Fusion?

From the description of Long Xiaoyao, with, originally Old Mu and Long Xiaoyao that initially narration of Old Xuan had distinguished before that great competition know.

“Afterward, I and Mu En have analyzed. We estimated that reason that can Martial Soul Fusion, because of we two Martial Soul relations. Although is the darkness and light attribute opposes, but we are a little common, that is our Martial Soul is in itself the dragon, has the bloodlines of Dragon Clan. Under the mutual attraction of this bloodlines, completes. However, our Martial Soul Fusion degrees are only 50%. When starts the Martial Soul Fusion technique draws support eruption that the darkness and Light collide to have mutually, can burst out extremely formidable destructive power. May actually unable each other to promote to cultivate is, compares in your Martial Soul Fusion, has very big disparity.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-1





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


“Our relations are getting better and better, became the good friends of telling one another everything. Until one day, us has bumped into Ye Xishui.”

“Ye Xishui young time is very beautiful, is not worse than you, small girl.”Here, the Long Xiaoyao such big age, in the look revealed the color of several points of being enchanted by unexpectedly.

“That time she, youth young and lively adorable. Quick our three became good friends, travels together Continent. The Xishui disposition is very good, our two were blood energy side just young people, quick, we liked her. At that time, I and Mu En have discussed this matter in secret. Since we like her, that respectively depending on skill. Looked that she can like anyone. Regarding this, I am very confident, after all, my look compared with your Teacher many, the ability is not worse than him. I have the confidence to obtain the Xishui heart. At that time I also said to Mu En, regardless of Xishui has chosen anyone, in us, another person must face confidently, everybody good friend. Mu En also agreed.”

“For not, because each other is jealous to destroy our sentiments, one day, I and Mu En found Xishui together, told her to her admire us, hopes that she can make a choice. Like this said in public, always received the suffering to be better a lot compared with our innermost feelings. Xishui seemed frightened at that time by us, she hesitant half of the day, finally has made the choice.”

Appears bitterly and astringently.

Shaking the head of gently, Long Xiaoyao resigned-looking [say / way]: “But, what I have not thought that confidently I, finally actually given up object. What Xishui elects is Mu En. Wild with joy color that I also deep remembering at that time on the Mu En face reappeared now. That does not have the means to conceal. His fierce throwing in the past, grasped Xishui, was hugging her, in airborne transferred three.”

“Although before, has reached an agreement, everybody friend. But at that moment, some of my really collapses. Walking that does not return. Waits for Mu En to pursue my time. I fully run away, because he must look after Xishui, has not pursued eventually.”

Huo Yuhao cannot bear say: “Old Long. Your wait a moment. How I heard that at that time Ye Xishui did not have direct selection your one person. But lets you one year later fights a decisive battle, who has won her with whom! Then you have not gone......”

Long Xiaoyao ridicules saying: “Listens Xuan Zi said that he is only the hearsay. Afterward I and Mu En truly have hit, at that time, Xishui actually already with him in the same place. Just, they have been keeping secret.”

Sighed, Long Xiaoyao said: “My innermost feelings, are actually very proud. I have known. That time, is the most serious attack that I come under since birth. My vacant person walks on the street, unconscious left the city, walks into the wilderness, such person silently is walking, I do not know how long at that time walked. My heart good pain good pain, the pain of being lovelorn, making me be in deep sorrow. At that time, in my heart hated Mu En. Even also hates Xishui, I am not clear, why Xishui will choose Mu En. I am confident. Because not only I grow am better than Mu En, from the Xishui usual look, I can see that she is likes my.”

“Perhaps you can laugh at me, but I have this confidence. But, Xishui eventually has actually chosen Mu En! Is because, he came from Shrek Academy? I am not willingly, really very willingly. But. I cannot go back. Initially I had pledged to Mu En, regardless of she chose anyone. Our good friend. I have not been able to strive for anything again. Therefore, I walked. This walks, is entire one year. Over the past year, I in Continent able to move unhindered, wipe out the bullies and help the down-trodden, come across the matter, started before be more ruthless than is spicier. But in fact, I in listening attentively to their news, Light Sacred Dragon Mu En and Ye Xishui this to lover able to move unhindered Continent, becomes the news of Soul Master younger generation eminent character unceasingly drills into my ear.”

“Time has not made the mood in my heart be able to be tranquil. Finally, I decided that looks for them. I must have a look with own eyes, they now actually happy. I know that I want to walk from this sentiment not to be easy, my disposition was too obstinate, is extremely rigid. Therefore I always want to take a look, regardless of will have anything, I must have a look.”

“Said left meets by chance, I saw them. They are very happy in the together appearance. Mu En sees my time, was somewhat awkward, said many comforted my words, being dead drunk of but also with me drinking. But I actually discovered that that time I, extraordinary tranquility. When I see Mu En, I have not blamed him. Your Teacher is a good person, is a very good person, I entirely believe that he in pursuing the Xishui process, has not used any trick. Likes this matter, truly cannot shift by the idea of person, likes liking, does not like not liking. At that time, I suddenly thought that I as if can put down. This makes me very happy, can put down well. At least, will not injure others again, will not continue to injure itself again.”

“Xishui sees my time, appears very tranquil, has been short one year ago that intimacy, that time she, became very gentle, as if she has completed momentarily became the plan of Mu En wife. I blessed them.”

“I in the heart had filled not the air/Qi of putting down at that time, presented the challenge to Mu En, I hope that can through defeating him smooths my innermost feelings the wound. In front of Shrek Academy one group of people, I and Mu En have hit. That time, I lost, suffers a more disastrous defeat and is very miserable. One year, big of Mu En progress, making one be flabbergasted, perhaps because of the love reason, his overall strength has been higher than a bulk compared with me, naturally, possibly was because I was extremely dispirited that year.”

“We drink, I drink heartily, being dead drunk of drinking. Mu En also got drunk. Midnight, I woke, the headache wants to crack. In room, only then I and Mu En. Xishui disappears without a trace.”

“On table has a paper, places side Mu En, is Xishui writes, above writes, became sober has washed goes to the room to rest again. I know that Xishui has the cleanliness, had not changed.”

“I am taking the paper, unexpected happening walked, arrives the room that Xishui lives, the gate is opening, Xishui as if already rested. I walked, smells a fragrant and sweet aura, how at that time I had not cared, is only the arriving bedside silently, I only want to look at Xishui, then leaves. At that time I think that this is I last time sees her. Later did not see her and Mu En, in order to avoid made itself grieved.”

“I arrive at the bedside, the Xishui sound transmit from inside. She said: Such late woke, waits for you for a long time. Today you may unable to escape from my palm. Why to want, when marries in the same place, today I must with you in the same place. Smelled the fragrance? Hee hee, that is under me the toxin, the spring breeze rain and dew is fragrant.”

“Hears the Xishui sound, I do not dare to move, I feared that was recognized by her, intrudes her boudoir rashly, how this lets me from the place! But listened to her words, I have a big shock. Although the spring breeze rain and dew fragrance I do not know am anything, but guesses that can also guess obtains! At that time I only thought a heat flow broke in the brain instantaneously, the reason tells me, I should turn around run, running distant, found the place to detoxify. But, I eventually have not actually given up, at that time, my heartbeat fierce of, also made has made me regret matter lifelong. The hand of Xishui extends secretly from the bed, has drawn me. In the room was very at that time black, her breath was very rapid, my was also. When I move her flesh, since one year the depressing mood has erupted finally. I throw reckless, like animal.”

Listens to Long Xiaoyao talk about here, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stared in a big way the eye. This......, Really is secret! Let alone Old Xuan does not know, even if Old Mu, is not necessarily clear?

Suddenly, they do not know that should say anything was good, in the Huo Yuhao heart secretly was even rejoicing that at least their this generation, has not encountered this situation.

In a Long Xiaoyao Yin Jin Cup the ale, called out loud: “Comes one cup again.”

Although passed these many years, is very obvious, he cared about the initial matter as before . That pain in his eyeground deep place cannot conceal.

Huo Yuhao said in a low voice: “Senior, the matter crossed was so long, that afterward?”

Long Xiaoyao heaved a deep sigh, “I woke, Xishui also awoke, she sat side me, in the hand was taking a handle short-sword, was puncturing slowly to own chest. I had a big shock at that time, one held the sword blade edge, whatever that sharp sword blade edge shears into my palm, but is unconscious. At that time my heart good pain and good pain. I know that I have cast blunder. But also in this time, outside is transmitting Mu En to summon the Xishui sound.”

Closes eyes slightly, the body of Long Xiaoyao unexpectedly is shivering, hundred years pass by, now recalled that then scene, he was unable to restrain oneself as before, what obviously at that time he faced was the awkward scene.

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, this matter pain far more than is a Long Xiaoyao person, Teacher is the victim, Ye Xishui is also. Whom can this matter blame?

Long Xiaoyao has made a mistake, he should run at that time. But, he deeply is loving Ye Xishui, this is in love with the mistake?

Ye Xishui? The Teacher manner is upright, at that time she prescribed medicine, for goes a step further with Teacher, is intimate with Teacher. Even is very possible for the thought that to cancel Teacher may be jealous, although her behavior radical a point, but, could say to make a mistake really?

As for Teacher, that was the unexpected misfortune, he in the situation of completely not knowing the circumstances of the matter, oneself most beloved woman and best friend unexpectedly......

Said honestly that I cannot write the unprincipled person, because I believe that the human nature was friendly. Also hopes that is really this. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-2





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


Huo Yuhao has not been cruel enough to closely examine again, he will substitute, takes any in three people, he is unable to accept then destiny.

The ale came, Long Xiaoyao is one drinks completely, on old face were many a unhealthy good luck.

The servers hurry saying: “Old Long, your slow point drinks, quickly is not good to the body that drinks.”

Long Xiaoyao shaking the head of gently, “cup takes away, does not drink, we sit a while again.”

“Good, all right, how long you and your friend sit to be good.”The servers have the meaningful glance very much took the cup to get down.

Long Xiaoyao opens the double pupil, bitter and astringent looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the story talks about here, as if had finished.

“I owe Xishui, forever also trades is unclear. That is her first time. I owe Mu En, cannot pay off similarly. Now you understand why I will help a tyrant do evil. clear(ly) knows that Xishui led Holy Spirit Cult loss of life, must protect side her. We once lost the contact a long time, I also think one can forget, but, this is really impossible. Even if dozens years later meets once more, I as before initial all will also remember clearly. Therefore, regardless of Xishui has made anything, I do not have the means to prevent her. Because I do not have that qualifications. After I have made that filling the heavens huge mistake, my life was not itself.”

“Compares in Mu En, the injury that Xishui receives is deeper. Is I, was I have destroyed her life. I love her, I am willing to pay all for her. My life is also her. I can only die in front of her, if one day, she died in front of me, then, I will follow her to go immediately. Therefore, nobody can convince me to leave her. Our lives, had already linked in one.”

The breath of Long Xiaoyao is somewhat rapid, but in the look has actually filled feeling relaxed, these many years, this is his first time says these words.

Although the story has not said that but everyone can guess to obtain, the following process inevitably is the tragedy.

In the Huo Yuhao heart is also five senses mixed Chen, he does not know one are should sympathize with this Darkness Sacred Dragon, is Teacher feels sorrowful. This tragedy, perhaps is really the arrangement of destiny.

Long Xiaoyao stands up, said: “I should walk. Treasures at present the person, young people. Remembers, after you cultivated to be over 98 levels, looked for me. I meet Xishui now.”Then, he in big strides walks toward outside.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong sit in the original position have not moved, the present situation as if became more complex. Listened to Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui story, they no doubt very much sympathize with the Ye Xishui bitter experience, but, the standpoint is impossible to change. Ye Xishui after is the true control of Holy Spirit Cult, under her leadership, Holy Spirit Cult does not know that has massacred many lives, even if Long Xiaoyao, in has the suspicion of helping a tyrant do evil. This is the fact that has no way to ignore.

The hostile standpoint will not change, but were also many a understanding, Huo Yuhao holds on the hand of Tang Wutong, the forced smile said: “Since, I had thought sufficing that our pain receive many, but, compared with Teacher, Senior Long as well as Ye Xishui, we as if are also lucky. At least, we can arrive at the same place finally. I now specially am really satisfied, I even want to lead you to turn around to run, forever is separated from this world, looked for one everyone unable to find our places to go to the life of living in seclusion. Occasionally has a look at the partners, to one's heart's content in the sceneries, that will be the how joyful matter!”

Tang Wutong stands up, arrives at side Huo Yuhao, sits to his leg on, is hugging his neck, own face complete fitting, in he cherishes.

Light soaking transmission, Tang Wutong tender body in slightly is shivering.

A moment ago Long Xiaoyao when narrated that story, she has been constraining her mood, at this time finally completely released.

“Teacher was really too pitiful, I can imagine, initially Teacher when spelled to fight with Innate Body Sect why will go all out. The Teacher strength, will not be certainly easy to receive the wound. Perhaps if to not protect Shrek, Teacher already had chosen the extrication. The distress in the Teacher heart withstanding, be more than and be also more profound Senior Long.”

Tang Wutong was saying in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao nod silently.

Mu En has not said to them and matter between Ye Xishui as well as the Long Xiaoyao. Until the death, he this secret deep burying in his heart of hearts, has not told anybody.

In the mind, was recalling the form of Teacher rickets, was recalling the Teacher old face, the Huo Yuhao also double pupil blushes.

Sun-Moon Empire, imperial palace.

Ye Xishui sits below first place, in hand is carrying tea, silently scented tea.

The Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace has tea very elegantly, selects the high camellia japonica, half fermentation, again by special method secret Zhi. Every year output is few, only then Imperial Family can have.

The light tea lingers fragrant, the Ye Xishui mood as if appears very tranquil, does not have many fluctuations.

On the first place, Xu Tianran sits on seat of honor, side him, Ju Zi(orange) that sits.

“Old Ye. This time matter, perhaps is really only a misunderstanding, but also asked Old Ye to spare and not punish too severely. I am willing expensive to teach some compensations. Expensive teaches to have any need, performs to raise.”Xu Tianran appears very polite, be with smile on the face saying.

Sat in his Ju Zi(orange) clear(ly) yellow court lady style of dress, did not say a word, without any response.

Ye Xishui puts down in the hand tea, the vision looks to Xu Tianran Ju Zi(orange), shows a faint smile, said: “Your majesty, if I with your important person? I want a person. How?”

Xu Tianran facial expression slightly one stiff, although he clearly knows what Ye Xishui said is, but asked something already known: “Whom do you want?”

Ye Xishui smiles cold, “I want the empress's on Holy Spirit Cult with me to walk. Does not know whether?”

Ju Zi(orange) tranquil sitting there, obeys the Xu Tianran instruction as before completely the appearance, expression not any change.

Xu Tianran is actually the complexion slightly changes, said: “Old Ye, this is not perhaps good. My harem is void, only then empress. Our affection is deep, this time matter, confusing. Was inferior that we attended to carry out the affective tone to investigate thoroughly first said again, how?”

Ye Xishui beckoned with the hand, said: “Did not need to investigate, with a wish to incriminate had no lack of a pretext. I have not thought you will investigate clear anything. Moreover, from your majesty all sorts of achievement, actually I was also clear your majesty choice is anything. Other was needless saying that your majesty idea, I understand, understood. Was joked a moment ago. Since your majesty chooses to give up us, that old body no other strove, but hopes that your majesty can also let off our Holy Spirit Cult. The old body is willing to lead Holy Spirit Cult to leave empire, goes to other source. Only strove for safely.”

Xu Tianran surprised looks at Ye Xishui, is this Grim Reaper Douluo that he knows? This really likely is not the words that this Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder can say. Was this? So will say why?

Ye Xishui carries the tea, has drunk one, sighed, “old body was tired. This whole life, has accomplished nothing, only wants in the final days, static pass. Your majesty, in recent years, although Holy Spirit Cult has brought many troubles to you, but you have to acknowledge, we to some of your country merits. We hope that these merits can make your majesty teach means of livelihood to me. The old body satisfied.”

Xu Tianran laughs, said: “Old Ye, where words you are. Expensive teaches what course to follow, naturally is decided by you. Whatever, Holy Spirit Cult is our partners. The name of this national religion, perhaps......”

Ye Xishui said with a smile: “Some unwarranted reputations, do not want. Your majesty takes back freely is. I today, but to indicate the manner to your majesty. We will not retaliate anything again, but hopes that can obtain safely. All has been said that your majesty takes care, old body this left.”

Ye Xishui stands up, gradually walks toward outside, her step even somewhat limps, seems an old appearance.

Xu Tianran stands up, makes a hand signal of seeing off, but the under foot has not actually moved the slightest, but gazes after this Grim Reaper Douluo to go out of the main hall slowly, goes to outside.

Ju Zi(orange) doubts looks to Xu Tianran, said in a low voice: “Your majesty, what she said is real?”

Xu Tianran beckoned with the hand, on the face reveals one to sneer, “might tiger be a vegetarian? She more shows weakness, explained that the issue is bigger. Her knowledge must lull us, our plans not only need carry on, but must as soon as possible.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the ray dodges, “that present......”

Xu Tianran has selected, the right hand makes an effort to wield downward.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up suddenly, turns around to bringing up the rear walks.

Ye Xishui goes out of the main hall front door, on the old face is revealing color of the feeling relaxed, should say that said finally. One should leave. No matter that Xu Tianran whether believes that oneself said that truly is the heart-to-heart talks.

These many years, cross are good tired and quite to be really tired. Teacher, that dies expensively, whatever, I did right by you. The following day, I only want to leave itself, with him!

Ye Xishui once more starting to walk step time, the dragon clock senile already vanished, displaces, is a liveliness, after gave up all, lively.

On her face is having a smile, originally pale were even many a ruddiness. Finally can put down all.

I always thought that any person, will have good side, everyone, has own story, has own pain and sadness, joyfully with being in love. On this world, who can say, oneself definitely are right? 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-3










Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


At this time is in the afternoon, the sun started in the west, but the sunlight is as before intense, the choice enters the palace this time, for must express own sincerity, but in fact, regarding this cultivated for Evil Soul Master, although high noon will affect, but affects absolutely is not big.

“DDD drop!”The grating alarm sound, does not have omen suddenly has made a sound. Spreads over the entire imperial palace.

The Ye Xishui lively footsteps have stopped suddenly, the double pupil that she felt relaxed becomes piece of ice-cold, she knows that what she is then going to face is anything.

Xu Tianran, is not willing to let off him eventually. One have given him such good opportunity, even may be the final opportunity, he has made the choice. Xu Tianran, good, good! I must have a look but actually, why you leave behind the old body.

Gives a calm smile, the Ye Xishui right hand refers to the day, stands is freezing, the back, blood red light shadow reappeared quietly, is her Martial Soul, Blood Soul Devil Puppet.

An incomparably formidable mind pressure is centered on the body of Ye Xishui, blooms suddenly outward, in the surrounding hundred meters, all constructions change into the powder powder in the face of the oppression strength of this terror unexpectedly, eliminates a stretch of open area rapidly.

Since has gotten angry, Ye Xishui does not have the plan that any must show mercy.

In this time, four glares are shooting up to the sky, break in the midair, these four rays are very powerful, actually presents seven color gloss, after the ray ascends to heaven, to the central condensation, then changes into a huge illumination rapidly, covers the entire imperial palace completely. Suddenly, the imperial palace has covered enchanting seven color gloss, light arrives just like the god general.

This feeling without doubt is very wonderful, but Ye Xishui actually excitedly discoloration.

Is nine levels of Soul Engineer, although she for manufacturing Soul Guidance Device is famous, but the attainments in Soul Guidance Device aspect is also extremely profound. Let alone, this ray makes her be familiar, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device didn't she possibly know? Because knew that she is also clearer this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device the might to be fearful. That is can protect the strength of entire city!

A strength of person is strong, eventually humanity. To Ye Xishui this level, she had even guessed correctly, even if Gods that in that legend has, the strength also has the limit, just has surmounted the level of person.

But this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is actually nearly can increase infinitely, naturally, if increases to the certain extent, when including the earth is unable to withstand its prestige to be able, perhaps, it can the entire world destruction.

Increases infinitely, exists theoretically, in the reality is not necessarily able to appear, but, copes with a limit to bring to light, was enough.

Forms from imperial palace float, jet black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, threatening oppression strength, intense Soul Power fluctuation.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp! The thumb in Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector, the strength of genuine ruler.

Moreover, besides them, surrounding some, has the massive Soul Engineer lift-offs similarly, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, all arrived. At this time in this imperial palace, gathered over 2000 high level Soul Engineer unexpectedly. But most inner loop, an old man float in midair, vision brilliant is looking steadily at Ye Xishui.

“Hole! virtue! Bright!”Ye Xishui saying speak unhurriedly and clearly.

Kong Deming vision cold visits her, “Old Ye, I have known that one day we will resort to arms, but has not thought that on this day can come is so quick.”

Ye Xishui has smiled, her laughter is very incisive, listens not to be interesting to listen to anybody ear, “! Actually the old body also already thinks that will have appeared on this day, but has not thought that the Xu Tianran young child actually does not worry about the former friendship. Hey and hey.”

“It is not I do not worry about former friendship, because, we did not have the former friendship to discuss. These years, how many civilians your has Holy Spirit Cult massacred our country? This time, you kill my army, is cold my officers' heart. May accomplish the whole task at one stroke, because actually your sneak attacks have to withdraw troops toward, Old Ye, you may know that your Holy Spirit Cult has caused the how massive loss to the country? Don't I worry about the former friendship? Then, I ask you, Sun-Moon Empire that initially, that Innate Body Sect sect master Du Busi came killed my time, you and your teaching audiences where? At that time, thinks that you are also hoping I was killed, empire one chaotic, was favorable for you, did I have to speak incorrectly?”

Xu Tianran puts on bright yellow Humanoid Soul Guidance Device float in the midair, the whole person by that golden yellow Humanoid Soul Guidance Device gable, side him, at least ten nine levels of Soul Engineer was being revolved completely, Ju Zi(orange) in him behind, falls behind half position.

On the face the smiling face does not reduce, Ye Xishui said with a smile: “With a wish to incriminate has no lack of a pretext, let alone, by my Holy Spirit Cult reputation, even if throws these filthy water on us, we could not explain. War-God Empress, is really good to plan! Does not know when our Holy Spirit Cult did offend you?”She has not gone to look at Xu Tianran, actually fell the vision on Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) said indifferently: “Your Holy Spirit Cult has not offended me, what offends is our army and my people, the state of our country. The evil strength cannot exist in the universal empires. Any reason, our army of your Holy Spirit Cult attack, now is whether or not unimportant. More importantly, Holy Spirit Cult must forever vanishes from this world, can never exist again.”

On the Ye Xishui face reveals color suddenly, “original, your majesty must perish my Holy Spirit Cult, the old body understood. Really big weaponry! Father of Kong Deming Soul Engineer, these many acquaintances, these many Soul Engineer, to deal with an old body person, it seems like, your majesty attach great importance to the old body, the old body is very grateful. Does not know that your many people, do keep under the old body today? If I walked today, in the future, I every month, will destroy one to belong to the city of empire, making many Wraith Soul encourage my strength, turns into the ghost legendary creature till Sun-Moon Empire completely.”

Her smiling said these words, but, nobody thought that she was the lies, this was the most fearful place. A powerhouse of hysteria is not fearful, what is fearful, what her hysteria is that sane.

Xu Tianran complexion big change, if Ye Xishui now Tianzhen ran, then, really can be the disaster of empire, in his heart, raises a regret. After is Limit Douluo! Even if cannot use for oneself, should not become her enemy, this consequence, is extremely really hard to withstand.

However, things have gotten to this point, has not regretted after the fact may eat, whatever, must work. Let alone, Xu Tianran does not believe completely that under this aspect, this Grim Reaper Douluo also has the possibility of going on living at present. In order to arrange this trap, Sun-Moon Empire has paid the enormous price.

Then by safety masks of four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device arrangement, not only to guard against Ye Xishui runs away, to guard against Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao comes to rescue.

They even calculated including the Long Xiaoyao mentality, Long Xiaoyao must not be Evil Soul Master, he had his bottom line, in any event, by his status, is will not get rid to the general publics absolutely. After killing Ye Xishui, how Darkness Sacred Dragon will retaliate, that was a different matter. In news that in Ju Zi(orange) has, Darkness Sacred Dragon when the previous attack, was injured, and should be heavy. Therefore, this time, it can be said that once in a thousand years opportunity.

Kong Deming sighed, said: “Ye Xishui, clashes your words, you have to take the [say / way]. Today, the old man must enforce justice on behalf of Heaven, extinguishes your Blood Soul Devil Puppet.”At the same time was saying, Kong Deming lifts the hand toward Ye Xishui, golden light projects from his hand together suddenly.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, lifts the hand similarly, toward Kong Deming direction one finger, immediately, the blood light, shoots to go toward the Kong Deming electricity together.

Terrifying Soul Power fluctuation from addendum circle unceasing braving, that is Soul Engineer in the savings strength, starts the omen of linkage attack. Facing Grim Reaper Douluo, must whole-heartedly. The strength that all can use, must use.

The blood light arrives at beyond the Kong Deming body first five meters, had been blocked by golden light, the innumerable Wraith Soul whinning sounds resound through the sky, but is actually not able to enter that golden light half minute.

But that Kong Deming sends out said golden light, actually in suddenly split from the Ye Xishui also five meters places, changes into golden Halo, on the wrap toward Ye Xishui went.

The body of Ye Xishui suddenly became illusory, but dodged, has been separated from that golden Halo range, golden Halo fell in the ground, vanished does not see. Even has not left any trace on the ground.

The Ye Xishui incisive laughter resounds through the imperial palace, both hands lifts upwardly, back Blood Soul Devil Puppet the blood puts immediately brilliantly, intense blood light burst out suddenly, from the sky changes into bunch of huge Wraith Soul, toward flushes away in all directions. Each group of Wraith Soul have the head size, altogether is 12 groups. Their, in the entire imperial palace has the feeling of reactionary reign of terror.

Blood Soul **! This is Ye Xishui becoming famous secret art, each Blood Soul ** Blood Soul that refines, is undergoes her over a hundred years of practice, 10,000 Wraith Soul swallow under the secret technique function mutually, finally the surplus most powerhouses, can achievement Blood Soul. But this Blood Soul also needs long-term feeding Wraith Soul, can become more formidable.

Blood Soul just took shape time, be only the fingernail size, can raise the head size, this must swallow many Wraith Soul to achieve Ah? not only, moreover must swallow Wraith Soul, but must swallow Wraith Soul of powerhouse, Wraith Soul is more formidable, Blood Soul grows is also quicker.

Today's third! Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-1





Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


This Blood Soul delays to do, the formidable resentment direct soul will fall into enemy hands, cultivates for insufficient, even the soul will be attracted directly in its severe Xiaosheng, was swallowed. Extremely overbearing, vicious.

The fight from the beginning, Ye Xishui will press the bottom the thing to display, obviously she was prepares to go all out.

Sees that bunch of Blood Soul, the Kong Deming complexion also becomes serious, " person, has blocked, cannot make them run out outward. " Was saying at the same time, his both hands lift, sends out together golden light respectively, simultaneously surrounds two groups of Blood Soul.

Ten nine levels of Soul Engineer side Xu Tianran separate rapidly, is one person controls one group similarly, displayed itself to press the bottom the unique skill.

Ye Xishui sneers, in double pupil, blood brilliant Sheng, in an instant, her long hair turned into the scarlet unexpectedly completely, back Blood Soul Devil Puppet floods into her within the body suddenly, dissolves with her as one.

Immediately, the Ye Xishui body rises suddenly one time, the glittering and translucent carving scarlet makes her seem like, terrifying blood energy that the ruby congeals becomes turns wells up, seethes with excitement just like the wave generally outward, blooms.

" Bloodshed is boundless! " Ye Xishui screamed one.

The surrounding construction, moves bloodshed, instantaneously on smiling face. But this bloodshed, blots out the sky general, toward distant place airborne spread in the past.

Worthily is Limit Douluo, worthily is Holy Spirit Cult most formidable Evil Soul Master, under the so disadvantageous aspect, she likely will actually want to present all Soul Engineer by strength of the to catch the whole lot in a dragnet! Is this what kind self-confidence?

Xu Tianran anger snort|hum, in hand were many a handle exquisite scepter, the scepter length only then the ruler, above has seven colored gems of fist size. The scepter holds up, toward Ye Xishui direction one finger. Immediately, in the sky, seven color light beams, directly soar the Ye Xishui bombardment to go together loudly.

That is the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device strength, initially. He relies on Bright Capital City four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device defends, protects the common people. But this time, he actually uses these small High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device to attack.

Ye Xishui has not dodged, in fact she did not fend. Both hands make a movement of lifting, immediately, that bloodshed upward to rush forth, changes into at the same time the giant shield, keeps off to seven color glares that drops from the clouds.

" Bang! " Fierce thunders crack, the powerful shock-wave erupts suddenly. Encircles to release Soul Guidance Protective Cover in surrounding 11 nine levels of Soul Engineer fully, in addition airborne Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer collaborate to release the guard shield, completely prevents this shock-wave, does not let its outward diffusion.

The terrifying explosion then just started, a series of thundering resound unceasingly. The bloodshed turns wells up, has withstood the bombardment of that seven color rays unexpectedly stiffly. However, the discerning person can actually be able to see that bloodshed is reducing, under the bombardment of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Is changing is small.

Sneers to reappear on the face of Xu Tianran, even if Limit Douluo, contends with High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device absolutely not to have the opportunity with individual strength.

Today he biggest relying on, in fact is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, but Soul Engineer, more important protects him, as well as entire imperial palace. This kills the bureau. Is the first experiment, stares the merit, in the future, the development of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device will invest a huger money.

Ye Xishui does not know absolutely that in the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device research, Sun-Moon Empire invested has surpassed any time in the past fund. Is headed by Kong Deming, seven nine levels of Soul Engineer are the core component members of research, the material of consumption, money, is immeasurable.

This is the Soul Guidance Technology strength.

The Ye Xishui form suddenly appeared in the midair, as before was the blood red. The body of Kong Deming is almost flickers to move is keeping off before her.

They collided suddenly.

Kong Deming flying upside down, the whole body is actually golden light four shoots. But Ye Xishui is returns airborne.

Surroundings, several rays simultaneously toward her body bombardment, but, the linkage attack arrived finally.

The linkage attacks of surrounding three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp are good, that is three glares, what is most fearful is most inner loop, by 300 the linkage attack that is worn Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer to launch, that is together jet black such as the beam of black ink, like the water jar, the place visited, in the air has left behind a deep crack thickly directly, moreover is unable to close unexpectedly.

Even if by the Ye Xishui strength, when feeling the prestige of that black beam can, the complexion changes. This strength, already completely not under that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device in the attack that sent out. Does the Sun-Moon Royal Family soul lead the group to be unexpectedly formidable to so the situation? No wonder Xu Tianran dares to begin to oneself.

Has the idea is a matter, how to deal is a different matter.

The red light twinkle, three groups of Blood Soul shake off the fetter suddenly, has blocked a linkage attack of Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp respectively, three groups of Blood Soul have sent out the sad and shrill pitiful yell, but that three attacks actually stiffly was blocked. But Ye Xishui, actually directly suffered that to come from the attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp.

Hit! The Xu Tianran great happiness, is formidable regarding the linkage attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, he is clear. That is not the manpower can contend, even if Limit Douluo is not good.

Described with the appraisal of Kong Deming is, even if had ten levels of Soul Engineer to exist, was also impossible to block such attack. Limit Douluo is not good, perhaps, only then the strength of gods, living that may resist.

Did Ye Xishui die?

The blood light is defeated and dispersed! From the sky disperses, vanishes. Has not left any trace, even Ye Xishui has not sent out a pitiful yell.

But, did she die really?

" Be careful, she has not died. " Kong Deming gives a loud shout suddenly.

[!] Blood Soul is exploded suddenly by nine levels of Soul Engineer are limiting, changes into the blood rain to scatter in all directions, the body of Ye Xishui in that group of blood light leaves the womb, but 0.1 palms light according to airborne.

Sees only on that nine levels of Soul Engineer to shine several rays one after another, defense guard shield class ability that all was stimulated, but under flickers, his chest place presented blood red being in charge, the whole person chest caves, the mouth spurts blood flying upside down, is in airborne, one group of Blood Soul separate from Ye Xishui within the body, the hate and soul when swallows he died presents stiffly.

Suddenly, Ye Xishui whole body blood brilliant Sheng, toward that nine levels of Soul Engineer inspiration, intense blood energy was swallowed into within the body by her immediately, but that nine levels of Soul Engineer actually turned into a piece of flying ash, from the sky dissipates, terrifying pressure also in instantaneous ascension. Intense blood light from the sky glitters, reverberation.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer such died. Moreover, his strength has also encouraged the Ye Xishui strength.

This is the Limit Douluo Evil Soul Master terrifying ability, even if that formidable linkage attack, cannot kill her, instead while mounting to have killed nine levels of Soul Engineer by her.

However, Kong Deming notes, formerly 12 groups of Blood Soul, turned into 11 groups now, obviously, attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is by no means useless.

The terrifying attack flickers the arrival below, a glare arrives, seven color halos reverberate in the sky, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device second time launched the attack.

Some face muscle distortions of Xu Tianran, like Ye Xishui have not thought strength that he controls already so formidable, he has not thought that this Limit Douluo displays really fully, so will be unexpectedly terrorist, under the hopeless situation, already can easy striking kill own nine levels of Soul Engineer.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, the body turned into the blood red instantaneously. Flash when that seven color rays drop, her whole body exploded the blood fog to vanish.

Also is one group of Blood Soul explodes, with formerly was almost exactly the same, her palm struck in nine levels of Soul Engineer fronts, looked like crushed bean curd, killed that nine levels of Soul Engineer, swallows its blood energy and soul. Although Blood Soul because of this, but has been short of one, but Ye Xishui imposing manner was actually more powerful.

What secret technique is this? Unexpectedly is so terrorist? The reduction of Blood Soul, actually likely is she in the savings strength! This was really too fearful, where because nobody can see her limit.

" Compels Blood Soul, all compels into. Attacks Blood Soul! " Kong Deming is directing loudly.

Nobody knows where the Ye Xishui weakness, can only attempt, from the beginning, he does not think that can easy striking kill Limit Douluo. Otherwise did not need to make so fully prepares. Now they must do, but carries on the protracted war. In the protracted war, drags gradually this Limit Douluo.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, the body changes into myriad blood shades suddenly, to plunders in all directions.

Just prepared to launch the linkage attack imperial Soul Engineer Corp to lose the goal of locking immediately, wanted to lock Limit Douluo, sometimes, was impossible.

However, several linkage defense guard shields are effective, has blocked the corrosion of these blood light stiffly. Guard shield nine levels of Soul Engineer also while this opportunity, in abundance withdraw to the guard shield edge.

The blood light dissipates, Ye Xishui reappears the flash, the guard shield compresses suddenly inward, this is other nine levels of Soul Engineer under Kong Deming the consistent movement that leads to make.

Formidable oppression strength extrudes inward, the terrifying prestige can promote 0.9 levels of Soul Engineer to move to shape changing positions instantaneously instantaneously, while linkage defense that outer layer imperial family Soul Engineer Corp rapidly remove, has fallen back on the addendum circle.

The plan must annihilate it at one fell swoop, since now could not achieve, uses the overall strength to tow her. This is the second plan.

In this second plan, most important must to remove.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer died they, such casualties speed is Sun-Moon Empire cannot withstand absolutely. On the Xu Tianran forehead is blue vein suddenly Tiao. If were not worried that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is overheated, he wishes one could to continue to launch attacks .752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-2





Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


Ye Xishui float in midair, on face is revealing the color of disdaining, around the body, ten groups of Blood Soul are circling regarding her.

“Two nine levels of Soul Engineer Wraith Soul, are really the good things! However, Soul Engineer is Soul Engineer, in the soul intensity, was far with the true Titled Douluo difference. Really somewhat was a pity.”At the same time was saying, she was also sighing shaking the head, on audiences Soul Engineer foreheads that looked at blue vein suddenly Tiao.

Ye Xishui coldly looks at the Xu Tianran direction, “wants to kill me, that continues to attack, actually having a look at you to consume many strengths. What a pity, you as before are actually not necessarily able successfully.”At the same time was saying, the body of Ye Xishui falls suddenly to the ground.

A palm pressed in ground.

Intense blood light bursts out in the ground, the grating bellow underground resounds in the entire imperial palace, reverberation.

Xu Tianran and Kong Deming are the complexion change. They understand certainly that Ye Xishui must do. The airborne defense, she cannot break, wants to is impossible. However, even if High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device cannot protect the earth. Although the imperial palace underground has the extremely powerful defense, but this defensive power is insufficient. At least is not enough to defend Limit Douluo.

The earth is shivering, Huo Yuhao and ground of Tang Wutong under foot similarly is also shivering.

They in the roast meat shop, have not stood on the street, is the same with many people, looks at airborne is sparkling seven color light barrier.

The people do not certainly know that what happened, in their opinion, in Sun-Moon Empire has this unusual scene to be normal. Soul Guidance Technology strikes root in the hearts of the people here.

Huo Yuhao brow tight wrinkle, from the angle of view of upper air, he can see the lots, the guard shield that but, that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device forms, his Spiritual Power cannot go, can only sees inside some situations.

The earth shivers, he guessed correctly indistinctly Ye Xishui is doing. Yes, the earth perhaps is the way that she can escape only. Xu Tianran in this aspect really not any preparation? But Soul Guidance Protective Cover wants to release under the ground, is not impossible, but actually extremely costs the time . Moreover the intensity is also hard-to-control. Can be able to block Limit Douluo?

Tang Wutong turns head to look to Huo Yuhao, said: “You hope that who they do win?”

Huo Yuhao is almost [say / way] without hesitation: “Xu Tianran.”

Tang Wutong surprised [say / way]: “You listened to the Long Xiaoyao senior to narrate among them a moment ago the story, to Ye Xishui senior not any sympathy?”

Huo Yuhao said: “I sympathize with their bitter experiences very much, but, if I, I as before will also kill Ye Xishui. This matter has not resulted in discussed. Can you imagine? Once violent anger Limit Douluo level Evil Soul Master escapes the prisoner's cage, what happened? Although I to a Sun-Moon Empire not favorable impression, but does not hope that saw the innocent common people were slaughtered, the loss of life picture crazily. Therefore, Ye Xishui must die. If she clashes, then, we must not hesitate at all costs strikes to kill her. Even if facing the Old Long anger, refuses to balk.”

Categorical that Huo Yuhao these words said that without any hesitant.

Tang Wutong nod of silently, said: “Fight started a while, why does Holy Spirit Cult nobody aid Ye Xishui? Did they fear death this degree?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “No. This definitely is the Ye Xishui arrangement, she is easier to withdraw, but if Holy Spirit Cult comes the person, can resist that four Soul Engineer Corp? Only can bring death in vain, Holy Spirit Cult these times are the loss were serious recently, Ye Xishui makes certainly them leave first, oneself enter the imperial palace. Really was a pity, until now, where we do not know the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters. The words that otherwise goes to now, will certainly find many opportunities to start.”

In this time, suddenly, is falling in front of Huo Yuhao together black light. Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, black light will catch.

That is a black paper, above wrote with the Bai Se (White Color) pigment, looks at the above character, in the Huo Yuhao eye has flashed through surprised, is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to walk.

In the imperial palace, the ground after was shivering fiercely for ten several seconds, is peaceful, a depth of ten zhang (3.33 m) endocrater, that appears in the ground.

Under the imperial palace unexpectedly is the midheaven, this palm, has laid out a burrow directly.

Ye Xishui without hesitation fell, for this reason, she resurfaces the price that two Blood Soul have exploded.

Although in the mausoleum chamber also possibly has institution, but, most minimum that inside terrain is complex, only then uses these complex, she has the possibility of escaping. Therefore, even if Xu Tianran in underground has any arrangement, she must go to face.

Ye Xishui falls underground. Xu Tianran sighed, shaking the head of gently. Then the corners of the mouth place reveals to wipe the smile that the crafty plot prevails. Waves, the airborne seven color rays disperse suddenly, but he is the earliest possible time brings Ju Zi(orange) to fly to the upper air. Not only he. Kong Deming, nine levels of Soul Engineer as well as four Soul Engineer Corp, all soars, flies toward the upper air.

The black form suddenly appears in sky together, is almost without hesitation leaps up toward the imperial palace. Low and deep dragon roar sound along with it resounding.

Xu Tianran clearly saw that black form, but has not actually issued any order to prevent him to enter, on the face instead reveals more smiling faces.

Seven color rays shine, four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device simultaneously burst out compared with formerly a more intense ray. This time, below the ground in imperial palace, as if turned into one piece seven colored.

“Bang”thunders in the mausoleum chamber resounds. The blood light shines together.

Seven color ray balls that Ye Xishui suddenly appeared fly outrageously, cannot clash eventually.

Xu Tianran has smiled, “Ye Xishui, you have not certainly thought that I will plan you with an imperial palace for the price. I am very clear, want to kill you to be going to pay the how huge price. Consumption, but forces you to take risk. Otherwise, consumes, what special ability if you do have again what to do? Therefore, here, is your tomb. Perhaps you cannot think that the true function of my four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, is becomes your coffin, protects Bright Capital City, does not make withering away of imperial palace affect Bright Capital City all. Has not thought that Darkness Sacred Dragon is such cordiality is unexpectedly grave to you, this is really good cannot the good result, bye, Grim Reaper Douluo, look your god of death. Dragon God Douluo is buried along with the dead, is really good.”

At the same time was saying, Xu Tianran presses to start suddenly under a scepter button.

The entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace first is slight shivered, under the imperial palace ground, erupted a red-orange brilliance suddenly, this red-orange, just started was very weak, but emitted from the cracks of imperial palace ground outward. But quick, these cracks start to increase, has many rays to raise from inside. Intense red-orange rays and four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device seven color rays complement each other fresh splendor.

Slight trembling sound resounds unceasingly, must know that this is under the protection of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, shake that passes on as before, this must how terrifying shake strength have so the scene!

Huo Yuhao just and Tang Wutong did not go out far, did not have the Bright Capital City range, they have almost turned also round, see, was huge red-orange bright sphere, but position that bright sphere was, was the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace!

The Huo Yuhao complexion immediately becomes a paleness, “good ruthless and good ruthless Xu Tianran, he takes an imperial palace as the price unexpectedly, copes Grim Reaper Douluo. Old Long, how Old Long did not know, we went back.”Huo Yuhao without hesitation draws Tang Wutong to run on the round trip. Long Xiaoyao does not know any situation, Ye Xishui definitely was the downcast in the imperial palace. This is Xu Tianran must kill strikes, he very much has certainly confidence.

At this moment, the mentality in Huo Yuhao mind was completely clear, he understands finally Xu Tianran planned Ye Xishui with what kind of plan.

The imperial palace, is a complete trap, in that imperial palace, arranged certainly nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, actually as to have arranged several, he does not know, but wanted to get rid of Limit Douluo, absolutely was not one and two can achieve.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device from beginning to end is a fraud, lets the line of sight of Ye Xishui continuously on this Soul Guidance Device.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is truly strong, but, is used to defend, it nearly is invincible existence, is used to attack time looks like or has disadvantage to exist. Xu Tianran resists nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball large explosion with it surely! Meanwhile, explodes is compressed in certain space, the destructive power can only be the unceasing enhancement, strengthens to an extremely terrifying degree. Grim Reaper Douluo, ended!

No wonder, no wonder when close imperial palace will have that intense sense of crisis. If at this time, oneself and Wutong stealth in the imperial palace, that definitely will also suffer as an innocent bystander! Even if runs promptly, definitely will be discovered by these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses, the bitter experience besieges. Facts showed that own sensation is correct, has not entered in the imperial palace, has rescued itself and Wutong life.

The red-orange ray is still unexpectedly strengthened, day after day the ray of airborne sunlight had been inferior by it, if from the upper air bird's eye view, will certainly see at this time that Bright Capital City Core Area territory were many a Sun, is glittering intensely according to red ray Sun, this Sun that magnificent, but, in that the range of Sun, was flooding the death magnificently.

Xu Tianran flown high, although defers to the thorough computation, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device can resist this large explosion, but he flies high, by far. The gentlemen are not built on under the danger wall, this point he does is very proper.

----

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-3





Volume 13

#602 - Does The Limit Fight Perishing Of Luo?


Ju Zi(orange) follows in Xu Tianran behind, this plan is she and Xu Tianran designs together. Naturally, the plan had, she helped Xu Tianran improve. Make the entire plan more flawless. Also because had this plan, makes Xu Tianran set firm resolve in the final moment.

The plan shows perfectly, falls into including Darkness Sacred Dragon, Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo falls into a trap completely, Holy Spirit Cult ended, the remaining strength ran away, did not look in the Xu Tianran eye. Without two Limit Douluo, the threat of Holy Spirit Cult is not anything, exterminates these surplus Evil Soul Master, is not the extremely difficult matter.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp keeps side Xu Tianran to protect him, other three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp disperse in the imperial palace upper air, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device all lock in this region, once Darkness Sacred Dragon and Grim Reaper Douluo can find a way out, then, can encounter to their ruinous attacks. They are the last step of this dead end.

Large quantities of armies from have welled up toward the imperial palace around at this time in all directions, the people were scattered, are centered on the imperial palace, surroundings dozens li (0.5km) declare martial law completely.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong naturally in this row, under the protection of Imitation Soul Ability, they easily did not enter in this range.

That red-orange glare is continuing unexpectedly as before, obviously internal explosion is fearful, Huo Yuhao is not willing to attempt, that inside superhigh temperature, likely will reach as high as several thousand degrees, that will not be the human body can withstand. Even if he is Absolute Ice Transcendent Douluo is not good.

Too ruthless, was really too ruthless!

Ju Zi(orange), is this your plan or Xu Tianran?

In the sky, Ju Zi(orange) also in all that in the bird's eye view tread has, the corners of the mouth place also similarly reveals a smile, with sneering of Xu Tianran and self-satisfied different, her smiling face is very warm.

In the imperial palace, all important people early shifted, includes her son, stays behind is used to confuse Grim Reaper Douluo in waits on, Grim Reaper Douluo must die, must have some people to bury, not?

They must die, if they do not die, in the near future, Yuhao must face them. Grim Reaper Douluo will not let off his, he will not let off Grim Reaper Douluo, the only solution, the side died. Yuhao, I helped your to get rid of two formidable enemies, you are safer.

Thinks the man in own heart is safe, Ju Zi(orange) smiles is very happy, but, during is happy, a bitterness and astringency. Because this man will never be him. May work for him, she as before will be very happy. Although she knows that he does not hope one such do.

Ju Zi(orange) always likes solving the problem with the simplest way, the Holy Spirit Cult issue, should to solve. Somewhat only what is a pity, the Xu Tianran strength had not been weakened too. Side him, the massive masters exist. Naturally, another plan also started.

Takes the imperial palace as the price, this plan was really good. Without the imperial palace, did not have High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, as for using Bright Capital City High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, that is not the easy matter, wasn't that four energy, prompted by own, reassigned in imperial palace these four? Otherwise can guarantee that the explosion power doesn't leak?

The so-called open intrigue, with must handle the matter that and must complete own plan. Open and aboveboard, actually did not fear that others were not swindled. Is promoting the open intrigue, is Power of Destiny.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) smiles was happier. Even if that man forever is not himself, eventually also the man is own, that is, my son.

He called Yuhao, the rain to clouds, Hao to vast, therefore, my son, called Yunhan.

Xu Tianran does not certainly know that is having such thought in own wife heart unexpectedly, this time he, completely is in the stimulated mood. Can strike to kill Limit Douluo, moreover is two, this in Sun-Moon Empire absolutely is the first time. Even if previous time kills Innate Body Douluo Du Busi time, he so is not excited, Du Busi is the suicide . Moreover, Du Busi is not Limit Douluo!

This time forcing out, will certainly keep the annals. This is my merit.

“Ha Ha!”The Xu Tianran supine Tianchang smiles, the laughter was deafening, frightens nearby Ju Zi(orange) to jump.

“Holy Spirit Cult withers away in light of this, then, our goals are Dou Ling and Star Luo. Ju Zi(orange), I give you one year of recuperation army, fills up to strength, supplements Soul Engineer. One year later, I will assign you to subjugate the world grand marshal once more, you replace me, series Continent. I must make entire Douluo Continent tread to shiver in my Sun-Moon Empire oppression of the people. Let them the fear in the Soul Guidance Device ray. When the last country was also destroyed, this piece of Continent no longer called Douluo, but called Sun-Moon!”

“I will not ruin Shrek Academy, although it has been doing with me right, is, in my heart, that is the Soul Master supreme palace, I am also Soul Master. When we unified Continent that day, Shrek must submit to us, to that time, I have worn the Shrek Academy school uniform, attended a lecture in the Academy best classroom, interpreting a dream childhood strongest wish. I will bestow Shrek Academy am Sun-Moon Royal Family Academy, making it forever my Sun-Moon Empire part. Assists the inheritance of my Sun-Moon Empire century ten thousand years.”

“Your majesty long live, long live and long live.”Imperial Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer shouted " long live " before the emperor to long live under the leadership of Ju Zi(orange).

In the Xu Tianran eye, full is the frantic color, stimulated being unable to restrain oneself, he as if saw that entire Douluo Continent shivers the picture that in own under foot and submits.

Kong Deming silently float in Xu Tianran behind, in the eye is glittering the light ray, similarly has the excitement in that ray, yes! So long as is the Sun-Moon Empire person, who meets is not Xu Tianran is stimulated?

Red-orange ray after continuing enough quarter, finally started to weaken. The speed of weaken is very slow, seven color guard shields that is formed by four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, became the ray is unexpectedly dim, filament thin can only see indistinctly seven color rays were glittering.

Too fearful, inside large explosion was really too fearful, even if were Soul Guidance Protective Cover that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device formed, nearly must unable to resist its prestige energy unexpectedly.

“Ju Zi(orange), you are right, luckily our High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device energy transfer outer city most, although enabled the outer city sufficiently to need for a long time, but has completed finally, resisted. If lets inside terrifying energy leak, perhaps one-third Bright Capital City must vanish since then. You make the great merit, how making me enjoy you!”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, respectful [say / way]: “Can follow side your majesty, witnesses your majesty becomes an eternity emperor who unifies Continent, is to the highest reward of Ju Zi(orange).”

“Ha Ha, said well, said really well!”Xu Tianran laughs once more loudly, he for a long time so willfully to one's heart's content has not crossed very much. Even if initially ascended the throne does not have.

Because now and was initially different, initial he, was unable to control this stretch of earth completely, but now, he is truly the supreme king, has controlled domestic all, the official military commander admires all. Integrates in Sky Soul Empire the empire territory thoroughly. Now feels uneasy general Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo also to destroy continually. Can he not be excited?

He cannot suppress his mood again, because, on this world, anything cannot question that his sound, an eternity emperor, a good eternity emperor, I to be a that eternity emperor!

In the Xu Tianran heart was full of the frantic mood, both hands has made a fist, if because of the issue of both legs, he does not hope one can the royal cart draft, witnessed the Sun-Moon Empire army to trample flat the entire Douluo Continent magnificent feat with own eyes!

The red-orange brilliance weakens continually, can see the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device light barrier internal situation gradually.

light barrier appears very clean, after a point does not have the large explosion, should appear in confusion. The ground is clean, because, the ground did not have, has a giant gulf. In the surroundings of this gulf, completely is the scarlet red, looked like the rock magma just had flowed, bottom of the gulf, the flame liquid flowed, but also in unceasing undercutting. Internal ray completely is a piece of distortion, because the high temperature is the result.

Imperial palace originally, can see only, is most surrounding four corner, then High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device outside High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shield. Only has them, but also is well-preserved, but above, started to brave the intermittent black smoke, obviously did not lose the heavy load, must damage shortly thoroughly.

Can several next two Limit Douluo, such loss Sun-Moon Empire be able to withstand. Xu Tianran regarding this, did not mind.

Really good terror large explosion! Ten, the entire ten nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. Being used is two Limit Douluo buries, they were also proud.

These ten install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely is same attribute, the high energy, rupturing and high temperature, this is their functions.

Any, can ruin a medium-sized city easily, but now, ten might compress in together, compresses in this narrow and small space, that terror high temperature and explosive force, even if Gods, is not necessarily able to survive.

Xu Tianran smiles is very happy, then must do, but cleans up the aftermath.

“Bang”in low and deep dull thumping sound sound, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device was unable to withstand the load finally, explodes. Thick black smoke lift-off, airborne seven color light barrier one empty, the chain-reaction appears, around the imperial palace High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device of other three corners explode successively, raising intermittent thick smoke.

Damaged eventually, but their functions have also realized, the price that this time, Sun-Moon Empire pays is nothing less than big, in two nine levels of Soul Engineer deaths, in the imperial palace were massive wait on to be buried along with the dead, four latest High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device and ten nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. If these things weigh with money, constructed a big city sufficiently.

But Xu Tianran is very as before happy, because, if makes two Limit Douluo act independently, destructiveness that they can bring, but is far from a city can compare!

Did not have the protections of seven color guard shields, the high fever to spew out instantaneously, diverged to the surroundings, in a short time, the entire Bright Capital City temperature has promoted, particularly from imperial palace near place, was becomes a high temperature.

Matter that this does not have the means that Xu Tianran already had prepared luckily, the water dragon team started to spout water columns in the surroundings rapidly, the pouring to the giant gulf in imperial palace.

The thick mist fills the air immediately, changes into the giant fog group to be splendid sight.

Float Xu Tianran in upper air, be with smile on the face said to Ju Zi(orange): “Our imperial palace reconstruction time, the mausoleum chamber has not needed to open cutting, has compared was deeper . Moreover the surroundings had been baked by the high temperature, inevitably becomes more solid.”

“DDD!”The grating alarm sound suddenly resounds, towering that the warning comes, airborne some Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp of relaxation are almost the earliest possible time had released the linkage defense guard shield, protected Xu Tianran and Ju Zi(orange) and the others, the king safety at this time without doubt was most important.

“What's the matter?”Xu Tianran shouted to clear the way fierce.

“Opens reports your majesty, under has the Soul Power fluctuation and mind fluctuation appears. The scale is very big, covers the imperial palace.”Immediately some people reply, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device of Sun-Moon Empire most high-end here, any slightest sign of trouble will be discovered.

The Xu Tianran complexion instantaneously becomes gloomy, “attack, to imperial palace position all-out attack.”He does not dare to imagine, if that two Limit Douluo are also living, what happened.

The mist turned into the snow dance, the snowflake of big piece dances in the air above the imperial palace, the woods cold aura is scattering scalding hot, is cut off all Surveying Soul Guidance Device and lines of sight.

Fierce thundering resounds unceasingly, gulf that imperial palace explodes in fierce thundering unceasing becomes must be deeper, various rays stir the snowflake crush, the terrifying explosive force made entire Bright Capital City shiver.

Gripping of Ju Zi(orange) unconsciousness tightened the double fist, she recognizes certainly that snowflake the origin, the fool! Did you here do at this time? Do you want to rescue that Grim Reaper Douluo? Why?

Huo Yuhao not to her answer, because, when that ten thousand artillery fire, he with the Tang Wutong same place, leading another two people quietly to escape, runs away toward the distant place. Under Imitation Soul Ability and function of Spiritual Disturbance domain, the martial law of army is only the joke.

Long Xiaoyao clothes have disappeared completely, displace, was one is fired dark red black dragon scales.

The Ye Xishui whole body sends out unexpectedly is filling with the Light aura, sacred just likes the holy angel. Her body unexpectedly becomes somewhat transparent. The Blood Soul Devil Puppet aura vanished to disappear completely.

Beyond Douluo Continent hardbound belt brand- the new second volume, already in our Taobao Shops: Dazzles world Tang Sect to go on the market! Welcome everybody to purchase.

Yesterday I went to the screenplay symposium, at present the script detailed program has handled, then improves the detail, started the visual effect team to construct. The original progress is invariable. Can disclose ahead of time to everybody's good news is, our Douluo, will use the Hollywood Team to photograph, the screenwriter and visual effect team and director, establish provisionally at present all uses the Hollywood secondary roles. The total investment will create the home. Certainly diligently makes the Douluo series profound imaginary big piece to give to everybody continuously! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-602





Volume 13

#603 - Double Gear-Driven


Long Xiaoyao is shouldering Ye Xishui, on the face of Ye Xishui is actually glittering the strange gloss, looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the look actually extraordinary tranquility.

“First left here to say again!”This is Long Xiaoyao saw after Huo Yuhao, first few words that spoke.

But before, in instant, Huo Yuhao that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shield vanished received passes message of Long Xiaoyao, he only said three characters, shielded me.

In that flash, Huo Yuhao actually hesitant, although he only hears the Long Xiaoyao sound, but his some premonitions, Ye Xishui has not died, at least now has not died. Has rescued Long Xiaoyao, was equal to rescuing Ye Xishui.

But in a moment later, him set firm resolve. The graciousness is the graciousness, the enmity is enmity, has the graciousness to repay a debt of gratitude, having a grudge naturally revenges. At present this situation, he can only choose repays a debt of gratitude first said again, but, even if after is, Long Xiaoyao must detain, he will not let off Ye Xishui. Once this kind of Evil Soul Master Limit Douluo outside putting, is the widely-noted catastrophe.

The crazy bang exploded randomly continues the time of entire quarter to end, Xu Tianran or Ju Zi(orange), the complexion was a paleness, particularly Xu Tianran, this time he, on the skin presented goose flesh obviously.

If, if Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo have not died, this price, no one can withstand. Two Limit Douluo anger, even may let entire Sun-Moon Empire loss of life, that was really too fearful.

“Ju Zi(orange), you said that they did die?”Xu Tianran has turned head, looks to Ju Zi(orange).

“Died, was certain!”Ju Zi(orange) is almost without hesitation said firmly. Her first time saw spiritlessly from the Xu Tianran face, he is afraid, yes, he in fear!

“Right, they died. They certain died.”Xu Tianran said loudly.

Outside the Bright Capital City city, any ordinary soldier even is the blockade of Soul Engineer, does not have the significance regarding Huo Yuhao. Imitation Soul Ability opens to the maximum degree, at all some impossible people able to investigate his existence. He is leading person.

Hundred li (0.5km) are away from, regarding Transcendent Douluo above the powerhouse of level, the moment may. To woods, Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps.

He must stop, his expression and mood are very stern. He soon must face, is a big difficult problem. But is actually he must face.

Huo Yuhao stops, Tang Wutong naturally also stopped, with him hand in hand. They have turned around, face are shouldering Ye Xishui to come here Long Xiaoyao.

At this time Huo Yuhao sees, Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao scale, unexpectedly is dark red, his old face is also ruddy, seems red light over the face. But in the Huo Yuhao eye, he sees, is actually the death air/Qi of lingering.

Yes! In that and other under the terrorist attacks of intensity, even if Limit Douluo, does not have the possible whole body to draw back absolutely. Let alone, these two in front of oneself, is over 200-year- old person. Their body functions already were not the peak can compare.

Long Xiaoyao cautiously places in Ye Xishui ground, wants to hold her to sit down, Ye Xishui actually lifts a hand, tight holds the shoulder of Long Xiaoyao, must stand side him actually.

Those who made Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong surprised was, this time Ye Xishui, seemed becoming young.

Long Xiaoyao said right, Ye Xishui of young time is very beautiful, has is not inferior in the Tang Wutong outstandingly beautiful appearance. Made anybody be moved sufficiently.

Her sends out is filling with the Light aura gently the golden halo, sacred not local products. Looked like Huo Yuhao initially first time saw to display the Angel Martial Soul time Ye Xishui. Her skin is fair and transparent, on the face is having the light smile. Even also feels relaxed. All these look in Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong eye, is actually the strangeness that could not say.

They are not clear, actually at present these two Limit Douluo are what kind of conditions, but thought that present they strangely are very very strange.

From Ye Xishui, Huo Yuhao can feel, is but purely Soul Power fluctuation of Boundless, moreover does not have the least bit Evil Soul Master aura, but, actually could not feel that the least bit vitality fluctuates.

On Long Xiaoyao the vitality fluctuation is actually very powerful, but unceasingly is actually dropping, and is unstable.

“Senior Long.”Huo Yuhao somewhat difficult looks to Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, said: “I know that you are in any event impossible to let off Xishui today. I understand your difficulties. You should also be able to look, we will arrive at the life the end. My wish originally does not know that can also complete, was thinking, when you 98 levels of times comes to look for me, now looks like, perhaps I could not wait!”

In the Huo Yuhao heart low-spirited, he is listens to Long Xiaoyao to narrate between him and Ye Xishui personally the story, that pain in very clear Long Xiaoyao heart of hearts.

“Yuhao, can I request your matter?”Long Xiaoyao said.

Huo Yuhao was silent, “if not put Senior Ye to leave, other matters, I can promise you.”

Now Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao of this condition, possibly are not the matches who he and Tang Wutong collaborates.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “If I died, I naturally cannot protect her again, I hope that you promise me, before I die, do not injure her, after I died, you begin again, Ok?”

The Huo Yuhao whole body shakes, in the heart was more uncomfortable, Limit Douluo arrives at this degree, is really why bother to come!

Slightly after hesitant one next, he said: “So long as Senior Ye does not leave, I promise you.”

Long Xiaoyao nodded, said: “You could rest assured that you will not comply with my this matter in vain, I will put in the reward to you.”At the same time was saying, he changes Ye Xishui slowly, his look also became even more gentle.

“Xishui, you are really beautiful, you are that beautiful, I was old.”His sound is very gentle, moreover said is very slow, seems like pouring out.

In the Ye Xishui outstandingly beautiful facial features is revealing the light smile, “was not we are old. Has not thought that I can with you in the same place, arrive at the life finally eventually together the end, this feeling, is very good, should not be sad, this is the best result that I can obtain.”

The Long Xiaoyao sound becomes somewhat shivers suddenly, “Xishui, are you willing to forgive me really? Is willing to forgive me initially to all that you make?”

Ye Xishui has smiled, she smiles is very happy and is very happy.

“Fool, Xiaoyao, you are really a fool, not only you, Mu En is also. You are the fools, since, you have played with by me with the stock palm above! But you actually do not know. You are really a bloody fool!”

Although she is smiling, but tears uncontrolled have actually flowed.

“Why said?”Some Long Xiaoyao delay visits her.

Ye Xishui sighed one lightly, “this whole life, you for too many were too many, we who I did arrived at the final time, made me also handle a matter for you. I can do for you, is makes you be able to lay down the burdens in all hearts, happy leaves this world. Has a lot, now also finally can tell you.”

Long Xiaoyao has gawked, Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao somewhat are also in a daze, at this time can say from the Ye Xishui mouth, surely is secret in secret!

Long Xiaoyao surprised [say / way]: “What do you want to tell me?”

Ye Xishui gives a calm smile, said: “That matter, in that your heart has been full of the guilty matter, actually, does not exist, or you do not need to be guilty for that matter, because, that is I arranges, the person who I must wait for is you, but is not Mu En. I am willing to give you body, although, that is a plot.”

“What did you say?”Long Xiaoyao has a big shock, looks at Ye Xishui, in eye has been full of the fear, “let alone, Xishui, I asked you let alone, do not destroy you image in my heart. At least, at that time, you were initially perfect in my heart.”

Ye Xishui shook the head, said: “No, I must say, if did not say the heart of hearts, I have not hated dead. Actually, you do not need to be worried about anything. For these years, although you have been protecting, has followed side me, even becomes by me causes, visits me to do many misdemeanors. May in fact, you not owe, because, you are defending, is a depth has been loving your woman. Do you know?”

Long Xiaoyao inconceivable looks at Ye Xishui, perhaps because of the feebleness of body, Limit Douluo cultivates for he somewhat cannot control own mood unexpectedly.

Ye Xishui spooky [say / way]: “In the past, I and you also had Mu En, first time participated in Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition time, in fact, I had the goal, at that time, I am a Holy Spirit Cult member. I went to participate at that time, is examines the outstanding people in our that generation of young people. Therefore, I run into you and Mu En.”

“You that outstanding, that formidable, wins in me, at least in the surface is this. We are the young people, very easy walked in one, let alone I had the goal must approach you. Therefore, you in unknowingly liked me, but I actually, in the heart also liked your one of them.”

“You think, I have liked is Mu En, is this also one of you pain roots? Now I can tell you. The fools, your this bloody fool, from the beginning, I like is you, I have not liked Mu En.”

Sorry that today renews was late, the beginning system had problems. Our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire cartoon first volume already in our shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, got online. Each has the signature, I have signed in any case 100 books, first come, first served. Later I will sign again. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603





Volume 13

Double gear-driven ( Part 2 )


“You are active, the look is handsome, always likes buddingly, has the unprecedented aggression, these are I like. Mu En is very good, but, he was extremely simple-hearted, is not the type that I like. Therefore, from the beginning, I like is you!”

“But, I cannot choose you, because Sly Old Zhongli will not allow me to choose you absolutely. Because you are not the Shrek Academy person, this point, you see very clearly. Right, because of the Shrek Academy reason, I under forcing of Sly Old Zhongli, has to choose Mu En.”

Long Xiaoyao hears here, the whole person the delay, he has not thought that since the heart of hearts biggest pain, could be this type unexpectedly.

Xishui is smiling as before, tears also as in class.

“Afterward, we met once more. That time, Sly Old Zhongli told me, said that you are now the younger generation most outstanding outstanding people. If you are the good friends, then, in the future likely will become our Holy Spirit Cult nightmare, therefore, must make you separate, making you foe, this can let your mutual diversion, will not affect the development that I will teach.”

“Therefore, I proposed that plan, I with my body am the bait, has tempted you, own first time has given you. Has made that making our three people fill the painful contradiction. May in fact, painful only then you, I have known I have been making anything. I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess! Ha Ha, ha ha ha ha!”

“You and you...”Long Xiaoyao points at Xishui, the blood is emitting from the mouth.

Xishui vision gentle visits him, “Xiaoyao, should not be angry, such will make you die is too quick. Listened to me saying that? Perhaps, hears behind, you will again not be angry.”

“After that time. I walked, but, I did not regret. Because I give the person who my body I most loved completely. I know, after that time, you and Mu En must fall into extreme painful it, this does not have the means. Do you know? If my plan has not succeeded, Sly Old Zhongli will not hesitate at all costs kills you. I am not willing to notice that you die! You are my lover, but Mu En, in my heart is the honourable big brother! Can he to my good, I not know? In my heart. Actually you that important, that important. Therefore, I must do, only by doing so, can make you not be injured by Holy Spirit Cult, can make you go on living.”

“I am successful, because, your future, achievement Limit Douluo. Although you are painful. May be most minimum, we are living. Not?”

“My this walks, is dozens years, dozens years later. Before Sly Old Zhongli knows must be dying, he forces me, lived the stature to him, only by doing so. He can feel relieved passes to me the Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master position, and helps me become Limit Douluo. At that time, I have stood in the Shrek Academy opposite completely. I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess, this status will make me never possibly genuine with you in the same place.”

“You may know, our afterward that reunions, after Sly Old Zhongli died, I am how want that with you in the same place! But, I cannot, I be Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, I am the king of Evil Soul Master, if I true with you in the same place, your this reputation destroyed. Even if afterward you have followed side me, has been protecting me, at least in others opinion, you is also forced. You as before are Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo, but is not Holy Spirit Cult one.”

“More than 100 years, you afterward unexpectedly with me, have protected my more than 100 years. Although I am Evil Soul Master, my innermost feelings fill ferociously, but, I am also a person, can't you look to my affection me? But, I do not dare with you in the same place, I unable to ruin your reputation as before. My innermost feelings that is in love is more impossible to tell you.”

“Now, I finally can say. Xiaoyao, I love is you, is you. Although you followed my hundred years, painful hundred years. However, I must also probably tell you am, my Xishui, does right by absolutely you. Because, after initially our that time, I lived a child to you, is a boy. Do you know?”

“What did you and you say?”Long Xiaoyao dumbfounded looks at Xishui not on own initiative, the body of whole person shivers. The children, Xishui gave back to itself to live a child unexpectedly, but, passed for more than 100 years! Even if cultivates for extremely high Soul Master, more than 100 years, perhaps also already.

“Has not thought that I know after you listened, will be very surprised. However, let alone is you, even if I, more than 100 years had not seen him, I do not know that he is living. I cannot see him, because, I will never make him know that he has a mother, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, is Evil Soul Master. I hope that he can healthily live, was an average person to be enough, I am not even willing to make him Soul Master. He followed me to join the Holy Spirit Cult beforehand surname, was surnamed the word.”

“The good fortune makes person. The posterity of our child, are relying on their talent unexpectedly, had been admitted to Shrek Academy, moreover paid a return visit unexpectedly in the Mu En hanger-on, if were not his Martial Soul is my second Martial Soul Radiant Phoenix, I do not know really that originally after Mu En received me and your, disciple unexpectedly, and cultivated him fully, making him Martial Soul Faculty Dean.”

“What?”Hears here, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong cannot endure patiently shock of innermost feelings finally, simultaneously calls out in alarm makes noise, if not today's Xishui says this matter, who can want to obtain, Shrek Academy Martial Soul Faculty Dean can Yan Shaozhe, be unexpectedly and unexpectedly Grim Reaper Douluo Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao son? Who can want to obtain?

“You talked nonsense, you were instigating our Academy internal relations.”Tang Wutong angry saying.

Xishui shows a faint smile, looked at a complete delay Long Xiaoyao, said: “To this time, what I needed to instigate again? Let alone, my Xishui is one generation of Limit Douluo, by my status, does not need to instigate anything. I am I, I wanted to say anything, naturally can tell the facts. Shaozhe calculates according to the age that should be I and Xiaoyao grandson or is the heavy grandchildren, but, I never have to try to prove, I quietly have examined his blood relationship, confirmed he is my descendant.”

Huo Yuhao held on also wants saying that anything's Tang Wutong, shook the head to her. The Tang Wutong eye shocks completely.

Long Xiaoyao is almost somewhat difficult asked to Xishui: “This real? This unexpectedly real? Why? Why didn't you tell me earlier?”

Xishui said indifferently: “Because, I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess! I am Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master! I am the Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder! What can I tell you? I have handled that many dishonorable matters, in life that in my hand died, thousands, I do not count clearly. I told you these, making you love me, with me in the same place? Also turns into Evil Soul Master? I told our descendant these, making them also be dragged into Holy Spirit Cult it? No, I cannot say that yes, I cannot say, I no one can tell, I can only all these, deep burying in my heart, the dream return to at midnight, was recalling that happiness, can make me not move toward the destruction truly, true crazy.”

“Has a look!”The Xishui both arms lift, the gentle golden flame ascends on her, “this is I biggest card in a hand, who can think that has Blood Soul Devil Puppet terror Martial Soul Evil Soul Master, Limit Douluo, actually also has second Martial Soul. This Martial Soul, does not know Sly Old Zhongli, I have hidden is very deep and is very deep. Once because my this Martial Soul reveals, making the Holy Spirit Cult person know that I said fall into the beyond redemption boundary. Therefore, my this second Martial Soul, I have concealed for 200 years. Has not thought that played the role today eventually, uses the strength of Phoenix Nirvana, simultaneously has saved our life.”

Long Xiaoyao bitter and astringent [say / way]: “I should not go . If only you, you only need to protect you, perhaps, you can also go on living, are insufficient the source to be lit.”

Xishui shook the head, said: “No, if you do not have, I really died, my heart can die. I hope that you go. I clearly know that trap also walks, because, on this world I already live was too tired, I need to look for one to belong to my home to return. This all, is I calculates. What thing the Xu Tianran young child is, depends on him, wants to plan my Grim Reaper Douluo Xishui? If not I wants, his trap can be successful? I examine with this final opportunity, examine you hundred years later, like initially was loving whether also me. Facts showed that I have succeeded, Xiaoyao, you have not disappointed me thank you, I am very happy and am very happy.”

The breath of Long Xiaoyao somewhat is obviously rapid, he looks at Xishui, long time could not speak.

Xishui lifts the hand, gently is touching his face.

“How? How to speak?”

“You and you deceive my good pain!”Long Xiaoyao face upwards to heave a deep sigh, suddenly, tears. Regardless of how he cannot think, thing that oneself these years insists, unexpectedly is empty destroyed, the mistake that does not have, oneself have undertaken the lifetime pain for him unexpectedly.

This time he, had not felt that feels relaxed or is happy, instead thought that the whole person was found time, that feeling, even be more painful than before.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603-part-2





Volume 13

Double gear-driven ( Part 3 )


Ye Xishui supple sound track: “Xiaoyao, the present was our final times, our vitalities cut off, starting from this moment, I was your wife, you were my husband. You do not need to listen my, now, regardless of you make me make anything, I listen your. Gets married to obey the husband?”

Long Xiaoyao looks at Ye Xishui, in the look is glittering the extremely complex ray, “since, I have thought understanding that most is unfair to you, now I am clear, the person who we most are unfair to is Mu En. Feels sorry for him, for these years, is withstanding even compared with I more intense pain, until dying time, does not know the truth of matter, you really quite cruel-hearted!”

Ye Xishui sighed, said: “Sometimes, does not know that is not necessarily painful. Does not know well . The time can dilute the lots, reason that I afterward no longer have seen him, for does not hope to bring back his innermost feelings that distress. He got married finally, had his descendant, in addition Shrek Academy that many hobbled, even if were the pain, the pain was also only part in his life, on the other hand, has defended in my side you, was most painful that.”

Long Xiaoyao has turned around, in the Shrek Academy direction, “Mu brother, has not thought really that in recent years, we have made unexpectedly a mistake, fell into this kind of plot unexpectedly. Holy Spirit Cult, is really good Holy Spirit Cult! Xishui, you said right, before me at the point of death, making me clarify all, finally, I was not a silly ghost. Also good, to be also good! Mu the brother, this whole life owes you, I did not have the means to give back to you, can only also on your disciple.”

Spoke these words, he transfers, earnest looks at Ye Xishui, said: “Xishui, your what listens really my?”

Ye Xishui nod of silently.

“Good! All that although you make, regardless of again makes anything not to be impossible to make up now. But since we have arrived this step, gives on Continent to leave behind something again. Also is repays for several points we to have a deficit Mu the brother. How?”

Ye Xishui gentle smiles, “how you want me to do, how I do.”

Long Xiaoyao changes Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, said: “Yuhao, I planned, when your 98 levels cultivate for time looks for me. Xuan Zi once the confidential letter told me, you have built Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, right?”

“Yin-Yang Supplement? Was he unexpectedly successful?”Ye Xishui surprised saying, “no wonder, no wonder he can defeat my Holy Spirit Cult that many powerhouses by strength of the. Originally has built this unexpectedly, only then Beast God Di Tian cultivates the method of successful Yin-Yang Supplement, does the boy, how your body bear such intensity impact?”

Huo Yuhao has not answered the Ye Xishui issue, but nodded to Long Xiaoyao.

“Ahead of time achievement second Soul Nucleus, means that if you want into Limit Douluo, wants achievement third Soul Nucleus. That will be very difficult, I think you 98 levels of times helps your old, the old man already gradually. The vitality is declining unceasingly, this Soul Power remains is also being useless, donates you, if can help you complete the fusion of third Soul Nucleus. That will have made the history. Now perhaps was without enough time, your cultivating to be away from 98 levels also had the distance, but our lives soon came to the end. Only then in my Soul Power passes to you while the purest thing of present, realizes from experience also one and passes to you, is I repays a Mu En sentiment.”

“Old Long. This and this how?”Huo Yuhao beckons with the hand hastily, being startled of face, he has not thought that Long Xiaoyao looked for him by oneself, must do this matter unexpectedly.

The Long Xiaoyao smile shakes the head, said: “Do not reject, this is my final wish, otherwise, I die with injustice unredressed. Moreover, my this cultivates to inherit, must compared with such dissipate in the world is much better. You do not need to be worried about anything, I do not pass to you all Soul Power, only in my Soul Power the thing of most source, as well as the purest energy will pour into your within the body, letting you gradually its absorption. Meanwhile, will construct third Soul Nucleus for you in the future, first prepares an embryonic form. As the matter stands, can build some foundations to you finally.”

Here, Long Xiaoyao changed Tang Wutong, “was only, what making me not think, your unexpectedly also achievement second Soul Nucleus, was Yin-Yang Supplement?”

After Tang Wutong looked at Huo Yuhao one, nodded, said: “Yes, completes with the help of Yuhao.”

“Good, is really good! Xishui, you pass to this miss your Soul Power. This is I finally requests to you. All keeps our strengths.”

Ye Xishui has gawked, then has selected, looks to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong is actually the complexion changes, effort swung, “I do not want the Evil Soul Master strength.”

Ye Xishui bitter and astringent [say / way]: “Evil Soul Master strength? On me belongs to the Evil Soul Master strength, including Grim Reaper Tower, all perished in Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace there, my Martial Soul Blood Soul Devil Puppet and my body thoroughly had written off. You cannot see, I now radically am not the main body, energy body that but condenses through the Phoenix Nirvana rebirth, because I cultivate to enough formidable, in addition the itself soul is stable, this can maintain the soul body is not dissipating, I to protect Xiaoyao am coming out. Has not thought that before Xiaoyao, was seriously injured, he who this time I cannot protect eventually was complete, making him injure on adds the wound, the vitality has also come to the end. You could rest assured that my this Radiant Phoenix Martial Soul, has never contaminated anybody's blood, is strength of the purest Light, is in my innermost feelings good that side. Present I, am not Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui. I am only the Long Xiaoyao wife, Ye Xishui, already died.”

The Tang Wutong brow wrinkles, that checkpoint in her innermost feelings somewhat cannot pass.

In this time, an extremely familiar sound is resounding in her mind.

“She said right, she is not that Grim Reaper Douluo, all her the things of burial wither away along with body withering away of Ye Xishui, complete their final wishes.”

“Father!”Tang Wutong blurted out called out.

Huo Yuhao, Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui are startled. Must know that they can say is now Soul Master topest existed, if periphery also has others, how possibly unable to discover!

Tang Wutong somewhat awkward [say / way]: “To, sorry, I have thought suddenly some words that the father spoke. Good, I comply. However, I will not thank you.”

Ye Xishui has smiled, “I handle the matter, when needed the person to thank? I complete my husband's wish. Xiaoyao said right, this whole life, I have a deficit most people am Mu En, in this final time, can do something for his disciple, makes up for on several points finally.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Long Xiaoyao, sees, is the Long Xiaoyao clear vision. Destiny aura not any change in Three Eyed Golden Lion Destiny Skull, does not have any dangerous advance notification. He knows that this inside does not have any plot.

“Didn't Old Long, have means to save you really?”Huo Yuhao somewhat difficult saying.

Long Xiaoyao moves sideways, arrived at behind him, “I said that I must die in front of Xishui. Sits down.”At the same time was saying, his hand pressed on the shoulder of Huo Yuhao. Although already deeply by heavy wound, but this Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo strength as before is incomparably formidable, immediately Huo Yuhao was pressed by him sat.

Tang Wutong also sits down in front of Huo Yuhao, their four items of relative, saw each other in the eye that shock also has moved.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui separately sit down behind Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, simultaneously lifts the double palm, according to them each other behind.

“Aren't you Martial Soul Fusion? Starts to practice, then receives our Soul Power gradually.”The Long Xiaoyao sinking sound said.

“Yes!”Huo Yuhao lifts the double palm, balances with the Tang Wutong four palms. Immediately, their Hao Dong Power start each other to flow, stable whirlpools start to linger in their each other within the body.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection covers in four people, although the sensation will tell him not to have any danger, but he on the alert Ye Xishui, that after all will be most powerhouse in Holy Spirit Cult! Once Ye Xishui has a sound, he will immediately change the position with Black Tortoise Replacement and Tang Wutong, oneself will withstand the attack of Ye Xishui. To the Ye Xishui condition, want to strike to kill him at present, the possibility is not big.

Facts showed that the sensation is reliable.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui Soul Power, all pours into the gentle way to two human bodies.

Acclaimed from the Long Xiaoyao mouth resounds, “good Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus! Really miracle. Good pure and vigorous Soul Power, the degree of integration is such high, two Soul Nucleus complement one another and mutually depends on each other mutually opposes. This is the most formidable practice way.”

Ye Xishui nodded, said: “Yes! Although I am Twin Martial Souls, may not dare to practice Radiant Phoenix, only is since able to hide it. Otherwise, perhaps I have opportunity to touch this Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus. If they can achievement Limit Douluo, perhaps, be possible to challenge Beast God by the body of humanity in the future.”

Long Xiaoyao shows a faint smile, said: “That makes us create this miracle.”

Sincere Soul Power starts to increase the input, Long Xiaoyao or Ye Xishui, spread to Huo Yuhao and Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body do not have any attribute, purest Soul Power. After pouring into their bodies, immediately is being revolved Hao Dong Power to dissolve with them as one, radically not the process that needs anything to transform.

Worthily is Limit Douluo, how they are very clear use own Soul Power to help other people.

Is having Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, has the far ultra ordinary Soul Master carrying capacity. Four Soul Nucleus in two human body, nearly absorb greedily generally is coming from two Limit Douluo pure Soul Power, oneself cultivates to also at an exceptional pace promote.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603-part-3





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 1 )


After the quarter, suddenly gains a thorough understanding. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong Soul Power, all promoted 96 levels.

Also half double-hour, 97 levels.

A double-hour, 98 levels!

Short less than the free time of two double-hour, their cultivating are with the help of two Limit Douluo, to promote stiffly 98 levels of intensities. After this intensity, the palm that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stuck to actually suddenly separated.

Like such that initially they judged, after cultivating to be the certain extent, their Hao Dong Power cannot maintain again. Because, at this time, their Hao Dong Power amplification already extremely formidable, formidable to the situation that their bodies have not been able to withstand.

Only then separates, Soul Power that their own within the body run will weaken, has more place load bearings to come from Limit Douluo Boundless Soul Power.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui pass to them, although already after Soul Power of depuration, but receives truly, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are clear, Limit Douluo Soul Power is vigorous, that completely is a limitless feeling.

Huo Yuhao is very clear, if under premise that in both sides do not run away, takes him and Tang Wutong beforehand cultivating as, even if faces Limit Douluo alone, not necessarily has the absolute odds of success, even the opportunity of defeat is bigger.

These practice surpass 200 years of super powerhouse, deep of background, is makes one shock really!

Within the body Soul Power is getting stronger and stronger, two Soul Nucleus high-speed operations from the beginning, gradually became slow, Huo Yuhao only thought that own body has been full of the full feeling, as if might explode anytime.

“I must open third Soul Nucleus to build the foundation for you. Your present foundation is very good, first Soul Nucleus in the between the eyebrows hole hole, second Soul Nucleus in the chest, left most the dantian position that was easy to practice to give third Soul Nucleus. Third Soul Nucleus that then you must form can only be Space Attribute . Moreover, you in forming in the process, should, counter- and way. Forms three Soul Nucleus interactive processes . Moreover, finally, three Soul Nucleus should each other be connected, the mutual interdependence, can achieve the true three Soul Nucleus effects. I do not have the means to help you complete circulation, but, I can help you open a Soul Nucleus foundation in the dantian first alone, in the future, you must do is. This Soul Nucleus with your original two Soul Nucleus links, only has so, you can achievement Limit Douluo. Was formidable as for that time you, the old man does not know that in another world, the old man can with the Mu En same place, pray for you.”

The Long Xiaoyao sound appears in the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea deep place directly, Huo Yuhao feels. Long Xiaoyao pours into Soul Power of oneself within the body, emerges in the dantian suddenly, meanwhile branches out part, isolates the chest above completely.

This cultivated is. Is really voluminous! Too formidable.

A small Soul Nucleus embryonic form was constructed quickly, because Huo Yuhao own another two Soul Nucleus were isolated outside, actually did not feel.

In the dantian around Soul Nucleus the Soul Power hand of rotation with Soul Nucleus of between the eyebrows place is the same.

How to make three Soul Nucleus each other operate alternately, this issue Huo Yuhao never has also considered. However, from now on, this actually became the issue that he then must ponder carefully.

Although Long Xiaoyao had not said. But Huo Yuhao is very clear, if did not speak this issue ponder to be clear, in the near future, three Soul Nucleus definitely will take to his huge trouble.

That side Tang Wutong, within the body Soul Power similarly was also saturated, but her situation is more troublesome, because of her second Soul Nucleus, although in between the eyebrows, is, first Soul Nucleus actually already in dantian. Only the chest position, can hold third Soul Nucleus. But this chest position, is the roads which must be taken of two Soul Nucleus Soul Power exchanges, whirlpool Soul Power produces in that place. How does this construct the third Soul Nucleus embryonic form?

Ye Xishui in the ponder a moment later, told Long Xiaoyao own idea.

Long Xiaoyao, has helped Huo Yuhao construct third Soul Nucleus, hearing this sets out immediately, before arriving at the Tang Wutong body, sits cross-legged to sit before her, lifts the double palm to balance with her, with Ye Xishui one after the other, clamps Tang Wutong in the center.

Long Xiaoyao sinking sound track: “Her situation, wants to construct third Soul Nucleus is impossible. We can only make her also turn with Yuhao exactly the same situation, this has the possibility of completion. Therefore, we can only be help her Soul Nucleus shift.”

Ye Xishui is listening to the Long Xiaoyao words, said with a smile: “Great idea. Has not thought that we also really have one day that collaborates to do good, this feeling is also very good! That starts. I lift, you protect, by our strengths, if was unable to succeed, on this world nobody can succeed. Even if inadequate, will not have the danger.”

Yeah? Even if Beast God Di Tian, can only wins their one of them steadily, if two big Limit Douluo simultaneously with him to the war, Di Tian is also not necessarily able to win.

Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong dantian was lifted slowly, gradually shifts to the chest position.

Long Xiaoyao scale gradually turned into the blood red, but the body of Ye Xishui started becomes illusory.

Huo Yuhao sits cross-legged to sit there, silently is realizing from experience the change in within the body.

Original two Soul Nucleus, Soul Power has been full Absolute, but third Soul Nucleus has formed, was actually isolated outside, isolation strength quite therefore Long Xiaoyao in the seal that his within the body plants, so long as this seal does not relieve, has isolated. However, once this seal breaks, he must start to try the mutual fusions of three Soul Nucleus. Otherwise, once within the body so huge energy disorder, he can be said as must die without doubt.

Long Xiaoyao pours into Soul Power of his within the body, although directly was attracted by him receives Soul Power, but, part was he now could not have absorbed.

Long Xiaoyao is Limit Douluo, within the body Soul Power is the essence, he just filtered the attribute, gave Huo Yuhao Soul Power not to be short of many. Therefore, that some Soul Power that Huo Yuhao could not absorb, after was over his 98 levels, his body now was unable to withstand. Even if he that tenacious body is not good. Because 98 levels, were close to the limit, but 99 levels, are the human body limits!

Truly to this level, can realize this level formidable and various issues. The Huo Yuhao sensation is strengthened continually, but each subtle change in within the body Soul Power, some soul-stirring feelings, as if want a control not to be good, will explode immediately the body to perish.

These unnecessary Soul Power, by the Long Xiaoyao compression in his dantian, this are the positions that he third Soul Nucleus will be in the future, that inside present actually many Soul Power, Huo Yuhao does not know that he does not dare to carry on to search to observe with his Spiritual Power.

Must wait till him to adapt to own 98 levels of Soul Power to cultivate first is, then controls gradually, after suddenly gaining a thorough understanding, can attempt, otherwise, is not good, if has inspired wars between own two Soul Nucleus and this third Soul Nucleus, bitter only then he.

Long Xiaoyao or Ye Xishui, truly have not faced three Soul Nucleus this situations, everyone is feels the stone to cross river, but this laboratory cannot be defeated, because of laboratory in Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong within the body! Once is defeated, they are the relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish results.

The situation in Tang Wutong within the body has stabilized gradually, feels including Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao somewhat strangely, meridians of Tang Wutong unobstructed does not make sense, in the process of entire Soul Nucleus lifting, has not met anything to trouble unexpectedly, moreover Tang Wutong control is also extremely good, appears without any dangerous situation.

As the matter stands, following continued to pour into becomes is much easier.

Long Xiaoyao returns Huo Yuhao behind, to continue to pour into surplus Soul Power. In the Huo Yuhao dantian, third Soul Nucleus forms gradually, whirlpool unceasing increasing, then compresses to the interior, quick, Huo Yuhao saw that a pure white crystal appeared.

Reason that is Bai Se (White Color), because these energies simply do not have the attribute, in the future they will be any attributes, needing Huo Yuhao give is good.

This simply was too fearful, Huo Yuhao at least like this think that what to do if were defeated! He knows certainly, after having absorbed Long Xiaoyao Soul Power, he can in attack Limit Douluo most in a short time, Soul Power that but, without a doubt, these external energy impacts, practice his oneself attacks is more dangerous.

Naturally, any matter relative, if depends upon him to practice, forms third Soul Nucleus time, certainly after will face Soul Power, strength bad situation. But currently had a Limit Douluo Soul Power scratch coat, naturally did not fear that met these to trouble.

Since like this, that only could be such walks, this once in a thousand years chance, regarding Huo Yuhao, has not felt excitedly, instead is careful that doubles.

Time one minute one second passed, Huo Yuhao unceasingly is feeling the change in within the body Soul Power throughout, all are very luckily smooth, Long Xiaoyao in that barrier that under his chest arranges very steady. Without any vacillation.

Soul Power that pours into started changes small, then gradually weak. Finally, after last Soul Power also pours into, Huo Yuhao behind becomes a peace.

Opens the double pupil, Huo Yuhao first behind looks to oneself. Sees, is be with smile on the face Long Xiaoyao.

This time he, already old like the appearance, the folding peak on top of peak on face, in Tang Wutong behind Ye Xishui is actually not another appearance, she only remaining light light shadow, even did not see clearly including the look.

-------------------------------------------------

Sorry, this morning completely was giving a thought to symbol, forgot the upload, the book friend told me to discover. Right, today starting from, four. Consecutively for three days, to end of the month. Finally three days, asking the monthly ticket to support.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-1





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 2 )


“Old Long, are you what kind of?”Huo Yuhao hurries to support Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao shows a faint smile, said: “I am all right, I now good cannot be good. In transfer cultivation gives in your process, my anything is clear, my this life, does not have any regret, Xishui said right, I can not bring to walk finally regrettably, only has a deficit is your Teacher, now, I also cultivate one to pass to you, was makes up slightly to his had a deficit. To make anything, you do, Holy Spirit Cult truly should not exist in this in society, do not have any worry, that address recorded clearly.”

“You must start calmly to cultivate as soon as possible, control these Soul Power of oneself within the body, after you adjust completely, can start to attack third Soul Nucleus. Remember, do not worry, the road that you must take, has the space, only then grasped the space deep meaning, has to complete the third Soul Nucleus possibility. You complement one another, cultivates together, the mutual protection, has the successful possibility. We hope that my soul in heaven can see, your achievement our humanity unprecedented three Soul Nucleus. Also such, did not waste me and Mu En to your guidances.”

“Yes, senior.”Huo Yuhao respectful is complying.

Regarding Long Xiaoyao, he has the sympathy, there is admiring. However, actually completely does not approve Long Xiaoyao some procedures. How regardless to say that he in the relations in Holy Spirit Cult this aspect causes Holy Spirit Cult to do in a big way because of the one's own selfish interests with Ye Xishui as well as. However, the person will die its word to be also friendly, moreover Long Xiaoyao truly has many help to him.

“Old Long, what wish do you have?”Huo Yuhao asked in a low voice.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, “did not have, finally must leave this world, I also finally extricated. If there is a next life, I and Xishui, if only a pair of average person, that should good! Xishui.”

Hears his summon, Ye Xishui that became very illusory light shadow flew slowly. Falls on him, light light shadow, looked like integrates the body of Long Xiaoyao to be ordinary.

Cool breeze has blown.

The body of Long Xiaoyao, flutters unexpectedly, as if changes into the innumerable butterflies, changes into the powder powder gradually, dissipates in the air. Only the luminous spots of innumerable glistening shoot up to the sky.

Has the black, golden color, they each other pester, coils around mutually. Increases to go toward a higher sky.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong gaze after these luminous spots to lift off, two people both deep bent the waist, regardless of before them, has made anything, they have achieved the peak super powerhouse on this world after all! They are worth this respect, let alone, they also the final strength will have passed to themselves and Tang Wutong.

In the future, oneself and Wutong make a good with this strength every time, even if forgives for them a point.

“Two Limit Douluo! Such. Really makes people be hard to imagine. Now on Continent, in our humanity. Perhaps also had Old Xuan is Limit Douluo.”Tang Wutong said disappointed.

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Do not worry, soon, we also certainly can become Limit Douluo. Although the process will be very simple. So long as there are you side me, I am confident.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong sweet smiles to him, her within the body present condition and Huo Yuhao are exactly the same, even be better than Huo Yuhao.

Ye Xishui has not lain. Her all with the Evil Soul Master related ability, was all melted in that large explosion, Radiant Phoenix Soul Power similarly is light attribute. Agrees with Tang Wutong, this makes the process of entire fusion exceptionally smooth.

The Tang Wutong third Soul Nucleus frame had also been constructed, to let it accepts Space Attribute, Ye Xishui kept some light attribute, to be advantageous the control of Tang Wutong.

“We later, perhaps cannot release Hao Dong Power.”Tang Wutong digs the small mouth, somewhat is very discontented.

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “That is because we have reached this world close peak! However, our Martial Soul Fusion techniques should also be able to use. Does not believe that I lead you to find the person to try.”

Tang Wutong doubts visits him, said: “Whom looks for? Xu Tianran?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now Bright Capital City is frightened by the slightest sound, has not moved Xu Tianran time. You also saw, strength that now Bright Capital City controls strong. We were not suitable to go to there at this time. Also in Bright Capital City, Old Long has given me a simple map, finally where I knew the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters. Before Old Long at the point of death, final words, tell me, can cope with Holy Spirit Cult independently.”

“Holy Spirit Cult headquarters? Where?”Tang Wutong surprised asking.

Now Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao died, in Holy Spirit Cult, most formidable is Zongli Wu, initially Huo Yuhao also has not become Transcendent Douluo time, has defeated him, now naturally was not anything. Ruins Holy Spirit Cult, truly is most important.

“What do we also wait for? Walks.”Tang Wutong somewhat stimulated saying.

98 levels! She now and Huo Yuhao is 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo, what but also there is more suitable than to try the enemy of hand Holy Spirit Cult?

They simultaneously jump, is the hand shakes hand as before, but, currently in having Hao Dong Power flows. They rise into the upper air straightly, accelerates again suddenly.

It is not needing any Soul Guidance Device, in within the body Soul Nucleus extreme twist, the air directly became the object who they control. In the sky simultaneously resounds two sonic bangs, they already disappearing trace.

...

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City.

“Without any discovery?”The Xu Tianran sinking sound asked.

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Started all manpower, had not found any clues as before. The Holy Spirit Cult headquarters are very mystical in the position, we also only know general position, before Ye Xishui said that now Holy Spirit Cult should move, the situation of also not knowing the relocation how. I have dispatched the army now, has traced in that direction, hopes that can find them.”

“Um.”Xu Tianran nodded, the complexion is very as before ugly, until now, in his heart cannot determine that Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao whether died . The life and death of these two people, were really too important. Once they are also living, even if in the future be only very short time can retaliate, is not Sun-Moon Empire can withstand.

“Has not thought really that Limit Douluo was unexpectedly formidable to this degree. Really also has the possibility of not having died. It seems like that I underestimated Soul Master. No wonder Shrek Academy can stand erect Continent for ten thousand years, this is Soul Master background! What a pity, we not such talent and opportunity. Back then, if I have not been injured, perhaps also possibility, but now, is a wee bit possibly does not have. This time, Grim Reaper Douluo and Dragon Emperor Douluo, if died, had Shrek Academy that Sea God Pavilion Master Old Xuan or Limit Douluo. When does not know, our Sun-Moon Empire can also have own Limit Douluo. To that time, we are the true great strength.”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, arrives at Xu Tianran behind, is pinching the forehead for him gently.

“On this day will certainly not come is too late. When your majesty unified Continent, by the entire Douluo Continent resources, but also feared that can't train Limit Douluo?”

The Xu Tianran complexion relaxed several points finally, has patted the hand of Ju Zi(orange) gently, said: “Said well. Turns head, you can start to get ready. I give you six months the entire armed forces, assembles various resources. When gets rid once more, must destroy Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries surely thoroughly. Does your big personal enemy also in Star Lou Empire, when you plan to cope with him?”

In Ju Zi(orange) eye ray one cold, said: “I will remain to cope with him finally again, I must make him look helplessly his country was trampled by the oppression of the people of our Sun-Moon Empire army, I must make him be in deep sorrow, finally dies.”

“Ha Ha, good, said well, makes him be in deep sorrow, finally dies!”Xu Tianran laughs.

...

The high-speed flight and controls itself air-operated to fly, that also completely is two concepts. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong at this time are this feeling.

To 98 levels of this levels, has not needed to consume Soul Power to fly again, is the air is promoting their bodies according to their thoughts completely. So long as their bodies can unable to withstand, speed as if in infinitely increasing.

Actually Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong do not know own speed quickly, actually greatly somewhat instant thousand li(500 km) general feeling.

The under foot scenery passes rapidly, when they pass through from the fog, the fog voluntarily will dissipate, looks like reigns they to allow to pass through.

, Huo Yuhao looks below peak on top of peak from afar the mountain range, surprised [say / way]: “Such quickly arrived here? Forward is not again far, must reach our destinations. Perhaps Wutong, our strengths, currently had the Limit Douluo level.”

“Um? How do you know?”Tang Wutong curious looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao said: “Do not forget, we are Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus. This, I earnestly have been realizing us the control a moment ago to the air. Before we are 95 levels of Transcendent Douluo, but feels and present is entirely different. This means that not only we Soul Power cultivate for promotion, is a sublimation! What can make us sublimate to another boundary? That has Limit Douluo. In other words, although we cannot break through 99 levels, but the strength, perhaps really has been the Limit Douluo level now. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo.”

----------------------------------------------

The beforehand chapter name has made a mistake, I asked the editor to help to change. Starting today, I frequently in our prestige - in platform, read some us to update no content to everybody. For example: Beyond Douluo Continent, future new book content advance notification and so on. Everybody is interested to our platform to listen.

Today read one: 100,000 years of Soft Bones Rabbit, has joined the book friend in platform to listen. Because this sound has no way to make triggering, the book friend who therefore, wants to hear quickly joins, will miss will leave out.

Joins our prestige - the method of platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has v authentication, is our families.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-2





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 3 )


Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “If before meeting Old Long and Ye Xishui, perhaps I believe that but I did not think so now. Limit Douluo has own trump card, they have own experience to this world, our cultivating to have perhaps been that level, before but we have that experience, we absolutely are also not Limit Douluo. Therefore, we must continue to try hard, the effort of going all out, we can certainly achieve that boundary, to that time, we looked at entire world, will be certainly more different.”

“Said well, no matter, I side you, accompany certainly you, impact that level, goes forward to that world together.”Saying that Huo Yuhao laughs.

How regardless to say that cultivated to arrive at the Limit Douluo level! Can he not be excited? Since this has been he continuously pursue.

“Almost arrived, I look.”Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to control speed, in airborne was slow gradually.

This place he truly has come, at present the big forest of cover presents for from dark green to the jet black color. On entire Continent, only then this forest has such characteristics. Because here is, Evil Spirit Forest!

Yes, Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, in Evil Spirit Forest, if not obtain the news from Long Xiaoyao there, anybody cannot imagine.

Evil Spirit Forest in the Sun-Moon Empire status, like Star Dou Forest the status on Douluo Continent. Is living Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Beast, the rank world Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler lives now here.

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes seventh Soul Ring, obtains from here, at that time he struck to kill one 100,000 years have repaired for Evil Eye Tyrant, afterward was discovered by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, it can be said that barely escapes!

Arrives once more, with past years already completely different, this time, Huo Yuhao not necessarily feared these Evil Eye. Just. What his some are not clear, why will Holy Spirit Cult place this momentarily high-risk place own headquarters? What issue did not have regarding these formidable evil soul cities, is, these small and weak Evil Soul Master? They encounter formidable Soul Beast time, but has the danger of perishing anytime.

So long as no matter how, can find Evil Soul Master to be good here, did not have the asylum of Grim Reaper Douluo, now here nobody can prevent itself.

Bleaching and dyeing whereabouts at the same time, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection bloomed outward, just likes a big net. Has covered toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Long Xiaoyao gives in his information, only then Evil Spirit Forest this name, where concrete Holy Spirit Cult had not said.

Huo Yuhao when explores, is careful, after all, here also lives this, cultivates in Soul Beast world to be next to existence of Beast God Di Tian. Can not provoke it, good that do not provoke, in order to avoid brings the unnecessary trouble.

Huo Yuhao had once pledged. So long as is not Soul Beast attacks itself on own initiative, again does not kill Soul Beast, therefore he will not provoke to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Even if he does not fear is also same.

The mind fluctuation spreads continually, quick. Huo Yuhao had found oneself this line of goals.

In the process that Huo Yuhao in searching to observe has the discretion very much, the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, since Evil Spirit Forest, they also needs the commodity. After all Bright Capital City is the entire Sun-Moon Empire core. Therefore, Holy Spirit Cult in Evil Spirit Forest, is certainly approaching the Bright Capital City direction.

But Evil Spirit Forest has been full of the danger. Wants the avoidance danger as far as possible, is naturally impossible to approach the Core Area territory. Therefore, he mainly searches to observe, is approaches the Bright Capital City direction the Evil Spirit Forest surrounding.

Really, after some time searching observes, person who Huo Yuhao has happen to discovered bustle about.

These people were too obvious, they the massive material handling, will be piling up in a stretch of open area, then by special person these thing income space Storage Soul Guidance Device.

Also does not know that these people have many Storage Soul Guidance Device, after the thing in open area piles up with, starts fast drawing, then some people continue the opposite party.

Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in underground, this is the first judgment of Huo Yuhao, because all commodities from underground transport.

The Spiritual Detection downward spread, by his present Spiritual Power, carried on the subsurface exploration is not anything, was continually thorough, Huo Yuhao held breath cold air.

This is what kind of project! Below the ground in this Evil Spirit Forest surrounding, nearly can the construction that described with the palace there.

This building area exceeds thousand mu, inside with the solid granite construction, various arrangement, to the utmost is all magnificent.

The person who bustled about has, rapid calculation, over a thousand people, the majority cultivates to be weak, in three rings to six rings, but also has one and 200 people of cultivating to be strong for the strength. Is directing these to cultivate for the weak person is carrying on the transporting.

Does not need to verify, Huo Yuhao knows one looked to the place, except for Holy Spirit Cult, but also who so rich. These commodities that looking from transports at present, Gold Soul Coin that the rare metal, piles up, various precious materials, the value is unquantifiable, although did not say the rich enemy, but is not worse than Shrek Academy! This is Evil Soul Master usually plunders. Good, was really good.

If there is not been able to be completely definite from the wealth merely, then, when Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection found Zongli Wu and Feng Ling in the crowd, again confirmed without doubt.

Nangong Wan also impressively in crowd, numerous familiar Evil Soul Master faces.

Was here!

Zongli Wu submits in person the water looks is bustling about the teaching audiences, the sinking sound asked to Nangong Wan: “That side remote antiquity Cult Master didn't have news to pass on?”

“Did not have. Remote antiquity Cult Master leaves in the morning, did not have the news to the present.”Nangong Wan was replying respectfully.

Zongli Wu brow tight wrinkle, said: “On a number of commodities all moved away, our people also came back, so long as transports again these commodities, here can abandon temporarily first, blocks the entrance. When we will have the opportunity to come back in the future again. This is the the Cult base industry, one day, we will come back.”

Nangong Wan nodded, said: “Certainly will come back. Cult Master, when do we walk?”

Zongli Wu [say / way] without hesitation: “After packing the thing, immediately walks.”

Nangong Wan somewhat surprised [say / way]: “Didn't wait for the remote antiquity elder and Old Long they?”

Zongli Wu shook the head, said: “Does not wait. The remote antiquity elder does not let us and others she, does not know how she thinks. Since Sun-Moon Empire must have no consideration for face with us, why doesn't make us retaliate? By her strength, if for it, where can stop deliberately? I not for her safety worry. Packs the thing we to walk immediately, the talented person is the foundation, so long as we leave here, saves the strength slightly, stages a comeback is not the issue.”

“Yes.”Nangong Wan respectful is complying. Here, Zongli Wu controls, share that he only then obeys the order.

In this time, suddenly, Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are almost gaining also ground, toward airborne looks. Their complexion slightly changes.

Nangong Wan as well as an audiences Evil Soul Master elders' response slightly slow a point, all gained ground.

Is above Titled Douluo cultivates for powerhouse, they have strong sensation ability. In the sky transmits the huge oppression strength suddenly, can't they possibly feel?

The terrifying pressure made one be flustered, but the source of this pressure actually unknown, every so often, unknown was most fearful.

Zongli Wu issues an order, a light barrier instantaneous ascension, covers all Evil Soul Master completely.

The linkage defense guard shield, this gadget may, not only the Sun-Moon Empire official has. Holy Spirit Cult becomes the national religion for a long time, the methods of some of their also many maintaining life, particularly, here is the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters!

The sky gradually became dim, the clouds of big piece collected from the distant place, the weather also as if started becomes cold.

“I have a look.”The Feng Ling sinking sound said.

Zongli Wu actually holds on Feng Ling, shook the head to her, “is not the Sun-Moon Empire person, this pressure is not Soul Engineer can take to us, takes our cultivating as, can make us produce so the person of pressure, on entire Continent few. Sends Distress Signal.”

“Requests reinforcements? To it?”Feng Ling surprised looks at Zongli Wu.

Zongli Wu nodded.

Next flickers, bunch of bright golden color fireworks ascended, after blasts out, is golden light shoots to go toward a higher airborne electricity together, similarly blasts out, changes into the golden gamp, for a very long time is not loose.

Also at this time, a white light dropped from the clouds, the ray not was extremely intense, flash when but it presented that the following Evil Soul Master complexion actually somewhat changed, the pressure that because, was blocked by the linkage defense guard shield appeared once again, moreover compared with formerly also wanted intense many.

“Pū!”The linkage defense guard shield almost cannot prevent that white light moment, the guard shield had been passed through, the white light falls instantaneously.

Zongli Wu first moves sideways to retrocede, runs away toward the distant place.

Holy Spirit Cult and Shrek Academy maximum difference lies, encounters the danger time, each of them first thinks is own safety, but is not other people.

Fierce thundering flickers to resound below, as if entire earth was lifted, the terrifying large explosion, made the world for it discoloration.

Tang Sect is in sole possession of nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, Highest Flatterer!

In the past, Huo Yuhao once relied on this type to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to puncture including the guard shield of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace surely, let alone is the Holy Spirit Cult linkage defense guard shield.

After the guard shield was pierced, does not have first completely to collapse, but the following large explosion, suddenly erupts in this guard shield range.

Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if Titled Douluo must for it frightened existence! Now on world most expensive weapon.

Reason that Soul Engineer can dominate important relying on gradually above Soul Master.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-3





Volume 13

98 levels! Next


Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “If before meeting Old Long and Ye Xishui, perhaps I believe that but I did not think so now. Limit Douluo has own trump card, they have own experience to this world, our cultivating to have perhaps been that level, before but we have that experience, we absolutely are also not Limit Douluo. Therefore, we must continue to try hard, the effort of going all out, we can certainly achieve that boundary, to that time, we looked at entire world, will be certainly more different.”

“Said well, no matter, I side you, accompany certainly you, impact that level, goes forward to that world together.”Saying that Huo Yuhao laughs.

How regardless to say that cultivated to arrive at the Limit Douluo level! Can he not be excited? Since this has been he continuously pursue.

“Almost arrived, I look.”Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to control speed, in airborne was slow gradually.

This place he truly has come, at present the big forest of cover presents for from dark green to the jet black color. On entire Continent, only then this forest has such characteristics. Because here is, Evil Spirit Forest!

Yes, Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, in Evil Spirit Forest, if not obtain the news from Long Xiaoyao there, anybody cannot imagine.

Evil Spirit Forest in the Sun-Moon Empire status, like Star Dou Forest the status on Douluo Continent. Is living Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Beast, the rank world Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler lives now here.

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes seventh Soul Ring, obtains from here, at that time he struck to kill one 100,000 years have repaired for Evil Eye Tyrant, afterward was discovered by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, it can be said that barely escapes!

Arrives once more, with past years already completely different, this time, Huo Yuhao not necessarily feared these Evil Eye. Just, what his some are not clear is. Why will Holy Spirit Cult place this momentarily high-risk place own headquarters? What issue did not have regarding these formidable evil soul cities, is, these small and weak Evil Soul Master? They encounter formidable Soul Beast time, but has the danger of perishing anytime.

No matter how. So long as can find Evil Soul Master to be good here, did not have the asylum of Grim Reaper Douluo, now here nobody can prevent itself.

Bleaching and dyeing whereabouts at the same time, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection bloomed outward, just likes a big net, has covered toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Long Xiaoyao gives in his information, only then Evil Spirit Forest this name, where concrete Holy Spirit Cult had not said.

Huo Yuhao when explores, is careful, after all. Here also lives this, cultivates in Soul Beast world to be next to existence of Beast God Di Tian. Can not provoke it, good that do not provoke, in order to avoid brings the unnecessary trouble.

Huo Yuhao had once pledged, so long as is not Soul Beast attacks itself on own initiative. Again does not kill Soul Beast, therefore he will not provoke to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Even if he does not fear is also same.

The mind fluctuation spreads continually, quick, Huo Yuhao had found oneself this line of goals.

In the process that Huo Yuhao in searching to observe has the discretion very much, the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, since Evil Spirit Forest, they also needs the commodity. After all Bright Capital City is the entire Sun-Moon Empire core. Therefore, Holy Spirit Cult in Evil Spirit Forest, is certainly approaching the Bright Capital City direction.

But Evil Spirit Forest has been full of the danger, wants the avoidance danger as far as possible, is naturally impossible to approach the Core Area territory. Therefore, he mainly searches to observe. Is approaches the Bright Capital City direction the Evil Spirit Forest surrounding.

Really, after some time searching observes, person who Huo Yuhao has happen to discovered bustle about.

These people were too obvious, they the massive material handling, will be piling up in a stretch of open area. Then by special person these thing income space Storage Soul Guidance Device.

Also does not know that these people have many Storage Soul Guidance Device, after the thing in open area piles up with, starts fast drawing, then some people continue the opposite party.

Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in underground, this is the first judgment of Huo Yuhao, because all commodities from underground transport.

The Spiritual Detection downward spread, by his present Spiritual Power, carried on the subsurface exploration is not anything, was continually thorough, Huo Yuhao held breath cold air.

This is what kind of project! Below the ground in this Evil Spirit Forest surrounding, nearly can the construction that described with the palace there.

This building area exceeds thousand mu, inside with the solid granite construction, various arrangement, to the utmost is all magnificent.

The person who bustled about has, rapid calculation, over a thousand people, the majority cultivates to be weak, in three rings to six rings, but also has one and 200 people of cultivating to be strong for the strength. Is directing these to cultivate for the weak person is carrying on the transporting.

Does not need to verify, Huo Yuhao knows one looked to the place, except for Holy Spirit Cult, but also who so rich. These commodities that looking from transports at present, Gold Soul Coin that the rare metal, piles up, various precious materials, the value is unquantifiable, although did not say the rich enemy, but is not worse than Shrek Academy! This is Evil Soul Master usually plunders. Good, was really good.

If there is not been able to be completely definite from the wealth merely, then, when Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection found Zongli Wu and Feng Ling in the crowd, again confirmed without doubt.

Nangong Wan also impressively in crowd, numerous familiar Evil Soul Master faces.

Was here!

Zongli Wu submits in person the water looks is bustling about the teaching audiences, the sinking sound asked to Nangong Wan: “That side remote antiquity Cult Master didn't have news to pass on?”

“Did not have. Remote antiquity Cult Master leaves in the morning, did not have the news to the present.”Nangong Wan was replying respectfully.

Zongli Wu brow tight wrinkle, said: “On a number of commodities all moved away, our people also came back, so long as transports again these commodities, here can abandon temporarily first, blocks the entrance. When we will have the opportunity to come back in the future again. This is the the Cult base industry, one day, we will come back.”

Nangong Wan nodded, said: “Certainly will come back. Cult Master, when do we walk?”

Zongli Wu [say / way] without hesitation: “After packing the thing, immediately walks.”

Nangong Wan somewhat surprised [say / way]: “Didn't wait for the remote antiquity elder and Old Long they?”

Zongli Wu shook the head, said: “Does not wait. The remote antiquity elder does not let us and others she, does not know how she thinks. Since Sun-Moon Empire must have no consideration for face with us, why doesn't make us retaliate? By her strength, if for it, where can stop deliberately? I not for her safety worry. Packs the thing we to walk immediately, the talented person is the foundation, so long as we leave here, saves the strength slightly, stages a comeback is not the issue.”

“Yes.”Nangong Wan respectful is complying. Here, Zongli Wu controls, share that he only then obeys the order.

In this time, suddenly, Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are almost gaining also ground, toward airborne looks. Their complexion slightly changes.

Nangong Wan as well as an audiences Evil Soul Master elders' response slightly slow a point, all gained ground.

Is above Titled Douluo cultivates for powerhouse, they have strong sensation ability. In the sky transmits the huge oppression strength suddenly, can't they possibly feel?

The terrifying pressure made one be flustered, but the source of this pressure actually unknown, every so often, unknown was most fearful.

Zongli Wu issues an order, a light barrier instantaneous ascension, covers all Evil Soul Master completely.

The linkage defense guard shield, this gadget may, not only the Sun-Moon Empire official has. Holy Spirit Cult becomes the national religion for a long time, the methods of some of their also many maintaining life, particularly, here is the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters!

The sky gradually became dim, the clouds of big piece collected from the distant place, the weather also as if started becomes cold.

“I have a look.”The Feng Ling sinking sound said.

Zongli Wu actually holds on Feng Ling, shook the head to her, “is not the Sun-Moon Empire person, this pressure is not Soul Engineer can take to us, takes our cultivating as, can make us produce so the person of pressure, on entire Continent few. Sends Distress Signal.”

“Requests reinforcements? To it?”Feng Ling surprised looks at Zongli Wu.

Zongli Wu nodded.

Next flickers, bunch of bright golden color fireworks ascended, after blasts out, is golden light shoots to go toward a higher airborne electricity together, similarly blasts out, changes into the golden gamp, for a very long time is not loose.

Also at this time, a white light dropped from the clouds, the ray not was extremely intense, flash when but it presented that the following Evil Soul Master complexion actually somewhat changed, the pressure that because, was blocked by the linkage defense guard shield appeared once again, moreover compared with formerly also wanted intense many.

“Pū!”The linkage defense guard shield almost cannot prevent that white light moment, the guard shield had been passed through, the white light falls instantaneously.

Zongli Wu first moves sideways to retrocede, runs away toward the distant place.

Holy Spirit Cult and Shrek Academy maximum difference lies, encounters the danger time, each of them first thinks is own safety, but is not other people.

Fierce thundering flickers to resound below, as if entire earth was lifted, the terrifying large explosion, made the world for it discoloration.

Tang Sect is in sole possession of nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, Highest Flatterer!

In the past, Huo Yuhao once relied on this type to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to puncture including the guard shield of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace surely, let alone is the Holy Spirit Cult linkage defense guard shield.

After the guard shield was pierced, does not have first completely to collapse, but the following large explosion, suddenly erupts in this guard shield range.

Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if Titled Douluo must for it frightened existence! Now on world most expensive weapon.

Reason that Soul Engineer can dominate important relying on gradually above Soul Master.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-4





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 1 )


The explosion has continued for more than ten seconds, gradually weakens. When Zongli Wu crawls from the ground, what sees is an explosion area in confusion.

The rare metal liquefied, more resources were vaporized, disappearance does not see the signs, most makes his grieved what is unable to breathe, massive medium low-order Evil Soul Master lost the trail. Under this degree of attack, simply does not have other possibilities.

Is who? Is who can so found here, and has used one nine levels surely the attack that installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to be outspoken?

Sun-Moon Empire, certainly is Xu Tianran!

The Zongli Wu complexion turned into the iron green completely, he quite hates, why is good to hate itself not to listen to mother, making preliminary Soul Engineer first walk, but to save the time, making them all come back to transport the commodity.

This large explosion, absolutely does not have the seven rings following person to live, even if above seven rings, has drawn support from some Titled Douluo level Evil Soul Master help accidentally, can live on dishonorably in Shi.

The defense of Holy Spirit Cult was insufficient so laxly, but, the commodity must shift, many fortification have demolished. Who can think that some people of cards will launch the attack in this time? Didn't mother go to Bright Capital City? Why Sun-Moon Empire can also start at this time . Moreover, how do they know our headquarters in the position?

The high temperature is continuing, Soul Guidance Protective Cover actually completely damaged, in bombing range, scorched earth.

More than thousand Evil Soul Master, can live in this large explosion, less than hundred people.

Soul Guidance Device, this is the Soul Guidance Device prestige energy. What is more terrifying, this large explosion, has wiped out the Holy Spirit Cult future thoroughly!

Zongli Wu clenches the teeth, eyes is red. But, he felt that high temperature originally is vanishing, displaces. Extremely cold.

Has snowed, in the sky starts to have the snowflake to fall gently downward. These snowflake gentle dancing in the breeze, each piece looks like the feather of swan to be ordinary.

The clouds of haze, have snowflake to drift about unceasingly under. Quick, the earth turned into gonorrhea snow white, before burned black, was buried.

The residual heat in ground, as if not affect to these snowflakes, is unable to make them have the melting of least bit unexpectedly.

The Huo Yuhao baseless conjecture in the midair, the whole person seems like carefully examining oneself world king to be ordinary. The hand of Tang Wutong, Spiritual Detection and Sharing has been covering the surrounding big piece space.

Reason that uses Highest Flatterer, is not because he thinks that he could not cope with these Evil Soul Master, but for did not leave behind any fish slip through.

If any Evil Soul Master runs away, may bring the disaster, the behavior eliminates evil thoroughly, cannot show mercy at this time absolutely.

Zongli Wu looked like feels anything, when he crawled after the ground. First to airborne looks. On the old face is revealing the panic-stricken color, at this moment, he were bared all unexpectedly presents feeling outside.

The snowflake dances in the air, the temperature in air reduces suddenly. Can live in this large explosion, less than hundred people, moreover many were also injured. This is nine levels surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball the prestige energy! Was sneak attacked by it without any preparation, that is fatal. Initially Dou Ling Empire imperial palace so. This time Holy Spirit Cult teaches the audiences also similarly so.

The extremely cold aura arrives at the earth, some Evil Soul Master moved these snowflakes, discovery that they can shock. These seem like the delicate snowflakes, hard is similar to the jade is unexpectedly ordinary, but moves slightly, will immediately feel that the unequalled chill in the air attacks the whole body instantaneously.

That spreads to coldness in bone, as if in that flash, must be frozen including the marrow.

The Soul Master cold resistant ability be much stronger than average person, but, if the temperature lowers to 150 degrees below zero, even if Titled Douluo is impossible to survive under such ultra-low temperature for a long time.

When that snowflake descends, Zongli Wu knows that is who came, those who made his heart sink to the valley was, strength that this person bloomed, be some time ago more terrorist than that wartime. Why? Why he grows so will be rapid, he so will be why fearful, why can he find here?

“Dispersion, runs!”Zongli Wu bellows, the personal appearance accelerates suddenly, throws toward the Evil Spirit Forest deep place. Feng Ling follows, follows side him.

In this time, pure white Halo is dropping from the clouds, covers all Evil Soul Master completely, leakproof.

“Can get away?”

The gentle snowflake, turned into the terror sharp weapon suddenly, dances in the air rapidly, changes into a handle handle sharp knife blade. Easily pierces the Evil Soul Master bodies of these heavy wound.

light shadow drop from the clouds, has in the snow the fairy maiden, has in the ice deep green, the great bear arrives. Slaughters is almost is erupting instantaneously.

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, this is truly perfect edition Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, even if Snow Emperor displayed in the past personally, cannot be this degree.

Because Huo Yuhao Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain fused Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor domain ability, has both the two superiority.

Under this ultra-low temperature, only then has the Absolute Ice powerhouse to be like a fish in water, Snow Emperor, Ice Emperor and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), three big powerhouses drop from the clouds.

With completion of Huo Yuhao second Soul Nucleus, this time they, can borrow the Huo Yuhao strength large scale, once the strength of complete condition arrived by nearly.

Not having Evil Soul Master can resist their attacks, does not have, all Evil Soul Master before them, look like child irresistibly is ordinary, changes into the ice sculpture unceasingly or is the powder powder.

Dropping from the clouds Bai Se (White Color) Halo is Group Weakening. A fearfulness of Limit Douluo Spiritual System Soul Ability, could not find second on Continent now.

Whirlpool Soul Power that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus produces, making in any sole Soul Ability have two characteristics, mind and ice.

Therefore, when Group Weakening arrives, not Evil Soul Master, not only felt weakly, during that was weak drills into oneself spiritual sea ice to be cold, as if the consciousness was frozen.

Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo no longer, Transcendent Douluo had been killed by Huo Yuhao, can preserve, simply not too many powerhouses.

They only want to go all out to escape now, flee this terrifying snow and ice hell.

The melodious singing sound resounds, Mermaid Princess from the sky sang, ice blue halos from the sky proliferated, that was coming from amplification of Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass to Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Five big spirits, are equal to at least the powerhouses of two Limit Douluo levels add on three Transcendent Douluo. Although they cannot endless with the aid of the Huo Yuhao strength, but coped with these Evil Soul Master to be enough.

Only then first reacts and whole-heartedly outward impact Zongli Wu and Feng Ling, ran out of the Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain category. They have not run away toward the distant place, but is crazy dashes about wildly toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Evil Spirit Forest has massive Soul Beast, only then breaks, has the possibility of finding a way out.

Zongli Wu had not considered must contend with Huo Yuhao, heavy wound that his previous receive did not have to heal and recover completely, the Bone Dragon king also to sacrifice, present he, is not the most flourishing condition. But aura that in the Huo Yuhao domain spreads, making him have a very frightened guess.

Limit Douluo, that clearly is the Limit Douluo pressure!

The pressure of this level, he is familiar, on oneself mother has, on Long Xiaoyao also has. But, he cannot think, Huo Yuhao actually can also in such a short time achievement Limit Douluo.

He now even including guessing the plan of reason does not have, because he does not have that time, now he only wants to run, running distant, first kept the life to say again.

The Zongli Wu age was not small, but, he treasures his statement as before, lives for a long time, does not hate dead on exceed!

“Stops.”The light sound from the sky resounds, regarding Zongli Wu, is ordinary just like the thunderclap.

Feng Ling lowers roars, body flame Sheng, the Dark Phoenix instantaneous ascension, the formidable flame lights the surrounding forest suddenly greatly completely, braves a large amount of thick smokes.

Two forms dropped from the clouds at this moment, light the flame of forest almost to extinguish instantaneously, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong shakes hand to arrive in front of Feng Ling and Zongli Wu.

Sees them, a Zongli Wu final fantasy was also disillusioned, is Limit Douluo, they divided Bright Capital City to have the Limit Douluo aura, was not a person, but was two people!

Facing two Limit Douluo, their which opportunities of also a little life? Only if hurried back in this time Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “Stemming from respecting Senior Long and Senior Ye, can keep your entire corpse.”

Zongli Wu cloudy and cold looks at Huo Yuhao, “you think that you did win? You extinguish kill my Holy Spirit Cult these many people, if I can live today departure, certainly will exhaust all means that making Shrek City turn into the ghost legendary creature.”

Huo Yuhao ridicule smiles, “first, you are impossible to have that opportunity. Next, if your Holy Spirit Cult has skill to do, Shrek City already did not exist. You could not achieve before, later cannot achieve similarly. Can Shrek can it be that you blaspheme?”

Tang Wutong loosens Huo Yuhao to hold her hand, the starting to walk step, walks toward Zongli Wu and Feng Ling.

Huo Yuhao must control another side Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, Soul Power must be borrowed by five big spirits, but she is actually complete condition.

Feng Ling has gotten rid, this completely oppressed atmosphere keeps her from enduring, the dark flame erupts suddenly, this time has not proliferated, but changes into together the firing line, directly soars Tang Wutong to go.

Tang Wutong smiles cold, shone a round dazzling sunlight suddenly, the sunlight was the Purple gold color, changed into the giant corona becomes her background. The firing line that Feng Ling releases has not arrived in front of her, to shatter naturally.

-------------------------------------------------

Four finished, asking the monthly ticket to support! At the end of the month, exploded plants! The monthly ticket pounds quickly. Tomorrow, the day after tomorrow is also four!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-1





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 2 )


The Tang Wutong right hand lifts, a handle jet black such as black ink has the hammer of golden trace to appear in her left hand, the wrist|skill shakes, the Clear Sky Hammer thump strikes in the air.

Low and deep sonic bang thunders to resound, in a diameter hundred meters range, all plants vanishes in puff of smoke instantaneously. The earth instantaneously is undercutting several rice.

Feng Ling stuffy snort|hum, in mouth the blood spurts crazily. In the eye full is color with amazement.

Wields that flash of hammer in Tang Wutong, she only thought that the air condensed completely, then changes into a handle diameter hundred meters great hammer, shells directly on her.

The Dark Phoenix flame scatters in all directions to flutter about, her both legs fall into the soil.

Under the absolute strength suppression, she is the least bit revolt cannot achieve unexpectedly.

Zongli Wu Staff appeared in his hands, Wraith Soul raise around his body, how regardless to say that he is 98 levels of Titled Douluo, he is impossible to resign oneself to extinction. The dragging, this is he must do.

The Grim Reaper Devil Puppet shadow appears behind him, after bunch of Wraith Soul appear, is burns unexpectedly instantaneously in sad and shrill neighing, changes into bunch of jack-o '- lanterns, then unceasing was swallowed by that Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

On the face of Zongli Wu is a fierceness. Feng Ling is face upwards a long and loud cry, changes into black Fire Phoenix instantaneously, in the neighing sound is having the intense soul shake, Martial Soul avatar!

Behind Tang Wutong, dragon wings launches, right hand in void one move, Golden Dragon Spear appears in the right hand, points at Zongli Wu, left hand Clear Sky Hammer is actually unceasingly from the sky wields.

Dark Phoenix in sky every time wants to approach, immediately instantaneously will be raised by the invisible airing flies, each hammer, her brilliance will be weakened several points. This completely is the disparity of absolute strength.

The Tang Wutong behind Sun ray was more powerful, the Zongli Wu whole body that the formidable Light aura shines ascends the faint trace smog, but he as before is actually suppressing, back Grim Reaper Devil Puppet in Wraith Soul flame under pours into unceasingly, becomes more and more congealing reality.

Zongli Wu own strength came from these Wraith Soul. At this time actually the Wraith Soul combustion, obviously he stakes everything on a single throw of the dice. This was must go all out.

Huo Yuhao stands in Tang Wutong behind not far away, is actually a relaxedness of face, to Tang Wutong view enemy.

Suddenly, airborne Dark Phoenix erupts the intense flame aura, after having shouldered a Tang Wutong hammer hardly, that hovering in midair.

The Feng Ling main body appears gradually, her complexion paleness, blood spurt crazily, spurts thinly above front dark flame. Her body also starts to burn unexpectedly. Combustion, not only Soul Power, is the strength of her soul.

“Wutong, be careful.”The Huo Yuhao sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

Although Feng Ling in name is Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, in fact she also has been controlled by Zongli Wu, for Zongli Wu, she burns unexpectedly oneself soul and Martial Soul, perhaps is she is not necessarily voluntary.

“Raises!”Feng Ling face upwards to call out pitifully, body changes into a black red great fire group suddenly, then integrates in own phoenix flame instantaneously. Immediately, jet black such as Fire Phoenix of black ink turned into the black completely, instigation that a pair of wing makes an effort, this time. Flies the Tang Wutong Clear Sky Hammer hammer vigor fan unexpectedly. Then falls from the sky from the sky suddenly, not to the Tang Wutong direction, but flies to shoot to go toward Zongli Wu.

Wipes to sneer to appear on the Huo Yuhao face, without a doubt. Feng Ling and Zongli Wu are displaying, inevitably is Holy Spirit Cult secret technique. As for the effect is anything, Huo Yuhao is not clear. But took burning Feng Ling and Zongli Wu massive Wraith Soul as the price, the effect will not be certainly bad, can perhaps make them have temporarily the attack of Limit Douluo level also perhaps. The Evil Soul Master ability, is always surreptitious.

But, controls in front of Huo Yuhao of audience in according to Spiritual Detection, he how in oneself will occupy completely in the superior situation to give Zongli Wu such opportunity.

The personal appearance dodges quietly, Huo Yuhao arrived at Tang Wutong behind, stretches out the arms, grasped her tender body from behind.

On the Tang Wutong elegant face reveals a smile, pair of dragon wings turns over to behind, the gable lived in Huo Yuhao. Two people bloomed the intense ray.

The appearance that glitters strange ray vertical eye to be quietly, the golden color, aquamarine, Zhen blue color and deep purple, many rays unceasing glitters and is fluctuating in this only vertical eye.

Next flickers, this is mixing the innumerable strange brilliance rays, the electricity from that huge vertical eye shoots.

The assurance of Huo Yuhao to opportunity is impossible to have the problem, when he grasps Tang Wutong that flash, is Feng Ling and Zongli Wu fusion at the same time. At this time, Zongli Wu was impossible to move the personal appearance.

Strange multi- color ray instantaneous electricity shoots, the magnificent brilliance made the surrounding large room cover a magnificent singularly varied color.

Zongli Wu obtains integration of Feng Ling, the whole person turned into piece of dark red, back Grim Reaper Devil Puppet is integrating with his main body, his own aura at an exceptional pace is also selecting for promotion.

But also at this time, that [say / way] magnificent multi- color ray arrived in front of him. Zongli Wu only thought that the whole body shakes, he felt that entire world becomes is different, that magnificent feeling, making him have relaxation of not being able to say. This relaxation is from the heart, that comfortable.

But, he actually again could not feel own formidable Soul Power, integrated own Grim Reaper Devil Puppet almost to be eliminated instantaneously. His whole person also turned into a golden sculpture, great power, is similar to the snow and ice melting is ordinary, is vanishing quietly.

Fading in Radiance, Golden Road.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong formidable Martial Soul Fusion technique.

The Martial Soul Fusion technique that takes two close Limit Douluo to cultivate for the powerhouse shows, in this flash, its prestige can in fact go beyond the limit of this world, has been half god level.

Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are strong by the ability of secret technique fusion, in approached in front of the strength of gods, what was also considered as?

The Feng Ling strength vanished with her soul together, has not left any trace. Zongli Wu Grim Reaper Devil Puppet was also eliminated, Soul Power, most. When he pants for breath is forcing works loose from that golden color, the whole person seemed to be old dozens years old.

With Huo Yuhao and qualitative change of Tang Wutong strength, Golden Road also similar qualitative change. On the wane no longer is Martial Soul and Soul Ability, in the meantime, the vitalities of some people.

Zongli Wu was very old, steps onto this in Golden Road, his vitality drops instantaneously, the whole person completely is a last years of life old person's appearance.

“Impossible, this not to be impossible. This does not belong to the strength of humanity. Even if my mother or is Old Long, does not have such strength. Why and why can you actually display?”Zongli Wu absent-minded was roaring. The last resort cannot even display, thoroughly was destroyed by the opposite party. This attack, for him is really too many heavy, because pays, will be the life price.

Rays fly to shoot to come from the distant place, stops to Huo Yuhao in front. Then changes into bunch of rays, integrates his within the body separately.

Sees the advancements of these rays, Zongli Wu is the surface like the dying embers. The spirit came back, means that all Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses had all caught the whole lot in a dragnet, does not have any living witness again. Holy Spirit Cult, unravelled.

“Huo Yuhao! You destroy my Holy Spirit Cult, the old man becomes the ghost, will not let off your.”Zongli Wu looks that in the Huo Yuhao look has been full of the hatred.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, said: “Was a pity that you become the opportunity of ghost will not have. Your this life, does not know that has injured the souls of many people. Even if you become the ghost or Wraith Soul, during is dark, you will also suffer the scourge. However, stemming from senior to Old Long and respect of Ye Xishui, I will not give you opportunity. You believe that before me, you also has into the possibility of ghost?”

At the same time was saying, the double pupil of Huo Yuhao turned into the golden color, walked toward Zongli Wu step by step, formidable Spiritual Power, changes into huge light barrier, covers them, the mind fluctuation of that terror, makes the Zongli Wu any mind level strength collapse sufficiently.

In this time, suddenly, entire space as if fiercely was shaking, drops from the clouds just like mountain general terror Spiritual Power.

Low and deep, dignified and cloudy and cold sound from the sky reverberates.

“Who is? Is who dares to destroy the main body deep sleep, is, dares to slaughter in my Evil Spirit Forest?”Appears with that low and deep sound, the sky starts to twist unexpectedly, then becomes a darkness.

Jet black such as Wu Yun (black clouds) of black ink splits to the both sides slowly, was the entire day has torn unexpectedly likely, a giant eye, that appeared in the midair, the vision referred, position that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as well as Zongli Wu were.

“Controls the Sir, you came finally, please punish these to dare to destroy the Evil Spirit Forest tranquil person.”The reinforcements that the call of Zongli Wu hysteria, he must wait for came finally.

Yes, this is Holy Spirit Cult final depending on. If did not obtain the agreement of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, Holy Spirit Cult possibly does set up the headquarters in Evil Spirit Forest underground? Although in the Evil Spirit Forest edge, but also obviously relations between they and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

Has Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao two big Limit Douluo exists, they have the qualifications and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler discuss the condition.

But this time, if were not soon moves toward the death that Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao self inductance vitality declined, Holy Spirit Cult was also not necessarily able to move.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is not the good generation, once Holy Spirit Cult not enough and it stands existence in same level, it does not mind the Holy Spirit Cult destruction absolutely. Even if Holy Spirit Cult has not been short for these years to it consecrates is also same. Evil Spirit Forest is its domain, is its place of control, naturally is not willing to have humanity continuously here.

-----------------------------------------------------

Continues four! First two, in the evening two. Does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket to support.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-2





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 3 )


The Purple gold color glare has glittered together suddenly, in Zongli Wu whole body big change of hysteria call, the look becomes in the next flash dim, gradually vanished the brilliance.

What regardless of comes is, is impossible to change Huo Yuhao to strike to kill his determination, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master he, must die. This possibly does not have any other.

Holy Spirit Cult, starting from this moment, finally from Continent thorough cancelled, this does not know that has cruelly harmed Evil Soul Master clan/sect of many lives, forever withers away!

“Humanity. Affronts the main body dignity, must pay the price.”The sound of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler powerful resounds, the diameter surpasses the hundred zhang (333m) the dark red glare to drop from the clouds together suddenly, covers Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong completely.

Back then, Huo Yuhao had withstood an attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that time, he was relying on Spiritual Immunity, barely escaped. Fled Evil Spirit Forest.

But this time, he is not initially that talent just becomes Soul Saint Huo Yuhao.

In the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, Huo Yuhao vision brilliant, huge vertical eye shines suddenly, glitters the golden-rose color brilliance to glisten together instantaneously.

Martial Soul avatar, Eye of Asura!

Compared with the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, the golden-rose color ray that Huo Yuhao sends out obviously many that others are smaller and weaker . But when, two pupil light from the sky collide instant.

In the sky, the Wu Yun (black clouds) fierce change, that huge dark red light beam was blocked unexpectedly. Moreover, its color also has the transformation, unexpectedly many light ice blue color, moreover is spreading toward its source.

Eye of Asura and Soul Assault! Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus mixes Soul Power in dripping Absolute that this moment displays.

“Well?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler surprised snort|hum, the dark red ray has collected suddenly inward. Originally the diameter of hundred zhang (333m) almost in ray dodges, collected, only then diameter about one zhang (3.33 m). The terrifying mind storm erupts in the midair.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, looks like a piece of bloodshed is ordinary. Fierce mind fluctuation. Let all Soul Beast in entire Evil Spirit Forest all crawl in the place, does not dare to have moves slightly. They felt to come from the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler anger. But here, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is all control.

Tang Wutong arrives at side Huo Yuhao, saw the dignity of Huo Yuhao look, a time spells, the Huo Yuhao mouth and nose place seeps out the blood unexpectedly.

Is dares to challenge Di Tian worthily, and existence that can the whole body draw back!

When flash of both sides Spiritual Power collision, Huo Yuhao felt what is a constriction beyond description. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly fused formidable Spiritual Power and Space Power completely, what in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power fuses is Absolute Ice, but in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power has actually filled the space storm. That terror space thought. Has nearly torn to pieces Huo Yuhao Spiritual Source.

“We come up.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, selects for promotion, changes into two light shadow, arrived in the upper air instantaneously.

He had pledged that does not strike to kill Soul Beast easily, in this Evil Spirit Forest is living massive Soul Beast. By them and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength, if spells to fight in the ground, certainly will create loss of life. Therefore, he must place in the sky the battlefield.

In sky originally huge pressure under the terror mind storm wreaks havoc is nothing left. When Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong after that storms. Finally saw has placed Continent Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second, was next to the Beast God Di Tian terror exists.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too huge, that is over 300 meters in diameter giant eye pupil. Around the terrifying great eye body has 9981 tentacles, each length over 500 meters. From the sky brandishes.

Behind its huge body, completely is piece of dark red, that is its Soul Power sea, therefore had formerly that it, as soon as appears. Just like world end general feeling.

“Evil Tyrant hello, below Huo Yuhao, enters Evil Spirit Forest with my wife. It is not to disturb your deep sleep. That Holy Spirit Cult made my humanity loss of life, must extinguish it kills, but also asked Evil Tyrant to forgive.”Huo Yuhao vision gentle said to Evil Eye Tyrant.

He does not plan and this Evil Eye Tyrant mutual hatred, after all, this is also on Continent the illustrious powerhouse, is controlling Evil Spirit Forest, and what is more, even entire Sun-Moon Continent Soul Beast is headed by it.

The spirit system won initial success along with the development of time, in the future wants to promote, on need more powerhouse's support, if can convince Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, carries on the spirit dissemination in Sun-Moon Continent, regarding the relations between human and Soul Beast relaxes will have big impetus, therefore Huo Yuhao so will be polite.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil looks at Huo Yuhao, the low and deep sound is reverberating in the entire space, “humanity, you are very formidable. You in I have seen humanity, is only one can the frontage and my Spiritual Power contends. However, you killed had the humanity of cooperation agreement with me, this matter, cannot such consider as finished. You must pay the corresponding price to be good.”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Evil Tyrant, you, although is formidable, but actually do not think that our humanity is very small and weak. I do not hope and you to become an enemy, but, actually does not mean that we fear you. We will not accept your any condition, but does not hope with you for the enemy. If you must with our mutual hatred, that also as you like. You can try greatly, whether can profit on us.”

“Hey!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler laughs suddenly. 81 tentacles from the sky are brandishing unceasingly, the sky turned into a piece of distortion, formidable Spiritual Power from the sky reverberates, the pressure of that blotting out the sky appears again.

Huo Yuhao also secretly admires to this Evil Tyrant, can own spiritual sea projection in outside the body, and creates so formidable mind fluctuation, he self-examines could not have achieved. Perhaps, in the future after achievement third Soul Nucleus, is a little this level the opportunity.

However, such that just like he said that he did not fear Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, self-confident, stemmed from the strength.

“Humanity, very long nobody has dared to speak with me like this. Very good, then, I must try today but actually, your this arrogant humanity has many abilities. So long as you can run away from main body hand today, this time matter, otherwise, you have stayed behind to my this Evil Spirit Forest make the manure.”

At the same time was saying, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that 81 tentacles turned into the scarlet red instantaneously, from all directions pulls out toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong strikes, but.

Really valiant! Initially it dared to leave oneself territory to challenge Beast God Di Tian, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler temperament could be imagined. It is impossible unable to feel that Tang Wutong also has close Limit Douluo strength, even if is this, it has also chosen the fight.

Although Huo Yuhao pledged that does not kill Soul Beast on own initiative, but if is Soul Beast dares to attack itself, he will not show mercy. Moreover, in all Soul Ring of his present, but also lacks one, lacks Spirit Eyes ninth Soul Ring. Perhaps on this world, does not have anybody compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appropriately.

Huo Yuhao is Twin Martial Souls, if general Soul Master, even if has killed the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, also impossible absorption Soul Ring that it has produced, because the energy of that implication was really too huge.

But Huo Yuhao is different! He cultivated for on close Limit Douluo level, had Dual Soul Nucleus, absorbed Evil Tyrant Soul Ring also really to have the possibility.

Pulls out the tentacle that strikes to come facing these, the Huo Yuhao surface sinks like the water, he does not have to display his domain ability directly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too formidable.

Although this is first time fights with it directly, but Huo Yuhao has faced the experience of Beast God Di Tian. He is very clear, to Evil Tyrant and powerhouse of Beast God this level, they have stood in the world peak, truly is not general Limit Douluo can contend.

Control of Evil Tyrant to Space Power, absolutely not meeting in Beast God. Therefore, wants to defeat it, only then defeats the enemy by a surprise attack, and cannot with it to consuming. This cultivated had about 700,000 years powerhouses fully, can project including spiritual sea in outside the body, own Soul Power must vigorously to what kind degree Ah?

The light mist raises from Huo Yuhao, Morning Dew Knife appeared during he grasps. In Tang Wutong both hands is Zuo Chuiyou the spear|gun, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing already and she completely is as before connected.

Facing the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, in their hearts does not have the least bit to fear, some are excited. Their strengths were just increased, the foundation is not steady, since breaking through 95 levels, they do not have to precipitate well. But wants better experience oneself to cultivate is, was completely grasped the strength that these select for promotion suddenly by oneself, the best means are, fight!

Like initially Huo Yuhao outrageously proposed that selects ten, after is that time, established him became the Transcendent Douluo foundation.

Although Evil Tyrant is formidable, but Huo Yuhao has the absolute confidence to be able the whole body to draw back, even if cannot hit, runs or inescapable. Such being the case, then on full war, enhances own actual combat experience.

Treadonned Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to glitter instantaneously, under the function of Spiritual Detection and Sharing, they simultaneously used Teleportation to look like general that a person used.

Shifts hundred meters instantaneously. Huo Yuhao appears in a completing the order form tentacle front, in the hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously.

In the sky, ices blue light shadow to dodge to pass together.
